IDENTITY  THEFT  AND  DATA  BROKER  SERVICES 

S.  HRG.  109–1087 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  10,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

61–787 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 10, 2005 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Bill Nelson  ...........................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Chart, 2005 Data Security Incidents  ..............................................................
Prepared statement of Senator McCain 
.........................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Kurtz, Paul B., Executive Director, Cyber Security Industry Alliance (CSIA) 

........................
Barrett, Jennifer T., Chief Privacy Officer, Acxiom Corporation 
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Curling, Douglas C., President/Chief Operating Officer, ChoicePoint Inc.  ......
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Frank, Esq., Mari J., Attorney, Mari J. Frank, Esq. & Associates  .....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
..
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Rotenberg,  Marc,  President/Executive  Director,  Electronic  Privacy  Informa-
tion Center (EPIC)  ...............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Sanford,  Kurt  P.,  President/CEO,  U.S.  Corporate  and  Federal  Government 
............................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Markets, LexisNexis 

Page 
1 
25 
1 
2 
38 
3 
3 
2 
27 
5 
32 
32 
1 
6 

46 
48 
12 
15 
68 
73 
53 
55 

58 
60 

6 
8 

APPENDIX 

Dempsey, James X., Executive Director, Center for Democracy & Technology, 

statement before the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, April 13, 2005  ..... 107 
99 

Hillebrand, Gail, Senior Attorney, Consumers Union, prepared statement  .......
Ireland,  Oliver  I.,  Attorney,  Morrison  &  Foerster  LLP;  on  behalf  of  Visa 
U.S.A.  Inc.,  statement  before  the  Subcommittee  on  Commerce,  Trade,  and 
Consumer  Protection  of  the  Committee  on  Energy  and  Commerce,  United 
States House of Representatives, May 11, 2005  ................................................ 114 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye  to 

Paul B. Kurtz 

....................................................................................................... 116 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Bill Nelson to: 

Jennifer T. Barrett  ........................................................................................... 118 
Kurt P. Sanford 
................................................................................................ 121 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

IDENTITY  THEFT  AND  DATA  BROKER 

SERVICES 

TUESDAY,  MAY  10,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:30  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Sanford,  Mr.  Curling,  let  me  welcome  you, 
gentlemen.  And  I  thank  the  witnesses  for  coming,  and  appreciate 
their willingness to appear to discuss the recent data breaches that 
left  exposed  the  personal  information  of  thousands  of  consumers. 
Over  the  recess,  my  staff  attempted  to  steal  my  identity,  and  I  re-
gret  to  say  they  were  successful.  So,  they  demonstrated  to  me, 
when  I  came  back  from  this  recess,  just  how  easy  it  really  is  to 
steal an identity. 

This  is  the  first  of  several  hearings  that  our  committee  is  going 
to  conduct  to  have  a  better  understanding  of  data  brokerage  serv-
ices,  as  well  as  how  data  brokers  handle  personal  consumer  infor-
mation. 

This hearing is intended to discuss the recent data breaches and 
what the private industry is doing to mitigate the possibility of fu-
ture breaches. The Committee will revisit this issue next month as 
we  look  to  develop  legislative  solutions  that  might  better  protect 
consumers from future breaches. 

We believe we must be careful to strike a balance between assur-
ing  the  security  of  certain  types  of  personal  information,  while  not 
inhibiting  the  legitimate  flow  of  information  that  is  vital  to  our 
economy. 

Now,  it’s  my  intention  to  turn  the  chair  over  to  Senator  Smith 
when he arrives, Senator. I’ve got a conflict today. But let me yield 
to my Co-Chairman, Senator Inouye. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator INOUYE. I thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I agree with your words. And I’d like to point out that, since Jan-
uary, there have been at least 32 major data security incidents po-
tentially affecting 5.2 million Americans. These incidents only came 
to light because of a California law that requires disclosure of data 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

security  breaches.  No  one  knows  how  many  undisclosed  breaches 
may  have  occurred  prior  to  the  implementation  of  the  California 
law.  And  equally  disturbing  is  the  possibility  that  the  full  impact 
of  these  breaches  may  never  be  known,  and  millions  of  Americans 
remain unaware of their vulnerability to identity theft. 

So,  I  look  forward  to  hearing  from  the  witnesses,  and  I  thank 
them for appearing. And I ask that my full statement be made part 
of the record. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Your  statement  will  be  made  part  of  the  record, 

and all the statements that the Senators have. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
I  thank  Chairman  Stevens  and  Chairman  Smith  for  holding  a  hearing  today  on 

this important issue of data brokers. 

Since  January,  there  have  been  at  least  32  major  data  security  incidents  poten-
tially affecting 5.2 million Americans. And those are just the data breaches we know 
about due to the disclosure law in the State of California. There are many more that 
have not been made public. 

The  identity  theft  that  results  from  these  data  breaches  can  wreak  havoc  on  the 

lives of consumers—weathly and poor—for many years. 

Recognizing  the  risks  of  computerizing  personal  data,  Congress,  in  1970,  passed 
the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act.  The  FCRA  requires  credit  reporting  agencies  to  pro-
tect consumer information, and use it only for limited purposes. These agencies also 
are responsible for vetting their customers. 

Data brokers are now collecting different sensitive, personal information, yet their 

operations are not governed by any Federal law, and only one State law. 

We will hear today from the largest data brokers about the steps they are taking 
to better secure their data, and to properly vet their customers. We applaud you for 
taking those steps. But I am worried more about the hundreds of smaller data bro-
kers  who  have  no  incentive  to  change  their  ways  since  there  is  no  law  governing 
their behavior. 

Almost  every  American—including  this  Senator—has  their  personal  information 
stored  in  these  databases  whether  we  like  it  or  not.  This  committee  is  responsible 
for  making  sure  that  this  sensitive,  personal  information  is  not  used  for  identity 
fraud  that  can  ruin  any  family’s  financial  future.  We  look  forward  to  our  witnesses 
helping us reach this goal. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator, do you have a statement? 
STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator BILL NELSON. Yes, sir, I do, Mr. Chairman, because one 
of  the  vehicles  in  front  of  the  Committee  is  a  bill  that—two  bills 
that  I  have  filed,  one  with  Senator  Schumer  that’s  more  of  a  com-
prehensive package. 

As  I  have  met  with  identity  victims,  Mr.  Chairman,  one  of  the 
great  parts  of  frustration  for  them  is,  once  their  identity  is  stolen, 
they  don’t  know  where  to  go  to  get  it  back.  They  go  to  local  law 
enforcement;  they  send  them  to  somebody  at  the  State.  The  State 
sends somebody to the Federal. The reason my two bills have been 
referred  here  is  that  my  solution  to  that  is  using  the  FTC  as  the 
repository, first of all, to give them some teeth in the law in which 
to regulate information brokers who heretofore have not been regu-
lated  as  information  brokers,  and,  second,  to  have  a  place  where 
the consumer can go—one place, one-stop shopping—in order to get 
their  identity  back.  And  so,  in  the  legislation,  we  create  the  Office 
of  Identity  Theft  in  our  legislation,  within  the  FTC,  that  creates 
that one-stop shopping. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

And our legislation would mandate that the companies must rea-
sonably  protect  this  consumer  information  that  is  now  collected  on 
billions of bits of information on virtually every one of us in Amer-
ica, and, as a result of what we’ve seen happen thus far, if we don’t 
do  something  about  this,  Mr.  Chairman,  none  of  us  are  going  to 
have  any  identity  left.  It’s  going  to  require  the  companies—these 
are  the  information  brokers—to  notify  consumers  when  a  security 
breach  occurs.  And  the  only  reason  that  we  know  about  this,  Mr. 
Chairman Stevens, is the fact that there is a California State stat-
ute  that  requires  just  that;  otherwise,  we  wouldn’t  have  known 
about  this.  It’s  going  to  tighten  the  commercial  usage  of  Social  Se-
curity  numbers,  and  it’s  going  to  create  an  Assistant  Secretary  of 
Cybersecurity within the Department of Homeland Security. 

And  so,  I’m  really  looking  forward  to  the  discussion  today  about 

these ideas. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lautenberg? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, Mr. Chairman, I ask consent that my 

full statement be included in the record. 

But I do want to say a few things. 
And  before  I  came  here,  I  was  CEO  of  a  company  called  ADP, 
and—I was one of the founders of that company—and we were ter-
ribly  conscious  of  the  records  that  we  had,  because,  through  our 
company,  we  pay  one  out  of  six  workers  in  the  American  private- 
sector labor market. One out of six are paid through the ADP com-
pany.  And  I  thought  our  principal  obligation,  Mr.  Chairman,  was 
the protection of the identity of those people. And there is a treas-
ure  trove  there  that  could  be  sold.  We  refused  to  do  it,  but—that 
wasn’t  our  business,  anyway—but  this  now  has  become  such  a 
problem,  and  I  congratulate  Senator  Nelson  for  his  initiative  here, 
to try and get something done. 

But  when  you  look  at  the  numbers  of  identity—the  people  who 
are affected by identity theft, it’s staggering—2002, 404,000 people 
reported  identify-theft  complaints;  in  2004,  just  2  years  later,  the 
number  climbed  by  more  than  230,000  more  people  who  were  ex-
posed to identity theft. 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  congratulate  you  for  moving  the  agenda 

here on matters of great importance. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for holding this important hearing on the ‘‘data broker-
age’’ industry, and the role and responsibilities of firms that compile, store, and sell 
sensitive, personal information. 

The  recent  security  breaches  at  the  Nation’s  largest  data  brokerage  firms  have 
left millions of Americans increasingly vulnerable to identity theft and scams. Over-
all, some 10 million Americans were victimized by identity thieves last year. 

Mr. Chairman, before I ran for the Senate, I was a Co-Founder and CEO of a com-
pany called ADP, or Automatic Data Processing, which processes payrolls and main-
tains personnel records, and currently pays one out of every six private-sector work-
ers in the United States. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

Throughout  my  years  at  ADP,  we  always  recognized  our  obligation  to  maintain 
the  confidentiality  of  the  information  that  was  entrusted  to  us.  So  I  am  extremely 
concerned  about  the  security  breaches  and  management  failures  that  have  recently 
exposed sensitive, personal information about millions of Americans. 

In  the  wrong  hands,  this  data  about  an  individual  can  be  used  to  ruin  that  per-

son’s credit rating . . . their finances . . . and even their good name. 

In  the  past,  personal  information  on  individuals  was  available,  but  it  was  stored 
in multiple locations and often only on paper. It took significant effort to accumulate 
the information necessary to damage the credit or identity of a person. 

Today,  however,  technology  permits  faster  and  consolidated  access  to  personal 
data  in  fewer  databases.  Collecting  and  selling  personal  information  is  a  big  busi-
ness—but no matter how big it becomes, it must never overshadow the rights of the 
American people. Their privacy should never be compromised or neglected. 

Victims  of  identity  theft  often  spend  years  of  their  precious  time,  and  large 
amounts of their hard-earned money, to repair their financial records and credit his-
tory. In some cases, job opportunities are lost and loans are refused. In 2002, there 
were just under 404,000 reported identity theft complaints nationwide. In 2004, that 
number climbed to 635,000. 

Mr. Chairman, our laws must ensure that companies protect personal information 

with great care. I look forward to hearing from our two panels today. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And,  if  I  may  indulge  the  Committee  just 
one half-minute more, today is the last day for Rudy Brioche, who’s 
been  with  me  for  these  couple  of  years.  Rudy  is  leaving  me  to  go 
work  for  the  FCC.  And  so,  this  is  his  last  hearing,  and  I  want  to 
publicly thank him for his wonderful work for all of us. 

The CHAIRMAN. We wish him well. We’ll keep him busy. 
[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. Let me just say, turning the hearing over to Sen-
ator Smith, I was surprised when my staff presented me the infor-
mation  they  got  from  a  series  of  places.  For  $65,  they  were  told 
they  could  get  my  Social  Security  number.  I  don’t  know  if  you’ve 
done this, but in the report that they got on me, I found my daugh-
ter’s  rental  property  in  California  and  some  of  my  son’s  activities. 
And he’s, unfortunately, a junior out in California. I also found that 
there  are  probably  two  or  three  other  people  in  this  community 
right  here  that  have  the  same  basic  name,  Theodore  F.  Stevens; 
they’re  not  all  the  same  middle  name.  It’s  been  suggested  that  I 
should  change  my  name,  and  use  my  middle  name  now  if  I  want 
to maintain my own identity. 

I  think  this  is  a  very  serious  thing,  and  we  want  to  hear  from 
you  all.  As  I  said,  Senator  Smith,  this  is  just  the  first  of  a  series 
of  hearings.  I  do  think  we’ve  got  several  bills  now  that  have  been 
introduced into Congress to address this, and it’s going to be a very 
difficult thing for us to handle. 

So, we’re not going to handle it on the basis of listening sessions, 
like  this  one,  because  basic  information  is  going  to  come  from  peo-
ple  like  the  witnesses  who  are  where  today.  Again,  I  thank  them 
very much for being willing to join us. 

Senator Smith, it’s your Chair. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  could  I  just  add  one  thing 
to  what  Senator  Stevens  has  said?  This  card  that  each  one  of  us 
has, which is Bank of America, and it is the Senate travel card, the 
records  are  missing  on  60  Senators.  I  am  one  of  them.  Now,  we 
hope  that  this  information  is  not  stolen,  but  the  records  of  over  a 
million  people,  of  which  60  United  States  Senators  are  included 
within  that,  those  records  are  missing.  If  they  are  in  the  wrong 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

hands,  then,  because  they  have  the  information  on  that  card, 
they’ve  got  all  of  our  Social  Security  numbers,  and  they’ve  got  de-
tailed  financial  information.  And  this  is,  increasingly,  what  we’re 
going to be facing. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I’m  embarrassed  to  say,  Senator,  my  staff 

doesn’t trust me with that card. 

[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator? 
Voice: Zero balance. 
[Laughter.] 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  [presiding]  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And 
I  know  you  have  another  responsibility  at  some  point,  and  I’m 
happy to sit in your stead. 

But  I  think  this  is  a  very,  very  important  hearing,  as  all  of  my 
colleagues have indicated, and I read, with horror, that the FTC is 
reporting  that  over  ten  million  Americans  are  victimized  by  iden-
tity thieves every year. These numbers translate into losses of over 
$55  billion  per  year,  averaging  over  $10,000  stolen  per  fraudulent 
incident. In 2005, alone, there were at least 35 known incidents of 
data breaches potentially affecting over five million individuals. My 
State of Oregon ranks ninth in the Nation for fraud complaints and 
identity theft. 

So,  today’s  hearing  will  focus  on  recent  data-broker  services  and 
their relationship to identity-theft enforcement. Although this hear-
ing  will  not  focus  on  any  particular  legislative  proposal,  the  Com-
mittee,  as  the  Chairman  has  noted,  will  hold  subsequent  hearings 
with  the  FTC  to  discuss  legislative  solutions  that  we  need  to  pur-
sue on identify theft. 

At  this  hearing,  the  Committee  will  examine  data-broker  serv-
ices,  the  recent  data  breaches,  and  the  treatment  of  data  brokers 
under  existing  Federal  privacy  laws.  Specifically,  we  will  have  the 
chance  to  better  understand  the  recent  security  breaches  at 
ChoicePoint  and  LexisNexis  and  how  the  information  industry  has 
responded to prevent future breaches. We’ll also explore public and 
private  solutions  to  detect  and  prevent  identity  theft  and  fraud, 
and  ensure  that  personal  information  is  secure  and  protected  from 
those who attempt to perpetrate these crimes. 

Protecting  sensitive  information  is  an  issue  of  great  importance 
for all Americans, and this issue does not register Democrat or Re-
publican.  Consumers  should  have  confidence,  when  they  share 
their  information  with  others,  that  their  information  will  be  pro-
tected. At the same time, the ability of legitimate companies to ac-
cess  personal  information  certainly  does  facilitate  commerce  and 
continues to benefit consumers. Data-broker companies perform im-
portant  commercial  and  public  functions  through  their  ability  to 
quickly and securely access consumer data. 

Now, we look forward to working with all our colleagues in com-
ing up with legislative solutions to this problem. We need to make 
sure  that  this  legislation  strikes  the  right  balance  to  ensure  the 
continued  existence  of  critical  services  while  ensuring  the  security 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

of  personal  information  to  prevent  its  misuse  and  subsequent 
breaches. 

We’ve  been  joined  by  Senator  Vitter  on  this  Committee,  and, 
Senator, if you have an opening statement, we’ll hear from you be-
fore we go to our witnesses. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator  VITTER.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  don’t  have  an  opening  state-
ment.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  for  leading  this  matter.  It’s, 
unfortunately, a very legitimate area of growing concern because of 
these  recent  breaches  and  because  of  the  phenomenon  across  the 
country. So, thank you for your, Senator Stevens, and others’ lead-
ership. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Vitter. 
We  will,  now  hear  first  from  Mr.  Kurt  Sanford,  President  and 
Chief  Executive  Office  of  U.S.  Corporate  and  Federal  Government 
Markets, LexisNexis, from Miamisburg, Ohio. 
Thank you, Mr. Sanford. The mike is yours. 

STATEMENT  OF  KURT  P.  SANFORD,  PRESIDENT/CEO,  U.S. 
CORPORATE  AND  FEDERAL  GOVERNMENT  MARKETS, 
LEXISNEXIS 
Mr.  SANFORD.  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye,  Senator 
Smith,  and  distinguished  members  of  the  Committee,  good  after-
noon. My name is Kurt Sanford. I am the President and Chief Ex-
ecutive  Officer  for  Corporate  and  Federal  Markets  at  LexisNexis. 
I appreciate the opportunity to be here today to discuss the impor-
tant issues surrounding identity theft, fraud, and data security. 

LexisNexis  is  a  leading  provider  of  authoritative  legal  public 
records and business information, playing a vital role in supporting 
government, law enforcement, and business customers who use our 
information  services  for  important  uses,  including  detecting  and 
preventing  identity  theft  and  fraud,  locating  suspects,  and  finding 
missing children. 

One  of  the  important  uses  of  our  products  and  services  provided 
by LexisNexis is to detect and prevent identity theft and fraud. The 
FTC  has  indicated  that  the  total  cost  of  identity  fraud  for  busi-
nesses  and  individuals  is  approximately  $50  billion  per  year.  In 
2004, 9.3 million consumers were victimized by identity fraud. 

Until  recently,  it  was  not  fully  appreciated  that  identity  theft  is 
part of a larger problem of identity fraud. Identity fraud is the use 
of  false  identifiers,  fraudulent  documents,  or  a  stolen  identity  in 
the  commission  of  a  crime.  Both  industry  and  government  have 
asked LexisNexis to develop solutions to help address this evolving 
problem. 

Financial institutions, online retailers, and other businesses have 
turned to LexisNexis to help them detect and prevent identity theft 
and  fraud.  With  the  use  of  LexisNexis,  a  major  bank-card  issuer 
experienced a 77 percent reduction in the dollar losses due to fraud 
associated  with  identity  theft.  Our  products  are  becoming  increas-
ingly  necessary  to  combat  identity  fraud  associated  with  Internet 
transactions,  where  high-dollar  merchandise,  such  as  computers 
and other electronics, are sold via credit card. Lower fraud costs to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

businesses  ultimately  mean  lower  cost  and  greater  efficiencies  for 
consumers. 

While we work hard to provide our customers with effective prod-
ucts,  we  also  recognize  the  importance  of  protecting  the  privacy  of 
the  consumer  information  in  our  databases.  We  have  privacy  poli-
cies,  practices,  and  procedures  in  place  to  protect  this  information. 
Our  Chief  Privacy  Officer  and  Privacy  Policy  Review  Board  work 
together to ensure that LexisNexis has strong policies to help safe-
guard consumer privacy. 

We  also  have  multilayer  security  processes  and  procedures  in 
place  to  protect  our  systems  and  the  information  contained  in  our 
databases.  Maintaining  security  is  not  a  static  process;  it  requires 
continuously  evaluating  and  adjusting  our  security  procedures  to 
address the new threats we face every day. 

Even  with  these  safeguards,  we  discovered,  earlier  this  year, 
some security incidents at our Seisint business, which we acquired 
last  September.  In  February  2005,  a  LexisNexis  integration  team 
became aware of some billing irregularities and unusual usage pat-
terns  with  several  customer  accounts.  Upon  further  investigation, 
we  discovered  that  unauthorized  persons  using  IDs  and  passwords 
of legitimate Seisint customers may have accessed personally iden-
tifying information such as Social security numbers and driver’s li-
cense  numbers.  No  personal  financial,  credit,  or  medical  informa-
tion  was  involved,  since  LexisNexis  and  Seisint  do  not  collect  that 
type of information. In March, we notified approximately 30,000 in-
dividuals  whose  personally  identifying  information  may  have  been 
unlawfully accessed. 

Based  on  these  incidents  at  Seisint,  I  ordered  an  extensive  re-
view  of  data-search  activity  going  back  to  January  2003  at  our 
Seisint  unit  and  across  all  LexisNexis  databases  that  contained 
personally  identifying  information.  We  completed  that  review  on 
April  11th  and  concluded  that  unauthorized  persons,  primarily 
using IDs and passwords of legitimate Seisint customers, may have 
accessed  personally 
information  on  approximately 
280,000  additional  individuals.  At  no  time  was  the  LexisNexis  or 
Seisint technology infrastructure hacked into or penetrated, no cus-
tomer data was accessed or compromised. 

identifying 

We sincerely regret these incidents and any adverse impact they 
may  have  on  the  individuals  whose  information  may  have  been 
accessed.  We  took  quick  action  to  notify  those  individuals.  We  are 
providing all individuals with a consolidated credit report and cred-
it-monitoring services. For those individuals who do become victims 
of  fraud,  we  will  provide  counselors  to  help  them  clear  their  credit 
reports  of  any  information  relating  to  fraudulent  activity.  We  will 
also  provide  them  with  identify-theft  insurance  to  cover  expenses 
associated  with  restoring  their  identity  and  repairing  their  credit 
reports. 

We’ve learned a great deal from the security incidents at Seisint 
and  are  making  substantial  changes  in  our  business  practices  and 
policies across all LexisNexis businesses to help prevent any future 
incidents. I have included the details of these enhancements in my 
written statement. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

I  would  like  to  focus  the  remainder  of  my  time  on  policy  issues 
being considered to further enhance data security, and address the 
growing problem of identity theft and fraud. 

LexisNexis would support the following legislative approaches. 
First, we support requiring notification in the event of a security 
breach  where  there  is  a  significant  risk  of  harm  to  consumers.  In 
addition, we believe that it’s important that any such proposal con-
tain Federal preemption. 

Second,  we  would  support  the  adoption  of  data-security  safe-
guards modeled after the safeguard rules of the Gramm-Leach-Bli-
ley Act. 

Finally,  it’s  important  that  any  legislation  strike  the  right  bal-
ance  between  protecting  privacy  and  ensuring  continued  access  to 
critically important information. 

Thank you, again, for the opportunity to be here today to provide 
the  Committee  with  our  company’s  perspective  on  these  important 
public-policy  issues.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  the  Com-
mittee as it considers these important issues. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Sanford follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KURT P. SANFORD, PRESIDENT/CEO, U.S. CORPORATE AND 

FEDERAL GOVERNMENT MARKETS, LEXISNEXIS 

Introduction 

Good morning. My name is Kurt Sanford. I am the President and Chief Executive 
Officer  for  Corporate  and  Federal  Markets  at  LexisNexis.  I  appreciate  the  oppor-
tunity  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  the  important  issues  surrounding  identity  theft 
and fraud, and data security. 

LexisNexis  is  a  leading  provider  of  authoritative,  legal,  public  records,  and  busi-
ness information. Today, over three million professionals—lawyers, law enforcement 
officials,  government  agencies’  employees,  financial  institution  representatives,  and 
others—use  the  LexisNexis  services.  Government  agencies,  businesses,  researchers, 
and  others  rely  on  information  provided  by  LexisNexis  for  a  variety  of  important 
uses. 

One  of  the  important  uses  of  products  and  services  provided  by  LexisNexis  is  to 
detect and prevent identity theft and fraud. In 2004, 9.3 million consumers were vic-
timized by identity fraud. Credit card companies report $1 billion in losses each year 
from credit card fraud. Although the insidious effects of identity theft are fairly well 
known,  until  recently  it  was  not  fully  appreciated  that  identity  theft  is  part  of  the 
larger  problem  of  identity  fraud.  Identity  fraud,  which  encompasses  identity  theft, 
is  the  use  of  false  identifiers,  false  or  fraudulent  documents,  or  a  stolen  identity  in 
the commission of a crime. It is a component of most major crimes and is felt around 
the  world  today.  As  a  result,  both  industry  and  government  have  asked  LexisNexis 
to develop solutions to help address this evolving problem. 

Financial  institutions,  online  retailers,  and  others  depend  on  products  and  serv-
ices  provided  by  LexisNexis  to  help  prevent  identity  theft  and  fraud.  With  the  use 
of  a  LexisNexis  solution  called  Fraud  Defender,  a  major  bank  card  issuer  experi-
enced a 77 percent reduction in the dollar losses due to fraud associated with iden-
tity theft and credit card origination. 

LexisNexis products are becoming increasingly necessary to combat identity fraud 
associated  with  Internet  transactions  where  high-dollar  merchandise  such  as  com-
puters  and  other  electronic  equipment  are  sold  via  credit  card.  Lower  fraud  costs 
ultimately mean lower costs and greater efficiencies for consumers. 

The  following  are  some  other  examples  of  the  important  ways  in  which  the  serv-

ices of LexisNexis are used by customers: 

Locating and recovering missing children—Customers like the National Center for 
Missing and Exploited Children rely on LexisNexis to help them locate missing and 
abducted  children.  Since  1984,  the  Center  has  assisted  law  enforcement  in  recov-
ering  more  than  85,000  children.  Over  the  past  4  years,  information  provided  by 
LexisNexis  has  been  instrumental  in  a  number  of  the  Center’s  successful  recovery 
efforts. 

Locating  suspects  and  helping  make  arrests—Many  Federal,  State  and  local  law 
enforcement agencies rely on LexisNexis to help them locate criminal suspects, and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

to  identify  witnesses  to  a  crime.  LexisNexis  works  closely  with  Federal,  State,  and 
local law enforcement agencies on a variety of criminal investigations. For example, 
the  Beltway  Sniper  Task  Force  in  Washington,  D.C.,  used  information  provided  by 
LexisNexis  to  help  locate  one  of  the  suspects  wanted  in  connection  with  that  case. 
In another case, information provided by LexisNexis was recently used to locate and 
apprehend  an  individual  who  threatened  a  District  Court  Judge  and  his  family  in 
Louisiana. 

Preventing  money  laundering—LexisNexis  has  partnered  with  the  American 
Bankers Association to develop a tool used by banks and other financial institutions 
to verify the identity of new customers to prevent money laundering and other ille-
gal transactions used to fund criminal and terrorist activities. This tool allows banks 
to meet Patriot Act and safety and soundness regulatory requirements. 

Supporting homeland security efforts—LexisNexis worked with the Department of 
Homeland  Security  Transportation  Safety  Administration  (TSA)  in  developing  the 
Hazardous  Materials  Endorsement  Screening  Gateway  System.  This  system  allows 
TSA to perform background checks on commercial truck drivers who wish to obtain 
an endorsement to transport hazardous materials. 

Locating  parents  delinquent  in  child  support  payments—Both  public  and  private 
agencies  rely  on  LexisNexis  to  locate  parents  who  are  delinquent  in  child  support 
payments and to locate and attach assets in satisfying court-ordered judgments. The 
Association for Children for the Enforcement of Support (ACES), a private child-sup-
port recovery organization, has had tremendous success in locating non-paying par-
ents using LexisNexis. 

These  are  just  a  few  examples  of  how  our  information  products  are  used  to  help 
consumers by detecting and preventing fraud, strengthening law enforcement’s abil-
ity  to  apprehend  criminals,  protecting  homeland  security  and  assisting  in  locating 
missing and abducted children. 
Types of Information Maintained by LexisNexis Risk Solutions 

The  information  maintained  by  LexisNexis  falls  into  the  following  three  general 
classifications:  public  record  information,  publicly  available  information,  and  non- 
public information. 

Public  record  information.  Public  record  information  is  information  originally  ob-
tained from government records that are available to the public. Land records, court 
records, and professional licensing records are examples of public record information 
collected and maintained by the government for public purposes, including dissemi-
nation to the public. 

Publicly  available  information.  Publicly  available  information  is  information  that 
is  available  to  the  general  public  from  non-governmental  sources.  Telephone  direc-
tories are an example of publicly available information. 

Non-public  information.  Non-public  information  is  information  about  an  indi-
vidual that is not obtained directly from public record information or publicly avail-
able  information.  This  information  comes  from  proprietary  or  non-public  sources. 
Non-public  data  maintained  by  LexisNexis  consists  primarily  of  information  ob-
tained  from  either  motor  vehicle  records  or  credit  header  data.  Credit  header  data 
is the non-financial identifying information located at the top of a credit report, such 
as  name,  current  and  prior  address,  listed  telephone  number,  Social  Security  num-
ber, and month and year of birth. 
Privacy 

LexisNexis  is  committed  to  the  responsible  use  of  personal  identifying  informa-
tion.  We  have  privacy  policies  in  place  to  protect  the  consumer  information  in  our 
databases. Our Chief Privacy Officer and Privacy and Policy Review Board work to-
gether to ensure that LexisNexis has strong privacy policies in place to help protect 
the  information  contained  in  our  databases.  We  also  undertake  regular  third-party 
privacy audits to ensure adherence to our privacy policies. 

LexisNexis  has  an  established  Consumer  Access  Program  that  allows  consumers 
to review information on them contained in the LexisNexis system. While the infor-
mation provided to consumers under this program is comprehensive, it does not in-
clude  publicly  available  information  such  as  newspaper  and  magazine  articles,  and 
telephone directories contained in the LexisNexis system. 

LexisNexis  also  has  a  consumer  opt-out  program  that  allows  individuals  to  re-
quest  that  information  about  themselves  be  suppressed  from  selected  databases 
under certain circumstances. To opt-out of LexisNexis databases, an individual must 
provide an explanation of the reason or reasons for the request. Examples of reasons 
include: 

• You  are  a  State,  local  or  Federal  law  enforcement  office  or  public  official  and 

your position exposes you to a threat of death or serious bodily harm; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

• You are a victim of identity theft; or 
• You are at risk of physical harm. 
Supporting  documentation  is  required  to  process  the  opt-out  request.  While  this 
opt-out  policy  applies  to  all  databases  maintained  by  our  recently  acquired  Seisint 
business,  it  is  limited  to  the  non-public  information  databases  in  the  LexisNexis 
service. The policy does not currently apply to public records information databases 
maintained  by  LexisNexis.  We  are  currently  evaluating  what  steps  we  can  take  to 
better  publicize  our  opt-out  program  and  extend  the  program  to  all  public  records 
databases in the LexisNexis service. 
Security 

LexisNexis  has  long  recognized  the  importance  of  protecting  the  information  in 
our databases and has multiple programs in place for verification, authorization and 
IT  security.  Preventive  and  detective  technologies  are  deployed  to  mitigate  risk 
throughout  the  network  and  system  infrastructure  and  serve  to  thwart  potentially 
malicious activities. LexisNexis also has a multi-layer process in place to screen po-
tential  customers  to  ensure  that  only  legitimate  customers  have  access  to  sensitive 
information contained in our systems. Our procedures include a detailed authentica-
tion  process  to  determine  the  validity  of  business  licenses,  memberships  in  profes-
sional societies and other credentials. We also authenticate the documents provided 
to us to ensure they have not been tampered with or forged. 

Only those customers with a permissible purpose under applicable laws are grant-
ed  access  to  sensitive  data  such  as  driver’s  license  information  and  Social  Security 
numbers.  In  addition,  customers  are  required  to  make  express  representations  and 
warranties  regarding  access  and  use  of  sensitive  information  and  we  limit  a  cus-
tomer’s  access  to  information  in  LexisNexis  products  according  to  the  purposes  for 
which they seek to use the information. 

Maintaining  security  is  not  a  static  process—it  requires  continuously  evaluating 
and  adjusting  our  security  processes,  procedures  and  policies.  High-tech  fraudsters 
are getting more sophisticated in the methods they use to access sensitive informa-
tion  in  databases.  We  continuously  adapt  our  security  procedures  to  address  the 
new  threats  we  face  every  day  from  those  who  seek  to  unlawfully  access  our  data-
bases.  We  undertake  regular  third-party  security  audits  to  test  the  security  of  sys-
tems and identify any potential weaknesses. 

Even with the multi-layer safeguards in place at LexisNexis, we discovered earlier 
this  year  that  unauthorized  persons  primarily  using  IDs  and  passwords  of  legiti-
mate customers may have accessed personal identifying information at our recently 
acquired Seisint business. In February 2005, a LexisNexis integration team became 
aware  of  some  billing  irregularities  and  unusual  usage  patterns  with  several  cus-
tomer accounts. At that point we contacted the U.S. Secret Service. The Secret Serv-
ice  initially  asked  us  to  delay  notification  so  they  could  conduct  their  investigation. 
About  a  week  later,  we  publicly  announced  these  incidents  and  within  a  week  sent 
out notices to approximately 30,000 individuals. 

The  investigation  revealed  that  unauthorized  persons,  primarily  using  IDs  and 
passwords of legitimate customers, may have accessed personal-identifying informa-
tion,  such  as  Social  Security  numbers  (SSNs)  and  driver’s  license  numbers  (DLNs). 
In the majority of instances, IDs and passwords were stolen from Seisint customers 
that had legally permissible access to SSNs and DLNs for legitimate purposes, such 
as  verifying  identities  and  preventing  and  detecting  fraud.  No  personal  financial, 
credit, or medical information was involved since LexisNexis and Seisint do not col-
lect  such  information.  At  no  time  was  the  LexisNexis  or  Seisint  technology  infra-
structure hacked into or penetrated nor was any customer data residing within that 
infrastructure accessed or compromised. 

Based  on  the  incidents  at  Seisint,  I  directed  our  teams  to  conduct  an  extensive 
review  of  data-search  activity  at  our  Seisint  unit,  and  across  all  LexisNexis  data-
bases  that  contain  personal  identifying  information.  In  this  review,  we  analyzed 
search  activity  for  the  past  twenty-seven  months  to  determine  if  there  were  any 
other incidents that potentially could have adversely impacted consumers. We com-
pleted that review on April 11, 2005. As a result of this in-depth review, we discov-
ered  additional  incidents  where  there  was  some  possibility  that  unauthorized  per-
sons  may  have  accessed  personal  identifying  information  of  approximately  280,000 
additional individuals. 

We  deeply  regret  these  incidents  and  any  adverse  impact  they  may  have  on  the 
individuals whose information may have been accessed. We took quick action to no-
tify  the  identified  individuals.  We  are  providing  all  individuals  with  a  consolidated 
credit  report  and  credit  monitoring  services.  For  those  individuals  who  do  become 
victims  of  fraud,  we  will  provide  counselors  to  help  them  clear  their  credit  reports 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

of  any  information  relating  to  fraudulent  activity.  We  will  also  provide  them  with 
identity-theft expense insurance coverage up to $20,000 to cover expenses associated 
with restoring their identity and repairing their credit reports. 

We have learned a great deal from the security incidents at Seisint and are mak-
ing  substantial  changes  in  our  business  practices  and  policies  across  all  LexisNexis 
businesses to help prevent any future incidents. These include: 

• Changing  customer  password  security  processes  to  require  that  passwords  for 

both system administrators and users be changed at least every 90 days; 

• Suspending  customer  passwords  of  system  administrators  and  users  that  have 

been inactive for 90 days; 

• Suspending  customer  passwords  after  five  unsuccessful  login  attempts  and  re-
quiring  them  to  contact  Customer  Support  to  ensure  security  and  appropriate 
reactivation; 

• Further  limiting  access  to  the  most  sensitive  data  in  our  databases  by  trun-
cating  SSNs  displayed  in  non-public  documents  and  narrowing  access  to  full 
SSNs and DLNs to law enforcement clients and a restricted group of legally au-
thorized organizations, such as banks and insurance companies; and 

• Educating our customers on ways they can increase their security. 

Laws Governing LexisNexis Compilation and Dissemination of Identifiable 

Information 

There  are  a  wide  range  of  Federal  and  State  privacy  laws  to  which  LexisNexis 
is  subject  in  the  collection  and  distribution  of  personal  identifying  information. 
These include: 

The  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act.  Social  Security  numbers  are  one  of  the  two  most 
sensitive  types  of  information  that  we  maintain  in  our  systems  and  credit  headers 
are the principal commercial source of Social Security numbers. Credit headers con-
tain  the  non-financial  identifying  information  located  at  the  top  of  a  credit  report, 
such  as  name,  current  and  prior  address,  listed  telephone  number,  Social  Security 
number, and month and year of birth. Credit header data is obtained from consumer 
reporting agencies.1 The compilation of credit header data is subject to the Gramm- 
Leach-Bliley  Act  (GLBA),  15  U.S.C.  §§ 6801  et  seq.,  and  information  subject  to  the 
GLBA  cannot  be  distributed  except  for  purposes  specified  by  the  Congress,  such  as 
the prevention of fraud. 

Driver’s Privacy Protection Act. The compilation and distribution of driver’s license 
numbers  and  other  information  obtained  from  driver’s  licenses  are  subject  to  the 
Driver’s  Privacy  Protection  Act  (DPPA),  18  U.S.C.  §§ 2721  et  seq.,  as  well  as  State 
laws.  Information  subject  to  the  DPPA  cannot  be  distributed  except  for  purposes 
specified  by  the  Congress,  such  as  fraud  prevention,  insurance  claim  investigation, 
and the execution of judgments. 

Telecommunications Act of 1996. Telephone directories and similar publicly avail-
able  repositories  are  a  major  source  of  name,  address,  and  telephone  number  infor-
mation.  The  dissemination  of  telephone  directory  and  directory  assistance  informa-
tion  is  subject  to  the  requirements  of  the  Telecommunications  Act  of  1996,  as  well 
as State law. 

FOIA  and  other  Open  Records  Laws:  Records  held  by  local,  State,  and  Federal 
governments are another major source of name, address, and other personally iden-
tifiable  information.  The  Freedom  of  Information  Act,  State  open  record  laws,  and 
judicial  rules  govern  the  ability  of  LexisNexis  to  access  and  distribute  personally 
identifiable  information  obtained  from  government  agencies  and  entities.  See,  e.g., 
5 U.S.C. § 552. 
Other Laws 

Unfair  and  Deceptive  Practice  Laws:  Section  5  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission 
Act,  and  its  State  counterparts,  prohibit  companies  from  making  deceptive  claims 
about  their  privacy  and  security  practices.  These  laws  have  served  as  the  basis  for 
enforcement  actions  by  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  and  state  attorneys  general 
for  inadequate  information  security  practices.  The  consent  orders  settling  these  en-
forcement actions typically have required companies to implement information secu-
rity programs that conform to the standards set forth in the GLBA Safeguards Rule, 
16 C.F.R. Part 314. 

1 Consumer  reporting  agencies  are  governed  by  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  (‘‘FCRA’’),  15 
U.S.C.  §§ 1681  et  seq.  Some  information  services,  such  as  Seisint’s  Securint  service  and 
LexisNexis PeopleWise, also are subject to the requirements of the FCRA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

Information Security Laws: A growing body of State law imposes obligations upon 
information  service  providers  to  safeguard  the  identifiable  information  they  main-
tain.  For  example,  California  has  enacted  two  statutes  that  require  businesses  to 
implement  and  maintain  reasonable  security  practices  and  procedures  and,  in  the 
event  of  a  security  breach,  to  notify  individuals  whose  personal  information  has 
been compromised. See California Civil Code §§ 1798.81.5, 1798.82–84. 
Legislative Measures LexisNexis Supports 

We recognize that additional legislation may be necessary to further enhance data 
security  and  address  the  growing  problem  of  identity  theft  and  fraud.  LexisNexis 
supports the following legislative approaches: 

Data  Security  Breach  Notification.  We  support  requiring  notification  in  the  event 
of a security breach where there is substantial risk of harm to consumers. It is im-
portant  that  there  is  an  appropriate  threshold  for  when  individuals  actually  would 
benefit  from  receiving  notification,  such  as  where  the  breach  is  likely  to  result  in 
misuse of customer information. In addition, we believe that it is important that any 
such  legislation  contain  Federal  preemption  to  insure  that  companies  can  quickly 
and effectively notify individuals and not struggle with complying with multiple, po-
tentially conflicting and inconsistent State laws. 

Adoption  of  Data  Security  Safeguards  for  Information  Service  Providers  Modeled 
After the GLBA Safeguards Rule. LexisNexis supports the adoption of data security 
protections  for  information  service  providers  modeled  after  the  Safeguards  Rule  of 
the GLBA. 

Increased penalties for identity theft and other cybercrimes and increased resources 
for  law  enforcement.  LexisNexis  strongly  encourages  legislation  that  imposes  more 
stringent penalties for identity theft and other cybercrimes. Additionally, consumers 
and  industry  alike  would  benefit  from  enhanced  training  for  law  enforcement  and 
an  expansion  of  the  resources  available  to  investigate  and  prosecute  the  perpetra-
tors of identity theft and cybercrime. Too many of our law enforcement agencies do 
not have the resources to neutralize these high-tech criminals. 

Finally,  LexisNexis  strongly  encourages  that  any  legislation  considered  strike  a 
balance  between  protecting  privacy  and  providing  legitimate  businesses,  organiza-
tions, and government agencies with access to critical information that enables them 
to fulfill their important missions. 

I appreciate the opportunity to be here today to discuss the important issues sur-
rounding identify theft and fraud and data security. I look forward to working with 
the Members of this Committee as you consider these important public policy issues. 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you  very  much.  Our  next  witness  is  Mr. 
Douglas  C.  Curling,  President  and  Chief  Operating  Officer  of 
ChoicePoint, of Alpharetta, Georgia. 

STATEMENT OF DOUGLAS C. CURLING, PRESIDENT/CHIEF 

OPERATING OFFICER, CHOICEPOINT INC. 

you. 

Mr. CURLING. Thank you. 
Chairman Stevens, Chairman Smith—— 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Pull  that  mike  up  toward  you,  please?  Thank 

Mr. CURLING. Certainly. Better? 
Chairman  Stevens,  Chairman  Smith,  Ranking  Member  Inouye 
and  Members  of  the  Committee,  good  morning.  I’m  Doug  Curling, 
President and Chief Operating Officer of ChoicePoint. 

ChoicePoint  has,  on  several  occasions,  provided  Congress  with 
testimony about the recent improper data access and the criminals 
who  perpetrated  this  fraud,  the  steps  we  are  taking  to  protect  af-
fected consumers, and the measures we’re taking to prevent similar 
violations  from  occurring  in  the  future.  I  have  provided  the  Com-
mittee with details of these actions in my written testimony. 

At ChoicePoint, we recognize that in an increasingly risky world, 
information and technology can be used to help create a safer, more 
secure society. At the same time, we know, and have been painfully 
reminded  by  recent  events,  that  there  can  be  negative  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

sequences to the improper access of personally identifiable data. As 
a  result  of  these  experiences,  we’ve  made  fundamental  changes  to 
our  business  model  and  products  to  prevent  this  from  happening 
again  in  the  future.  I  hope  you  see  in  ChoicePoint  a  company  that 
has  listened  to  consumers,  to  privacy  experts,  and  to  government 
officials, and learned from this experience. 

Accordingly,  we’ve  responded  rapidly  and  in  fundamental  ways. 
We’ve  provided  benefits  to  potentially  affected  consumers  that  no 
other information company had done before and several companies 
have  since  emulated,  including  voluntary  nationwide  notification, 
dedicated  call  centers  and  websites,  free  three-bureau  credit  re-
ports,  and  1  year  of  credit  monitoring  at  our  cost.  Once  again,  we 
extend  our  apology  on  behalf  of  our  company  to  those  who  have 
been potentially affected. 

We learned that there are few places for consumers to turn to if 
their  identity  is  stolen.  This,  alone,  increases  the  fear  and  anxiety 
associated  with  identity  theft.  For  this  reason,  we  have  recently 
formed  a  partnership  with  the  Identity  Theft  Resource  Center,  a 
leading  and  well-respected  nonprofit  organization  dedicated  exclu-
sively to assisting identity-theft victims. 

Most  importantly,  we  have  shifted  our  focus  to  ensuring  our 
products  and  services  provide  a  direct  benefit  to  consumers  or  to 
society as a whole. While this has meant exiting an entire market, 
we  decided  that  consumer  interest  must  come  first.  We  have  al-
ready  made  broad  changes  to  our  products,  limiting  access  to  sen-
sitive,  personally  identifiable  information,  and  more  changes  are 
under development. 

Last  year,  we  helped  more  than  100  million  people  obtain  fairly 
priced  home  and  auto  insurance.  More  than  seven  million  Ameri-
cans  get  jobs  through  our  pre-employment  screening  services,  and 
we helped more than one million consumers obtain expedited copies 
of  their  own  vital  records—birth,  death,  and  marriage  certificates. 
These  transactions  were  started  by  consumers,  with  their  permis-
sion, and they provide a clear, direct benefit to them. 

Not  all  of  our  work  is  as  obvious,  but  the  value  is.  At  a  time 
when  the  news  is  filled  with  crimes  committed  against  children, 
we’re  helping  our  Nation’s  religious  institutions  and  youth-serving 
organizations protect those in our society who are least able to pro-
tect  themselves.  Our  products  and  services  have  identified  11,000 
undisclosed felons among those seeking to volunteer with children, 
1,055 with convictions for crimes against children, 42 of which who 
were registered sex offenders. 

Consumers, businesses, and nonprofits are not the only ones that 
rely on ChoicePoint. In fact, government officials have recently tes-
tified  to  Congress  that  they  could  not  fulfill  their  missions  of  pro-
tecting our country and its citizens without the help of ChoicePoint 
and others in our industry. Last month, ChoicePoint supported the 
U.S.  Marshal  Service  in  Operation  Falcon,  which  served  approxi-
mately 10,000 warrants in a single day. 

Mr.  Chairman,  apart  from  what  we  do,  I  also  understand  that 
the  Committee  is  interested  in  how  our  business  is  regulated  by 
Federal  legislation,  as  well  as  various  State  regulations.  Approxi-
mately 60 percent of ChoicePoint’s business is driven by consumer- 
initiated  transactions,  most  of  which  are  regulated  by  the  FCRA. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

These  include  pre-employment  screening,  auto-  and  home-insur-
ance  underwriting  services,  tenant  screening  services,  and  facili-
tating the delivery of vital records directly to consumers. 

Nine  percent  of  ChoicePoint’s  business  is  related  to  marketing 
services, none of which include the distribution of personally identi-
fiable information. Even so, we are regulated by State and Federal 
Do  Not  Mail  and  Do  Not  Call  legislation,  and,  for  some  services, 
the FCRA. 

Five  percent  of  ChoicePoint’s  business  is  related  to  supporting 
law enforcement agencies in pursuit of their investigative missions 
through information and data services. 

Six  percent  of  our  business  supports  law  firms,  financial  institu-
tions,  and  general  business  to  help  mitigate  fraud  through  data 
and authentication services. 

The  final  20  percent  of  our  business  consists  of  software  and 
technology  services  that  do  not  include  the  distribution  of  person-
ally identifiable information. 

Although a majority of our products are already governed by the 
FCRA, we believe additional regulation will give consumers greater 
protections  while  strengthening  our  business  model.  I,  therefore, 
want to conclude by stating for the record ChoicePoint’s position on 
future regulation of our industry. 

We  support  independent  oversight  and  increased  accountability 
for  those  who  handle  personally  identifiable  information,  including 
public  records.  This  oversight  should  extend  to  all  entities,  includ-
ing  public-sector,  academic,  and  other  private-sector  organizations 
that handle such data. 

We support a preemptive national law that would provide for no-
tification  to  consumers,  ensuring  that  the  burden  of  notice  follows 
the responsibility for breach. 

ChoicePoint  supports  providing  consumers  with  the  right  to  ac-
cess and question the accuracy of public-record information used to 
make  decisions  about  them,  consistent  with  the  principles  of  the 
FCRA.  There  are  technical  and  logistical  issues  that  will  need  to 
be solved, but they are solvable. 

We’ve  already  taken  steps  to  restrict  the  display  of  Social  Secu-
rity  and  driver’s  license  numbers,  and  would  support  legislation  to 
restrict  the  display  of  Social  Security  numbers,  modeling  existing 
law, including GLB and FCRA. 

And, finally, we support increased resources for law enforcement 
efforts to combat identity theft, and stronger penalties for the theft 
of personally identifiable information. 

We have all witnessed the significant benefits to society that can 
come  with  the  proper  use  of  information,  but  we’ve  been  reminded 
firsthand  the  damage  that  can  be  caused  when  people  with  ill  in-
tent access sensitive consumer data. 

As  a  company,  we  have  re-dedicated  our  efforts  to  creating  a 
safer, more secure society. We look forward to participating in con-
tinued discussion of these issues. And I would be pleased to answer 
any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Curling follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DOUGLAS C. CURLING, PRESIDENT/CHIEF OPERATING 

OFFICER, CHOICEPOINT INC. 

15 

Chairman Stevens, Ranking Member Inouye and members of the Committee, 
Good  morning,  I  am  Doug  Curling,  President  and  Chief  Operating  Officer  of 
ChoicePoint. I have been with the company since its inception in 1997. ChoicePoint 
has  on  several  occasions  provided  Congress  with  testimony  about  the  recent  im-
proper  data  access  and  the  criminals  who  perpetrated  this  fraud,  the  steps  we  are 
taking  to  protect  affected  consumers,  and  the  measures  that  we  are  taking  to  pre-
vent similar violations from occurring in the future. 

As  you  know,  California  has  been  the  only  State  that  requires  consumers  to  be 
notified of a potential breach of personally identifiable information. We not only fol-
lowed  California  law,  we  built  upon  it  and  voluntarily  notified  consumers  who  may 
have  been  impacted  across  the  country,  and  we  did  that  before  anyone  called  upon 
us  to  do  so.  We’ve  also  taken  other  steps  to  help  assist  and  protect  the  consumers 
who  may  have  been  harmed  in  this  incident—first,  we’ve  arranged  for  a  dedicated 
website  and  toll-free  number  for  affected  consumers  where  they  can  access  addi-
tional information; second, we’re providing, free of charge, a three-bureau credit re-
port;  and  third,  we’re  providing,  free  of  charge,  a  one  year  subscription  to  a  credit 
monitoring service. 

In  addition  to  helping  those  affected  consumers,  we’ve  taken  strong  remedial  ac-

tion and made fundamental changes to our business and products: 

• ChoicePoint  has  decided  to  discontinue  the  sale  of  information  products  that 
contain  personally  identifiable  information  unless  those  products  and  services 
meet one of three tests: 
1.  The  product  supports  consumer  driven  transactions  such  as  insurance,  em-
ployment  and  tenant  screening,  or  provides  consumers  with  access  to  their 
own data; 

2. The product provides authentication or fraud prevention tools to large accred-
ited  corporate  customers  where  consumers  have  existing  relationships.  For 
example,  information  tools  for  identity  verification,  customer  enrollment  and 
insurance claims; or 

3.  When  personally  identifiable  information  is  needed  to  assist  Federal,  State 
or  local  government  and  criminal  justice  agencies  in  their  important  mis-
sions. 

• Additionally,  we’ve  strengthened  ChoicePoint’s  customer  credentialing  process 
and  are  re-credentialing  broad  sections  of  our  customer  base.  Our  new  process 
will require more stringent due diligence such as bank references and site visits 
before allowing businesses access to personally identifiable information. 
• Third,  we’ve  created  an  independent  office  of  Credentialing,  Compliance  and 
Privacy  that  will  ultimately  report  to  our  Board  of  Directors’  Privacy  Com-
mittee.  This  office  is  led  by  Carol  DiBattiste,  the  former  Deputy  Administrator 
of  the  Transportation  Security  Administration,  and  a  former  senior  prosecutor 
in  the  Department  of  Justice  with  extensive  experience  in  the  detection  and 
prosecution of financial fraud. 
• Finally,  we’ve  appointed  Robert  McConnell,  a  28-year  veteran  of  the  Secret 
Service  and  former  chief  of  the  Federal  Government’s  Nigerian  Organized 
Crime  Task  Force,  to  serve  as  our  liaison  to  law  enforcement  officials.  In  this 
role,  he  will  work  aggressively  to  ensure  that  criminal  activities  are  inves-
tigated and prosecuted to the fullest extent possible. He will also help us ensure 
that our security and safeguard procedures continue to evolve and improve. 

Obviously,  our  investigation  as  well  as  those  of  law  enforcement  continues  and  if 
we  identify  additional  instances  of  fraud  related  to  personally  identifiable  informa-
tion we will provide notice. 

At ChoicePoint, we recognize that in an increasingly risky world, information and 
technology can be used to help create a safer, more secure society. At the same time, 
we know, and have been painfully reminded by recent events, that there can be neg-
ative consequences to the improper access to personally identifiable data. As a result 
of  these  experiences,  we’ve  made  fundamental  changes  to  our  business  model  and 
products to prevent this from happening in the future. I hope you see in ChoicePoint 
a  company  that  has  listened—to  consumers,  privacy  experts  and  government  offi-
cials—and  learned  from  this  experience.  Accordingly,  we  have  responded  rapidly 
and in fundamental ways. 

• We have provided benefits to potentially affected consumers that no other infor-
mation  company  had  done  before  and  that  several  companies  have  since  emu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

lated—including  voluntary  nationwide  notification,  dedicated  call  centers  and 
websites,  free  three-bureau  credit  reports  and  one  year  of  credit  monitoring  at 
our  cost.  Once  again,  we  extend  our  apology  on  behalf  of  our  company  to  those 
who have been potentially affected. 
• We  learned  that  there  are  few  places  for  consumers  to  turn  for  help  if  their 
identity  is  stolen.  This  alone  increases  the  fear  and  anxiety  associated  with 
identity theft. For this reason, we have recently formed a partnership with the 
Identity Theft Resource Center—a leading and well respected non-profit organi-
zation dedicated exclusively to assisting identity theft victims. 
• Most importantly, we have shifted our focus to ensuring our products and serv-
ices  provide  a  direct  benefit  to  consumers  or  to  society  as  a  whole.  While  this 
has  meant  exiting  an  entire  market,  we  decided  that  consumer  interests  must 
come  first.  We  have  already  made  broad  changes  to  our  products—limiting  ac-
cess  to  personally  identifiable  information—and  more  changes  are  under  devel-
opment. 

Mr.  Chairman,  before  delving  into  the  specifics  of  various  policy  proposals,  per-
haps  it  would  be  helpful  if  I  gave  Members  of  the  Committee  a  brief  overview  of 
our company, the products we provide and some insight as to how we are currently 
regulated. 

The  majority  of  transactions  our  business  supports  are  initiated  by  consumers. 
Last  year,  we  helped  more  than  100  million  people  obtain  fairly  priced  home  and 
auto  insurance,  more  than  seven  million  Americans  get  jobs  through  our  pre-em-
ployment screening services, and we helped more than one million consumers obtain 
expedited  copies  of  their  family’s  vital  records—birth,  death  and  marriage  certifi-
cates.  These  transactions  were  started  by  consumers  with  their  permission,  and 
they provide a clear, direct benefit to consumers. 

Not  all  of  our  other  work  is  as  obvious—but  the  value  of  it  is.  At  a  time  when 
the  news  is  filled  with  crimes  committed  against  children,  we’re  helping  our  Na-
tion’s  religious  institutions  and  youth-serving  organizations  protect  those  in  our  so-
ciety who are least able to protect themselves. Our products or services have identi-
fied  11,000  undisclosed  felons  among  those  volunteering  or  seeking  to  volunteer 
with children—1,055 with convictions for crimes against children. Forty-two of those 
felons  were  registered  sex  offenders.  In  addition,  using  information  and  tools  sup-
plied by us, the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children has helped re-
turn hundreds of children to their loved ones. 

Consumers,  businesses  and  non-profits  are  not  the  only  ones  that  rely  on 
ChoicePoint.  In  fact,  government  officials  have  recently  testified  to  Congress  that 
they could not fulfill their missions of protecting our country and its citizens without 
the  help  of  ChoicePoint  and  others  in  our  industry.  Last  month,  ChoicePoint  sup-
ported  the  U.S.  Marshals  Service  in  Operation  Falcon,  which  served  approximately 
10,000  warrants  in  a  single  day  for  crimes  ranging  from  murder  to  white-collar 
fraud. 

Mr.  Chairman,  apart  from  what  we  do,  I  also  understand  that  the  Committee  is 
interested in how our business is regulated by Federal legislation, as well as various 
State regulations, including the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA) and the recently 
enacted companion FACT Act, the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLB), and the Driver’s 
Privacy Protection Act (DPPA). 

• Approximately 60 percent of ChoicePoint’s business is driven by consumer initi-
ated transactions, most of which are regulated by the FCRA. These include pre- 
employment  screening,  auto  and  home  insurance  underwriting  services,  tenant 
screening  services,  and  facilitating  the  delivery  of  vital  records  to  consumers. 
• Nine percent of ChoicePoint’s business is related to marketing services, none of 
which  include  the  distribution  of  personally  identifiable  information.  Even  so, 
we are regulated by State and Federal ‘‘Do Not Mail’’ and ‘‘Do Not Call’’ legisla-
tion and, for some services, the FCRA. 
• Five percent of ChoicePoint’s business is related to supporting law enforcement 
agencies in pursuit of their investigative missions through information and data 
services. 
• Six  percent  of  our  business  supports  law  firms,  financial  institutions  and  gen-
eral  business  to  help  mitigate  fraud  through  data  and  authentication  services. 
• The final 20 percent of our business consists of software and technology services 

that do not include the distribution of personally identifiable information. 

Although a majority of our products are already governed by the FCRA and other 
Federal  and  State  legislation,  a  small  percentage  of  our  business  is  not  subject  to 
the  same  level  of  regulation.  We  believe  additional  regulation  will  give  consumers 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

greater  protections  while  strengthening  our  business  model.  I,  therefore,  want  to 
state for the record, ChoicePoint’s positions on future regulation of our industry. 

17 

• We  support  independent  oversight  and  increased  accountability  for  those  who 
handle  personally  identifiable  information,  including  public  records.  This  over-
sight  should  extend  to  all  entities  including  public  sector,  academic  and  other 
private sector organizations that handle such data. 

• We  support  a  preemptive  national  law  that  would  provide  for  notification  to 
consumers,  ensuring  that  the  burden  of  notice  follows  the  responsibility  for 
breach and that consumers do not become de-sensitized to such notices. We also 
support  notification  to  a  single  law  enforcement  point  of  contact  when  person-
ally identifiable information has fallen into inappropriate hands. 

• ChoicePoint supports providing consumers with the right to access and question 
the  accuracy  of  public  record  information  used  to  make  decisions  about  them 
consistent with the principles of FCRA. There are technical and logistical issues 
that will need to be solved, but they are solvable. 

• We have already taken steps to restrict the display of full Social Security num-
bers and would support legislation to restrict the display of full Social Security 
numbers modeling existing law including GLB and FCRA while extending those 
principles to public record information. Providing uniformity as to which portion 
of a Social Security number should be masked would be an important step. 

• Finally,  we  support  increased  resources  for  law  enforcement  efforts  to  combat 
identity  theft  and  stronger  penalties  for  the  theft  of  personally  identifiable  in-
formation. 

We  have  all  witnessed  the  significant  benefits  to  society  that  can  come  with  the 
proper use of information. But we have been reminded, first-hand, the damage that 
can be caused when people with ill intent access sensitive consumer data. 

As  a  company,  we  have  rededicated  our  efforts  to  creating  a  safer,  more  secure 
society. We look forward to participating in continued discussion of these issues and 
would be pleased to answer any questions you might have. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you very much. 
For the benefit of my colleagues, the order is, after my questions, 
Senator  Inouye,  Senator  Nelson,  Senator  Lautenberg,  and  Senator 
Vitter.  We’ve  been  joined  now  by  Senator  Dorgan  and  Senator 
Pryor. If that’s all right with you, gentlemen, we’ll go in that order. 
Mr. Sanford, I think I heard you say that some 300,000 have had 
their  security  breached  within  your  company.  I  guess  my  question 
is,  have  all  these  individuals,  including,  I  believe,  about  9,000  Or-
egonians,  received  a  consolidated  credit  report?  And  are  they  get-
ting any credit-monitoring services from you all? 

Mr. SANFORD. Senator, when we announced the security breaches 
in  March,  we  mailed  notice  to  approximately  30,000  individuals 
within  the  same  week,  modeled  our  notice  after  California  legisla-
tion,  provided  toll-free  numbers  for  them  to  call  to  take  advantage 
of  those  reports.  April  11th,  we  also  made  notice  of  the  additional 
incidents  we  discovered  at  our  Seisint  business.  Again,  within  the 
week, we mailed notices to all 280,000. About 4 percent of the peo-
ple that we’ve mailed notices to have responded. 

Senator SMITH. And can you provide any update as to how many 
of  those  individuals  actually  experienced  theft  as  a  result  of  their 
identities being discovered? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  It’s  a  tricky  question  on  what  is  ‘‘theft,’’  because 
of  different  state  interpretations,  but,  in  terms  of  financial  losses, 
of  the  12,800-or-so  people  who  have  notified  us,  the  process  is  to 
provide them the credit reports and then a monitoring service. And 
if  there  was  any  indication  of  any  fraud  or  financial  losses  that 
may  have  occurred,  we  have  a  set  of  counselors,  professionals,  to 
do  that.  We’ve  referred  about  a  dozen  people  to  those  counselors. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

All  of  those,  except  for  one,  have  been  resolved  to  show  that  there 
was  no  problem.  Sometimes  consumers  just  forget  they  have  a 
credit card. 

Law enforcement has advised us of ten individuals that—in their 
investigation—that there may have been some loss. Seven of those 
were  related  to  people  opening  AOL  accounts  or  making  credit  in-
quiries under somebody else’s identity. Three people may have suf-
fered  some  financial  loss,  although  law  enforcement’s  not  clear 
whether  it’s  related  to  the  breach  in  our  system.  We,  personally, 
contacted, or tried to contact, all ten of those; I think we’ve reached 
eight—personally  tried  to  enroll  them  all  into  our  services;  I  think 
half of them actually took us up on that. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
Mr.  Curling,  I  was  encouraged  to  hear  of  the  technological  sorts 
of  steps  you  have  taken  to  protect  Social  Security  numbers  and 
driver’s  licenses.  Is  that  something  that  has  not  been  available 
until  now?  And  is  that  a  technological  fix  that  you  think  actually 
makes less legislation necessary on our part? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  the  steps  we’ve  taken  are  a  combination  of 
technology  changes  and  product  offerings.  We’ve  completely 
changed  the  types  of  businesses  we  sell  products  to,  and  the  cir-
cumstances  under  which,  even  if  they’re  allowed  to  get  access  to 
that  product  under  the  law,  we  will  choose  to  sell  them  products. 
So, most of the changes we made had to do with withdrawing from 
markets  where  there’s,  in  our  opinion,  difficulty  credentialing  cus-
tomers,  particularly  small  businesses  that,  for  a  company  like 
ChoicePoint,  whose  preponderance  of  revenue  is  in  other  markets 
that are unrelated to these kind of public-record offerings, just isn’t 
in our commercial best interests to pursue. 

We  have,  however,  taken  steps  and  tried  to  change  the  products 
that  we  deliver  to  customers  that  we  continue  to  serve,  restricting 
access  to  Social  Security  numbers  and  driver’s  license  numbers, 
just as a business practice, because we think, given the propensity 
to—of  identity  theft  out  there  now,  it’s  something  everybody  needs 
to step up to and go—we’ve got to find a way to link data correctly 
together  by  limiting  the  display  of  that  Social  Security  number  or 
other personal identifier. 

Senator  SMITH.  Is  it  the  case  that  the  public  is  aware  of  all— 

however many security breaches have occurred at ChoicePoint? 

Mr. CURLING. Well, I don’t—I would presume the public is paying 
attention  to  this  topic,  as  is  everybody  else.  In  the  breaches  that 
we’ve  investigated  and  noticed,  we  indicated  it  was  about  45  to  50 
accounts that had been set up by a group of fraudsters. We noticed 
all  of  those  folks  and  offered  them  the  services  I  provided  in  my 
oral and written testimony. 

Senator SMITH. Isn’t it true that there was a breach 5 years ago 

that just became public? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Yes,  we  became  aware—I,  personally,  became 
aware  very  recently  of  a  breach  that  took  place  in  the  latter  part 
of  2001,  where  we  apparently  got  a  subpoena  in  a  California  sub-
sidiary,  responded  to  that  subpoena,  working  with  law  enforce-
ment, closed an account down, and didn’t hear anything else about 
it  again  until  the  latter  part  of  2004.  Back  then,  going  back  four 
or  5  years,  I  think  that  the  practice  of  many  of  us,  including  our 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

brokers? 

company,  was  to  work  with  law  enforcement  to  investigate  poten-
tial  crimes,  turn  over  information  to  them,  prosecute  the  perpetra-
tors, and law enforcement had the responsibility to notify and com-
municate  with  victims.  Obviously,  since  the  California  notice  law 
has  gone  into  place,  our  practices  have  changed  substantially,  and 
we  now  spend  a  lot  more  time  trying  to  research  all  kinds  of  mat-
ters  to  make  sure  we  can  comply  with  that  law,  and  that  some-
thing  like  that  would  be  communicated  much  more  rapidly  up  the 
organization, going forward. 

Senator  SMITH.  But  when  this  occurred  5  years  ago,  were  steps 

taken then to technologically get in the way of theft? 

Mr.  CURLING.  I  don’t  know,  sir.  I  don’t—I  don’t  believe  that  the 
breach  was  communicated  outside  of  the  local  area  that  was  af-
fected—the local company affected by it. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
Senator Inouye? 
Senator INOUYE. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Sanford,  how  many  companies  can  be  designated  as  data 

Mr. SANFORD. I don’t know the exact number. I would—in our in-
dustry, there are dozens and dozens of businesses. From a competi-
tive intelligence—we tend to focus on about a dozen of them, as pri-
mary  competitors,  but  there  are  many,  many  businesses  in  which 
you could get personally sensitive information on the Internet that 
I  wouldn’t  consider  to  actually  be  in  my  industry,  but  have  access 
to the same information. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  Curling  testified  that  most  of  your  activi-

ties, both of you, are covered by the FCRA provisions. 

Mr. CURLING. Most of ours are, yes, sir. 
Mr. SANFORD. Most of mine are not. 
Senator  INOUYE.  Would  you  be  in  favor  of  having  FCRA  provi-

sions cover all of the activities, Mr. Sanford? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  I  don’t  believe  the  FCRA,  and  the  FACT  Act  that 
reauthorized  it,  is  the  appropriate  framework.  I  mean,  the  FCRA, 
as  I  understand  it,  Senator,  was  intended  to  cover  very  specific 
transactions—the granting of insurance, granting credit. The infor-
mation services that we provide that are not governed by the FCRA 
are  about  identity  authentication,  finding  and  locating  people.  The 
FCRA  has  very  limited  permissive  uses.  And  if  we  were  to  extend 
the  FCRA  to  this  industry,  there  are  at  least  seven  or  eight  major 
applications  for  identity  theft  and  fraud-detection  purposes  that 
would be eliminated. 

Senator INOUYE. Mr. Curling, would you be in favor of FCRA—— 
Mr.  CURLING.  Yes,  sir.  I  think,  in  general,  we’d  be  fine  with  ex-
tending the principles of FCRA to cover these records and products. 
Senator INOUYE. At the present time, if a consumer wants to see 
his  own  file  in  your  company,  Mr.  Sanford,  would  you  let  him  do 
it? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  We  do  have  a  consumer-access  program  in 
LexisNexis,  and  today  a  customer  can  ask  for  access  to  that  infor-
mation.  We  are  not  able  to—if  you  recall,  Senator,  we  have  a— 
news and business information, as well, where we list all of the ar-
ticles  in  the  major  newspapers—we’re  not  able  to—because  we 
don’t have personal identifiers—aren’t able to tell that John Smith, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

who’s  asking  for  information,  whether  or  not  that’s  the  same  John 
Smith that’s—appears in all of the different news articles or in the 
white pages, other public information. But we certainly would pro-
vide access to the information in our public/non-public-record data-
bases. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Can  a  consumer  have  that  right  in  your  com-

pany, Mr. Curling? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Yes,  sir,  they  do.  We  don’t  maintain  dossiers  on 
consumers,  but  we  have  information  products  that  have  this  con-
sumer  data,  and  those  products  are  available  for  consumers  from 
a  single  point  of  entry,  either  via  a  website  we  maintain  or  a  1– 
800 number. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Now,  if  that  consumer  finds  that  there’s  some 
incorrect  information,  is  he  provided  the  opportunity  to  correct  it? 
Mr. SANFORD. We have a small part of our business which is gov-
erned  by  the  FCRA  and  there  are  provisions  that  indicate  exactly 
how  those  corrections  happen.  For  the  part  that’s  not  part  of  the 
FCRA,  our  practice  is,  if  the  error  in  the  information  is  related  to 
the way in which we keyed the data or the way in which we stored 
the  data  in  the  database,  we  make  the  correction.  If  it’s  an  error 
that  the  individual  is  claiming  is  in  the  public  record,  the  way  in 
which  a  mortgage  record  or  tax  lien  is  recorded  in  a  county  court-
house,  we  then  point  the  individual  to  the  county  courthouse,  be-
cause  we  don’t  have  authority  to  change  a  public  record,  and  we 
can’t have a database where our version of the public record is dif-
ferent than what’s available in the public record. 

Senator INOUYE. What’s the situation in your company, sir? 
Mr.  CURLING.  The  majority  of  our  products  are  regulated  by  the 
FCRA, and, as a result, there’s a defined process for consumers to, 
you know, note the dispute and for us to help them go through and 
navigate  that  correction.  For  the  public-record  products  that  we 
have,  our  present  policy  is  similar  to  that  of  my  colleague  here, 
LexisNexis,  although  there  are  some  things  that,  if  we  extend  the 
practices we talked about earlier in this hearing to, we could poten-
tially  help  consumers  not  only  know  which  courthouse  that  record 
came  from  and  how  it  was  sourced,  but  we’re  also  looking  at  ways 
to  put  disputes  on  the  file  much  like  the  FCRA  provides.  So,  even 
though it’s a correction we cannot make legally on their behalf, we 
can  note  the  dispute  in  future  searches  that  we  would  serve  up  to 
our customers. 

Senator INOUYE. Now, if I wanted to buy information from either 

one of your companies, would you permit me? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  We  have  a  new-customer  authentication 
verification  procedure,  Senator,  that  you  would  go  through,  like 
any  other  customer,  and,  depending  upon  the  documentation  and 
records  that  you  provided,  depending  upon  the  uses  that  you 
claimed in our investigation, you would be able to get access to cer-
tain  types  of  databases.  It  might  be  our  legal  news  and  business 
information  databases.  It  might  be  public  records.  It  would  un-
likely,  as  a—in  your  current  role,  it  would  be  unlikely  to  qualify 
you for access to a nonpublic-record information. 

Senator INOUYE. Can I just buy information on a specific person? 
Mr.  SANFORD.  Again,  if  you  didn’t  qualify  for  permissive  pur-

poses, you wouldn’t have access to that information. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

Senator INOUYE. What is the policy in your company, Mr.—— 
Mr.  CURLING.  You  could  not  buy  sensitive,  personal  identifiable 
information  from  ChoicePoint  under  our  customer  credentialing 
procedures.  There  are  some  information  products  you  could  buy. 
You  can  buy  records—professional  license  records  on  your  doctor 
and  healthcare  providers.  You  can  buy  your  own  vital  records  on 
behalf  of  your  family.  You  can  buy  basic  public  records  like  real- 
estate  records  and  directory  searches,  et  cetera.  But  you  wouldn’t 
be able to gain—to set up an account to gain access to any products 
that contained sensitive, personal identifiable information. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Inouye. 
Senator Nelson? 
Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Sanford,  does  your  company  compile,  store,  and  sell  this  in-
formation  only,  or  does  it  also  provide  analysis  of  this  information 
to your customers? 

Mr. SANFORD. We compile data, and we have data analytics that 
link  data.  And  then  when  a  customer  does  a  query,  we,  hopefully, 
give them the answer back which is the most correct answer avail-
able  on  the  analysis.  But  you’d  have  to  perhaps  give  me  an  exam-
ple,  Senator,  of  what  you  mean,  ‘‘beyond  the  analysis,’’  so  I  make 
sure I’m responding to your question. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Well, what kind of analysis would you pro-

vide, for example, to law enforcement? 

Mr. SANFORD. Law enforcement can do a specific query. If they’re 
looking  for  a  particular  individual,  they  could  do  a  query  on  that, 
and  they  might  say,  ‘‘I’m  looking  for  John  Smith,  who  has  the  fol-
lowing  type  of  vehicle,  whose  last  known  address  was  the  fol-
lowing,’’  and  they  could  do  a  query,  and  we  could  then  provide  in-
formation of other known addresses for that same individual, or as-
sociates of that particular individual. 

Senator BILL NELSON. So, there is some analysis—instead of just 
giving  them  information,  you  would  compile  material,  and  there 
would be some analysis of this information. 

Mr. SANFORD. In that way that you defined it, yes, Senator. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Other  than  law  enforcement,  who  else 
would you provide analysis to? Give me an example, as a customer. 
Mr.  SANFORD.  Financial  institutions  might  want  to  be  ensuring, 
or a bank, when they’re opening an account, that the person who’s 
there  to  open  the  account  is  who  they  purport  to  be.  They  might 
want  to  use  an  ID  product  that  would  allow  them  to  ask  the  indi-
vidual some qualifying questions to make sure they really are who 
they purport to be. Again, they would then be able to access to the 
broader  databases  to  see  unrelated  information  that  might  be  in 
different repositories. 

Senator BILL NELSON. In following up to Senator Inouye, I think 
it’s absolutely critical, for the protection of the consumer, that they 
have access to this data, so that if, in fact, it’s wrong, they can cor-
rect  it.  And  I,  further,  think  that  it’s  essential  that  the  consumer 
should have access to the information of who is collecting that data, 
other than someone like a client of yours such as law enforcement. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

So, would you, for the record, state again what is the position of 
your company with regard to providing the consumer with informa-
tion that is contained within your records? 

Mr. SANFORD. If the question, Senator, is about—if I collected the 
information, should I provide notice to the consumer about its pur-
poses  and  uses—I  want  to  make  sure  you  understand  this—we 
don’t  collect  that  kind  of  information,  I  would  have  to  say.  I’m  not 
really  clear  on  whether  there  should  be  legislation  on  that.  If  the 
question  is—once  I  collect  information  from  public  and  nonpublic 
sources—I have white-page phone information, I have public-record 
documents—I would not be supportive of sending a notice to a con-
sumer each and every time a query might have gone on a database 
that  touched  their  name.  We’d  be  talking  about  sending  millions 
and millions of notices—— 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  No,  that’s  not  the  question.  The  question 
is, If the consumer asks you for access to see what kind of informa-
tion is being contained on that consumer—— 

Mr.  SANFORD.  I’m  sorry,  Senator,  I  misunderstood.  I  thought 
there were two questions. I thought—one was access, and I thought 
I had previously indicated I was supportive of that—and I thought 
the second part was, Should I send them a notice—— 
Senator BILL NELSON. No, I didn’t ask about notice. 
Mr. SANFORD. I misunderstood. 
Senator BILL NELSON. No. Notice is already what you’re required 
to  do  in  the  State  of  California,  which  is—and  that’s  something 
that  I  think  this  committee  will  be  examining—once  that  informa-
tion  is  breached  and  it  has  been  withdrawn  from  the  possession 
that you have, then, under California law, you’re required to notify. 
What  we’re  going  to  consider  is  that—should  that  be  nationally, 
other than just the State? 

So,  your  testimony  is  that,  with  regard  to  giving  the  consumer 
access to the information that you contain, that you would be will-
ing to do that. 

Mr. SANFORD. We do that today in our LexisNexis business. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Well, then that’s very helpful. 
Now, tell us something about what is the procedure for becoming 
a LexisNexis client. When somebody becomes a client, does the cli-
ent  have  access  to  all  of  LexisNexis’s  databases,  for  any  purpose? 
For example, if an attorney became your client to help locate a wit-
ness,  can  that  attorney  also  use  your  database  for  personal  and 
other reasons? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  The  customers  go  through  an  authentication  and 
credentialing  process—applications,  records.  We  do  searches  on 
various databases to verify their identity. Part of the application is, 
they  have  to  indicate  the  permissive  uses  if  they  want  to  access 
personally  identifying  information  and  nonpublic  record  databases. 
Generally, lawyers do not qualify for access to that information. We 
call that, in our business, 5A access. 

Senator BILL NELSON. So, they have to qualify in order to be able 

to use the other parts of the database. 

Mr. SANFORD. We have case law. We have news and business ar-
ticles.  This  is  not  the  kind  of  thing  that  goes  through  a  special 
credentialing  process.  But  access  to,  say,  driver’s  license  number 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

data  or  credit  header  information,  nonpublic  information,  there’s  a 
special credentialing process. 

Senator BILL NELSON. How do you monitor that? 
Mr.  SANFORD.  Customers  in  each  and  every  search  session  have 
to indicate what their permissive use is. We do have detection soft-
ware.  Under  DPPA,  I  believe,  each  time  you  use  a  search  where 
you  access  a  driver’s  license,  you  make  a  statement  subject  to 
criminal  sanctions.  It’s  against  the  law  to  have  an  impermissive 
use under DPPA. 

We’ve instituted some recent procedures to do recredentialing, on 
a  periodic  basis,  for  customers  when  contracts  are  up  for  renewal. 
We’re  enhancing  procedures  all  the  time.  We’re  looking  at  having 
systems  administrators  recertify  on  a  monthly  basis,  or  a  60-day 
basis.  We’re  working  with  our  customers  to  figure  out  how  we  do 
that.  Because  we  are  in  a  mobile  society,  and  people  do  have  em-
ployees  that  come  and  go  from  their  business,  we  want  to  make 
sure that the people who have the passwords and IDs are still, you 
know, legitimate users in those businesses. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Mr. Chairman, I see my time is up. I will 

have some more questions in the next round. 
Senator SMITH. We’ll have another round. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you. 
Senator SMITH. Senator Lautenberg? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Just  curious  about  the  material  that’s  accessible  when  someone 
becomes a client of your firm, either one of you. Now, if—are most 
of  these  people  likely  to  be  looking  for  lists  for  mailing  solicita-
tions? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  In  LexisNexis,  we  don’t  have  a  marketing  busi-
ness,  except  for  a—there’s  a  very,  very  small  business  that  helps 
people  in  bankruptcy,  doesn’t  have  personally  identifying  informa-
tion or driver’s license numbers. But 99 percent of what we do has 
nothing to do with marketing. We don’t have financial—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How about ChoicePoint? 
Mr. CURLING. We have a collection of businesses, one of which is 
purely  direct  marketing,  but  those—all  of  our  customers  are 
credentialed  and  have  access  to  separate  product  platforms.  There 
is no common ChoicePoint access or single database with all the in-
formation in it. The information is kept separate by product. So, for 
example,  in  direct  marketing,  the  customers  would  have  access  to 
no sensitive, personal identifiable information. As I indicated in my 
testimony, it’s about 9 percent of ChoicePoint’s revenue. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes,  so  if  someone  was  a  United  States 
Senator, and they wanted to compile a mailing list for campaign so-
licitation, could they have that list, sorted out by—a list sorted out 
by income levels? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  that’s  not  a  market  we  serve,  so  I  can’t  an-
swer  that,  but  if  it  was  in  a  market  that  I  do  serve—well,  we’re 
principally  serving  financial  institutions  and  insurance  companies. 
The  preponderance  of  our  revenue  is  in  the  insurance  market.  So, 
for  insurance  companies  what  they’re  typically  trying  to  do  is  look 
at  the  people  they  have  insured  today  for  auto  and  home  policies 
and try and find more—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So it would have to be specific—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

Mr.  CURLING.  Typically,  they’re  going  after  a  particular  product. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And  when  they  sign  up  for  your  services, 
do they have to identify those lists that—or the area of listing that 
they might want to access? 

Mr. CURLING. Yes. As a part of our credentialing—in marketing, 
as a part of that process, we would understand what products they 
wanted to buy—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So, they’re limited. They can’t—— 
Mr. CURLING. They’re completely separate from other products. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  What—when  people  have—are  expected— 
or  suspected  to  be  a  substantial  risk  for  identity  and  fraud,  is  it 
in  the  consumer’s  best  interest  for  the  company  to  make  that  call 
or to inform consumers when there’s any breach at all? How do you 
anticipate that someone might be an easy target for identity theft? 
Do you? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  Well,  it’s  very  much  the  process  we  went  through 
beginning in February. We have a chief security officer in the busi-
ness. We investigate security issues. No company is immune to the 
constant attempts at hacking and penetration of their services. And 
what  we  did  in  our  situation  was,  we  looked  at  security  breaches 
where  a  customer  had  said,  ‘‘This  is  not  my  billing  activity.’’  And 
when  we  could  see  that  that  was  an  employee  who  left  the  com-
pany,  who  went  across  the  street,  say,  figuratively,  to  work  at  the 
collection  company  across  the  street,  and  continued  to  conduct 
searches  in  the  normal  course  of  their  business,  that  doesn’t 
present  a  risk  of  harm  to  the  consumer.  When  a  employee  in  a 
business is searching celebrities on a database, that doesn’t suggest 
a risk of harm to consumers. 

And  so,  what  we  looked  for  was  anything  in  a  search  that  we 
couldn’t  authenticate,  where  there  was  some  suggestion  of  risk  of 
harm  to  a  consumer.  So,  for  example  if  the  IP  address  of  where 
that  search  emanated  from  came  from  a  foreign  country,  and  this 
was  a  domestic  business,  that  was  suggestive  of  a  problem,  given 
the  body  of  literature  on  this  issue.  If  people  were  using 
anonymiers,  or  if  there  was  a  virus  or  spyware  inside  of  a  cus-
tomer’s  environment,  we  said  there’s  some  risk  of  harm.  And  the 
real  challenge,  Senator,  is  this  trigger—is,  When  do  you  make  no-
tice? Because if there’s any risk of harm, or no risk of harm, I think 
you do run the risk of this over-notification. 

This is a very serious matter. But the facts, so far in our notices, 
have  indicated,  you  know,  next  to  no  financial  harm,  at  least,  for 
those individuals. It’s very discomfiting to them, it’s a very serious 
matter,  but  I  think  we  do  have  to  wrestle  with,  What  is  it  that’s 
going  to  trigger  notice?  Because  the  intent  of  notice,  I  hope,  is  to 
help someone protect themselves, not to make them immune to the 
notices  they  get  so  they  don’t  protect  themselves  that  one  time 
when they should. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  If  someone—if  a  company  is  interested  in 
debt  collection,  is  that  information  fairly  discernible  in  any  of  the 
groups that you have? 

Mr. SANFORD. Debt collectors, credit departments, financial insti-
tutions, and collection organizations are a part of our business, and 
what  they’re  looking  for  is  authentication  and  location  of  the  indi-
vidual; so they may collect the debt from the correct person. Again, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

there  are  many,  many  John  Smiths,  and  they’re  trying  to  find  out 
which John Smith is the right John Smith for this particular debt. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Lautenberg. 
Senator Dorgan? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you.  And  thanks  to  the 

This is a complicated set of issues for those of us who don’t work 
in the business. And my understanding is that there is no Federal 
law prohibiting the use and sale of Social Security numbers. Would 
that be correct? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  I  think  there  are  a  number  of  laws.  The  most— 
GLBA  would  be  most  applicable,  where  it  talks  about  the  use 
of—— 

Senator DORGAN. GLBA? 
Mr. SANFORD. Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act. 
Senator DORGAN. OK. 
Mr.  SANFORD.  Excuse  me,  Senator—where  it  talks  about  our 
business, for example, as a recipient of information from a financial 
institution.  Our  use  of  that  credit-header  information,  which  in-
cludes the Social Security number, is restricted. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Do  both  of  you  do  business  in  Europe  and  the 

United States? 

witnesses. 

Mr. SANFORD. Yes. 
Senator DORGAN. And can we go—— 
Mr.  CURLING.  We  do,  principally,  business  in  the  United  States. 
Senator DORGAN. Do you do business in Europe? 
Mr. CURLING. We do very, very small amounts of business in Eu-
rope,  there  are  a  few  financial  institutions  that  buy  data  for  cus-
tomer  enrollment  purposes,  Patriot  Act  compliance,  but  very  little; 
99-plus percent of our revenue is domestic. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Sanford,  can  you  describe  for  us  the  dif-
ference  that  exists  with  respect  to  the  European  approach  pro-
tecting confidentiality, versus the U.S. approach at this point, given 
current law? 

Mr. SANFORD. I’m not an expert on the European privacy issues. 
I  can  speak  to  the  U.S.  I’d  be  happy  to  give  you  the  information. 
Our business in Europe is principally a legal news and business in-
formation  service,  as  it  is  in  Asia,  Pacific,  and  Latin  America.  Our 
risk-management business focusing on public records is principally 
a U.S. business. 

Senator DORGAN. But if you—because you do business in Europe, 
you  are  required  to  comply  with  the—I  believe  it’s  called  the  Data 
Protection Directive in Europe? 

Mr.  CURLING.  We  don’t  collect  public-record  information  or  data 

from—on European citizens. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  the  reason  I  was  asking  that—I  was 
going  to  ask  you  your  assessment  of  the  approach  the  Europeans 
take,  versus  the  approach  that  we  take,  under  present  law.  And 
that, I think, goes to the heart of what we might ought to consider. 
Should we consider doing something that is much more restrictive, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

much  more  protective?  And  I  believe  that  the  Europeans  do  that. 
As  I  understand  it,  they  require  companies  to  provide  consumers 
with notice, the ability to opt out with respect to nonsensitive com-
mercial  marketing  of  personal  information,  opt  in  with  respect  to 
sensitive,  personal  information,  the  right  of  access  to  personal  in-
formation collected, reasonable security protections for the informa-
tion,  and  so  on,  which  I  think  is  different  than  now  exists  in  this 
country. Is that right? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  I  think  some  of  them  are  the  same,  and  some  of 
them  are  different.  It  depends,  again,  if  we’re  talking  about  FCRA 
applications, where I think you’d see opt-in—or, excuse me, opt-out, 
you would see notice and correction. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Tell  me  about,  if  you  would—I  expect  neither 
of  your  companies  are  involved  in  this,  but  I  think  my  colleague, 
Senator  Inouye,  was  getting  to  it—if  you,  Mr.  Sanford,  go  to  the 
Internet  today  and  decide  you  want  to  know  about  Senator  Bill 
Nelson—you  want  to  learn  about  him,  you  want  to  know  every-
thing  there  is  to  know  about  him,  you  want—you’d  like  to  get  his 
Social  Security  number,  you  want  to  find  out  about  his  driving 
record,  you  want  to  know  everything  about  him.  And  my  guess  is 
there  are  many  options  for  you  on  the  Internet  to  pay  $100,  $50, 
or  $150  to  gather  information  about  Senator  Nelson.  Is  that  cor-
rect? 

Mr. SANFORD. I believe there are. 
Senator DORGAN. And what kinds of companies are they that, on 
the  Internet,  are  marketing  that  information?  Do  you  know?  It’s 
obviously—— 

Mr.  SANFORD.  Yes,  I  wouldn’t  want  to  speculate  as  to  the  busi-

ness purposes. You wouldn’t be able to do that on our service. 

Senator DORGAN. I understand that. 
Mr. SANFORD. You’d be able to access news articles and public in-
formation  that  might  be  otherwise  in  a  blog  or,  you  know,  in  a 
Google-type search. 

Senator DORGAN. I understand that. And I’m not making a com-
parison that either of you are involved in that. I’m just saying that 
that’s  another  type  of  data  collection.  Somebody  is  collecting  infor-
mation  about  Senator  Nelson,  and,  for  $150  or  so,  we  can  go  find 
out what information they’ve collected, which I assume would prob-
ably almost always include his Social Security number and a whole 
range  of  issues  relating  to  his  life.  And  that  is  also  part  of  this 
data-collection  industry,  albeit  smaller  companies,  likely,  compa-
nies  that  aren’t  operating  within  the  guidelines  that  you  operate 
within.  But  as  we  consider  all  of  these  issues,  you,  of  course,  will 
always  have  to  bear  the  burden  of  others  in  this  industry  that  are 
marketing  information  in  different  ways.  How  do  you  feel  about 
that? 

Mr. SANFORD. We have policies and practices which are more re-
strictive than some of the existing laws. I would certainly welcome 
enforcement of existing laws on my competitors. It is a competitive 
disadvantage  for  us,  where  we  comply  with  laws,  but  people  find 
ways to gain access to information that they shouldn’t. 

Senator DORGAN. Is Social Security the critical identifier with re-

spect to personal information? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

Mr. SANFORD. The Social Security number would probably be the 
most commonly agreed item. California statute also suggested driv-
er’s  license  numbers.  If  you  think  about  identity  theft  and  getting 
a  photo  ID  with  a  driver’s  license  number,  I  would  include  that  as 
a sensitive piece of data, as well. 

Senator DORGAN. Is identity theft a crisis or a very serious prob-

lem in this country, or is it overblown, in your judgment? 

Mr. SANFORD. I think it’s a very serious problem, but I think it’s 
been a very serious problem for a long, long, long time. I’ve learned 
quite  a  bit  from  the  research  and—I  mean,  identity  thefts’s  been 
going  on,  and  fraud  associated  with  identity  theft’s  been  going  on 
for  decades  and  decades.  Technology,  while  it’s  very  powerful,  has 
facilitated  it  more  recently.  And  that’s—you  know,  again,  without 
downplaying the seriousness of us having very strong security safe-
guards,  the  reality  is—is  that  the  bad  guys  now  have  technology 
tools  available  to  them  to  go  out  and  commit  all  kinds  of  fraud. 
And part of the solution has to be to create tools to stop them. Re-
stricting  access  to  data  is  certainly,  in  some  people’s  minds,  a  way 
to  do  that.  I  think  if  the  restriction  goes  too  far,  we  will,  in  fact, 
enable the bad guys to do even more than they’re doing now. 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, first of all, I think it’s a service 
for  you  to  hold  this  hearing.  And  I  know  the  work  that  Senator 
Nelson has done, and others, is very important. You know, I think, 
frankly,  most  people  would  be  aghast—most  of  our  citizens  would 
be  aghast  at  the  information  that’s  being  collected  with  respect  to 
their personal lives. And I think, as we dig into this issue and mine 
this issue a bit to understand it better, we have a lot of interesting 
choices  to  make  about  how  to  protect  American  citizens  with  re-
spect  to  the  gathering  of  their  personal  information  by  other  com-
panies. 

Senator SMITH. I think you’re right, Senator. Thank you. 
Next,  Senator  Pryor.  And  we  have  been  joined  by  Senator  Nel-
son—we’ll go to your questions after that, Senator Ben Nelson. And 
then back to Senator Bill Nelson for round two. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Let  me  ask  both  of  you  a  question,  because,  as  I  understand, 
what  we’re  talking  about  here  today  is,  the  two  entities  you  rep-
resent have very different business models, right? You all have dif-
ferent business models from one another. And they’re—and I think 
what it shows is, there’s kind of a diversity within the information- 
providers sector of our economy, if you will. What implications does 
the fact that you all have different business models—what implica-
tions  does  that  have  on  possible  legislation?  In  other  words,  when 
I see something like what you’re talking about today, I’m concerned 
that  a  one-size-fits-all  solution  probably  won’t  work.  So,  could  you 
discuss  a  little  bit,  if  you  can  do  it  fairly  briefly,  about,  you  know, 
how  you’re  different  and  how  you  think  we  need  to—as  we  look  at 
legislation, how we should be careful to craft that to meet those dif-
ferences? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  Well,  we’re  both  alike,  to  the  extent  that  if  we 
have  an  FCRA  solution,  we’re  governed  by  the  FCRA  and  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

FACT Act. We’re both alike to the extent that if we’re dealing with 
information  from  financial  institutions,  we’re  governed  by  the  pri-
vacy provisions of the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act. We’re different in 
our  product  mix.  And  that’s  our  distinction.  Now,  our  business 
practices  may  be  different,  and  our  policies,  but,  from  a  legislative 
standpoint,  we  are  covered  by  the  same  laws;  we  just  happen  to 
have different concentrations. 

Senator PRYOR. Do you agree with that, Mr. Curling? 
Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  I  think,  generally,  that’s  probably  an  accu-
rate  characterization.  I  mean,  we—our  product  mix  is  principally 
consumer-driven  transactions  that  are  regulated  by  FCRA  or  soft-
ware  and  services.  So,  the  segment  of  public-record  sales  that  are 
non-FCRA, that are nongovernmental, it’s a very small business for 
ChoicePoint.  I  think  that  the—some  of  the  legislative  proposals 
that have been put forth do deal with things, though, that all busi-
nesses and all enterprises should agree on. I think that, you know, 
identity  theft  is  a  crime  that  doesn’t  stay  inside  state  borders.  I 
think  it’s  a  crime  that  doesn’t  contain  itself  to  a  particular  indus-
try.  You  know,  the  breaches  that  were  mentioned  by  the  Com-
mittee  members  earlier  in  the  meeting  happened  to  universities, 
nonprofits,  government  agencies,  commercial  enterprises.  So,  I 
think  that  some  of  the  topics  under  discussion,  you  know,  notice, 
you know, how we’re going to help affect the consumers. The things 
that we all need to do to try and provide more support for law en-
forcement  to  drive  fraud  and  identity  theft  out  of  our  society  are 
things  we  all  agree  on,  regardless  of  the  industry  we’re  in.  And  I 
think  there  is  legislation  there  that  everyone  would  agree  on,  and 
it would fit under one tent. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Let  me  follow  up  on  that,  if  I  can,  Mr.  Curling, 
because  there  has  been  security  breaches  that  have  happened  in  a 
wide  variety  of  companies  and,  as  you  said,  some  nonprofits, 
some—even  some  government  entities.  Should  a  security  safe-
guards  rule  be  applied  only  to  information—only  to  information- 
service  providers,  or  should  it  be  broader  than  that  and  cover  all 
businesses and even nonprofits and government agencies? 

Mr.  CURLING.  We  believe  that  consumers’  interests  are  going  to 
be best protected when, you know, it applies to all entities, regard-
less  of  the  type  of  organization  or  structure  of  that  company.  As  I 
indicated, you know, if you collect, assemble, maintain, transfer, or 
manage  sensitive  data,  a  breach  is  a  breach,  and,  whether  that 
took  place  in  a  commercial  enterprise  or  a  nonprofit  organization, 
consumers need to be noticed. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Sanford, you said, in your written testimony, 
that  you  acknowledge  that  maintaining  security  is  not  a  static 
process. In other words, you have to continually evaluate new or— 
new  types  of  security  breaches.  And,  obviously,  I  know  you  have 
your  hands  full  there.  Do  you  think  it  is  possible  for  a  small  com-
pany  data-broker  to  maintain  database  security  as  diligently  as 
they need to in order to prevent identity theft? It seems to me they 
might be at a disadvantage. 

Mr.  SANFORD.  There  are  certainly  high  fixed  costs  for  security.  I 
mean,  having  credentialing  programs,  having  detection  software, 
monitoring,  having  resources  to  investigate  certainly  would  be  a 
disadvantage to a small business. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

Senator  PRYOR.  What  about  third-party  security  audits?  Do  you 

use those in your company, right? 
Mr. SANFORD. We do use them. 
Senator PRYOR. And has that been a successful approach for you? 
Mr. SANFORD. The third-party tends to be objective, has no loyal-
ties, points it out to you, makes suggestions on things that are now 
available in the industry, state-of-the-art technology, different prac-
tices and procedures. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Do  you  know  how  widespread  third-party  secu-
rity  audits  are  in  the  industry?  I  mean,  do  the  smaller  companies 
use them? Do we know? 

Mr. SANFORD. I don’t know, Senator. 
Senator PRYOR. OK. Well, it looks like I’m just about out of time, 

so let me ask my last question here. 

Do  you  think  that  a  consumer  should  have  the  ability  to  see  his 

own file with your company? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  In  our  non-FCRA  businesses,  we  don’t  maintain 
consumer  files  or  consumer  reports,  but  we  do  have  the  ability  for 
them to get access to the information, running a search to see what 
information’s there. 

Senator PRYOR. Is that available to them now? 
Mr. SANFORD. Yes. 
Senator PRYOR. And is that free? 
Mr.  SANFORD.  No.  There’s  a  fee  for  that.  I’ve  asked  the  team  to 
look  at,  you  know,  what  that  fee  should  be.  Unlike  a—in  a  credit 
transaction, where data is pushed to you to assemble credit reports, 
we  incur  extraordinary  cost  to  go  collect  and  maintain  all  this  in-
formation.  We’re  not  making  a  profit  on  giving  them  the  reports. 
We have to authenticate the—I’m sorry, Senator—— 

Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Mr.  SANFORD.—we  have  to  authenticate  the  individual  to  make 
sure  who  they  are  when  they  call  up.  We’re  not  just  going  to  turn 
that  information  over  to  somebody  over  the  phone.  Then  we  have 
to prepare the report, and we mail it out to them. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And,  just  as  a  very  brief  follow-up  to  that,  be-
cause  we’re  out  of  time,  is—should  the  consumer  have  the  ability 
to correct information in your file? 

Mr. SANFORD. If the information has an error, is related to work 
we’ve  done  with  it—let’s  say  we  transposed  data  inadvertently 
when  we  were  loading  the  file—we  would  certainly  correct  that.  If 
it’s  a  public-record  file,  or  a  non-public-record  file,  like  a  credit 
header, we need—we generally point them right back to the source 
and  say,  ‘‘This  is  where  we  got  this  file  from,  let’s  get  the  public- 
record source collected so that we have the correct public-record in-
formation.’’ 

Senator SMITH. Thanks, Senator Pryor. 
Senator Nelson? 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Curling,  you  mentioned  that  if  information  is  breached—se-
curity  is  breached,  information  is  now  out—that  there’s  a  notice 
that should be sent out to the parties. Should that security breach 
also be a violation of the specific law? Should there be strict liabil-
ity  for  anything  that  comes  from  the  misuse  or  the  access  of  that 
information? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  as  we  indicated,  I  think,  Senator,  we  do 
agree  that,  you  know,  if  there  is  a  breach,  we  should  send  notice. 
And  we  would  prefer  the  legislature  draw  a  bright  line  as  to  what 
that  notice  criteria  should  be,  because  we  don’t  feel  like  we’re  in 
a  position  to  judge  whether  or  not  that  breach  posed  a  significant 
risk.  In  the  event  there  is  a  notice,  you  know,  we  do  have  obliga-
tions  and  responsibilities  that  we  need  to  fulfill.  The  first  is,  we 
help those consumers that are affected, you know, try and do what 
they  can  to  understand  the  breach,  understand  the  significance  of 
the  effect  on  them,  and  give  them  access  to  information  products 
that  would  help  them  monitor  whether  or  not  they’re  going  to  be 
a victim of identity theft. And we believe we’ve done that. 

Senator BEN NELSON. What about strict liability? In other words, 
if  you  have—if  you  have  control  over  the  information,  and  it  gets 
accessed,  should  you  have  strict  liability  for  anything  that  occurs 
that  is  damaging  to  the  name  whose  identity  theft  has  occurred? 
Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  I’m  not  a  lawyer,  I  don’t  know  that  I’m  pre-

pared to understand—— 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  no,  I’m  not  necessarily  saying  you 
should  you  know  right  now,  but  do  you  think,  as  a  matter  of  law, 
if you’re not strictly liable now, that that might be the kind of im-
position of responsibility that would be appropriate? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  there  are  certainly  penalties  and  fines  al-
ready in place for breaches like this. I think that the primary, you 
know,  view  that  ChoicePoint  would  have,  as  a  commercial  enter-
prise,  is,  we  have  market  forces  at  play,  as  well,  that  already  put, 
you  know,  tremendous  pressure  on  companies  to  not  only  do  the 
right  thing,  but  maintain  the  appropriate  safeguards.  And  I  think 
that  the,  you  know,  primary  liability  is  with  the  criminals.  And  I 
think what we want to try and support is law enforcement, getting 
the fraudsters out of our system. 

Senator  BEN NELSON.  Well,  if  you  were  faced  with  the  question 
we’re faced with—How does this get resolved?—what would be the 
first thing you would suggest we do? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  I  think  there  are  many  good  proposals  in 
place.  You  know,  I  previously  testified  in  the  Judiciary  Committee 
that  the  proposal  by  Senator  Schumer  and  Senator  Nelson  has  a 
lot  of  good  principles  that  we  agree  with.  We  believe  in  notice.  We 
think  notice  is  an  important  thing.  You  need  to  give  a  consumer 
a notice that a breach has occurred, and give them an opportunity 
to  take  the  steps  necessary  to  protect  themselves.  We  believe  that 
there need to be standards. And I think all of us, you know, would 
like to have a level playing field, whether that’s for us to better un-
derstand  the  expectations  that  various  constituencies  place  on  us 
so we can feel like we’re honoring and acting responsibly in our ob-
ligations, but also from a competitive and marketplace standard to 
understand what it is the rules should be. 

In my case, most of our products, as I indicated, that contain per-
sonally  identifiable  information,  are  already  regulated  by  the 
FCRA, which, as you well know, has been a tried and true kind of 
30-year  standard  for  how  this  kind  of  information  should  be  man-
aged and what you should do if there is a breach or if there is some 
kind of dispute. We think that’s a good model. 

Senator BEN NELSON. Mr. Sanford? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

Mr.  SANFORD.  Senator,  I  would  recommend  that  the  three  most 
important  things  that  this  committee  could  consider,  if  the 
ambitioning  goal  is  to  make  a  dent  in  the  amount  of  fraud  associ-
ated  with  identity  theft,  is,  one,  look  at  what  the  penalties  are  for 
the  identity  thieves,  and  make  it  a  crime  that  nobody  wants  to 
commit. It’s a very hard crime to prove. Sometimes the value of the 
theft is difficult to prove, and the penalties sometimes makes these 
misdemeanors, while the harm to society and the harm to the indi-
viduals  and  the  financial  institutions,  the  banking  industry,  is  in 
the billions. So, that’s one. 

Second,  I  do  think  a  national  notification  standard  is  in  order. 
California  does  have  a  law.  Many,  many  states  are  considering,  as 
we  are  here  today,  different  notification  bills  across  the  United 
States, and I think having a national notification standard that has 
Federal  preemption  will  ensure  that  when  someone  gets  a  notice, 
no  matter  where  they  live—because,  remember,  our  people  in  this 
country move around quite a bit—they’ll understand what that no-
tice means, and it won’t depend upon which State it came from. 

And, third, I think insisting—as Mr. Curling pointed out earlier, 
insisting on data-security safeguards, regardless of where that data 
repository is, would make sense—not just for commercial organiza-
tions  like  us—so  that  we  make  it  harder  to  get  that  information. 
And  I—as  indicated  in  my  testimony,  I  believe  that  the  Safeguard 
Rules,  if  they’re  modeled  after  what’s  in  GLBA,  would  be  a  good 
start. 

I  think  that  this  framework  needs  to  be  flexible,  because  every 
company’s business is a bit different, technologies are different, the 
size  of  the  business  is  different,  and  the  threats  are  evolving.  I 
think proscribing specific security—within a year or 18 months, we 
would  have  companies  that  might  be  in  compliance  with  that,  but 
would have ineffective security safeguards in place. 

Senator BEN NELSON. What about the—my question about strict 
liability  for  any  kind  of  damages  that  the  victim  of  identity  theft 
might get as a result of information you held that was accessed by 
an identity thief? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  It’s  not  something  that  I’ve  previously  considered. 
I’d  be  glad  to  give  it  some  thought.  I,  top  of  mind,  wonder  if  it 
wouldn’t provide some incentive for companies not to make notice— 
who  were  worried  about  the  penalties—but  it’s  something  I’d  be 
glad to work with your—you and your staff on and consider. 
Senator BEN NELSON. Thank you. Thanks to both of you. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you very much, Senator Nelson. 
As  we  go  to  a  second  round,  I  know  Senator  Inouye  has  ex-
pressed  an  interest,  but  if  there  is  no  objection,  Senator  McCain, 
a  Member  of  this  Committee,  has  asked  that  we  include  in  the 
record his statement. It relates to the leadership, tragically, of Ari-
zona  on  this  issue,  and  it’s  an  issue  about  which  he  is  very  con-
cerned. 

Is there objection? 
[No response.] 
Senator SMITH. We’ll include it. 
[The prepared statement of Senator McCain follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN, U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

32 

Our  Nation—along  with  the  rest  of  the  world—is  experiencing  a  data  revolution. 
Thanks  to  information  technology,  innovative  business  models,  and  globalization, 
data  is  flowing  faster,  more  widely,  and  more  freely  than  ever  before.  This  current 
of  information  is  helping  our  economy  grow,  but  like  many  other  revolutions,  this 
one  has  not  been  bloodless.  The  dark  side  of  our  Nation’s  information-based  econ-
omy  is  that  the  wider  availability  of  data—including  personal  identifiable  informa-
tion—has contributed to the theft of millions of American identities. 

Unfortunately,  identity  theft  is  especially  common  in  my  home  State.  Federal 
Trade  Commission  data  indicates  that  there  were  more  reported  cases  of  identity 
theft  per  capita  in  Arizona  than  in  any  other  state  in  2004.  In  addition,  the  FTC 
reports  that  the  Phoenix  area  leads  other  U.S.  metropolitan  areas  in  the  incidence 
of  the  crime.  This  has  led  one  Arizona  newspaper  to  christen  my  home  State  the 
‘‘identity theft capital of the Nation,’’ a distinction that no Arizonan is proud of and 
that I will continue working to shed. 

Today’s  hearing  touches  on  yet  another  chapter  in  this  country’s  battle  against 
identity  theft.  And,  though  I’m  extremely  concerned  about  the  security  breaches  at 
companies  like  ChoicePoint  and  LexisNexis,  I  am  not  surprised  by  the  news. 
ChoicePoint,  for  example,  has  compiled  19  billion  records  covering  virtually  every 
American adult according to press reports. Targets do not get bigger and more pre-
dictable  than  that,  and  I  have  to  say  that  I  am  disappointed  to  know  that  a  com-
pany that should have had better security measures in place did not. I look forward 
to  hearing  what  ChoicePoint  and  LexisNexis  are  doing  to  restore  integrity  to  their 
businesses. 

I  trust  that  this  will  be  the  first  of  many  hearings  that  the  Committee  will  have 
on the issues of information security and privacy, and that the Committee will build 
on  the  work  it  has  done  in  the  past  by  taking  a  broad  look  at  security  and  privacy 
issues during this Congress. Our purpose in doing so should be to protect consumers 
while maintaining the integrity and viability of our information economy. I, for one, 
believe that those goals are not mutually exclusive. 

I  thank  Chairman  Stevens  for  holding  this  important  hearing  and  the  witnesses 

for coming before the Committee. 

Senator  SMITH.  Also,  I’ll  include  in  the  record  the  data  security 
incidents  in  2005  relating  to  public  institutions,  primarily  univer-
sities, and the tremendous levels of identity theft that has occurred 
at some of the major universities of our Nation. 

[The information previously referred to follows:] 

(As of 5/9, at least 35 incidents have been disclosed, potentially affecting more than 5.2 million individuals) 

Data Security Incidents—2005 

Date 

01/03/05 

01/06/05 

01/18/05 

01/25/05 

01/27/05 

02/02/05 

Entity 

George Mason University ................................................................
—Officials  discover  that  hackers  had  accessed  private  information 

and Social Security numbers on students and staff..

University of Kansas .........................................................................
—Administrators  send  letters  to  individuals  whose  personal  infor-
mation,  including  Social  Security  numbers,  passport  numbers, 
countries  of  origin,  and  birthdates,  might  have  been  com-
promised when a hacker accessed a server in November 2004..

University of California, San Diego ..............................................
—Officials  reveal  a  mid-November  breach  may  have  compromised 

names and SSNs of students and alumni..

Science Applications International (SAIC) .................................
—Desktop computers were stolen from the offices of Science Appli-
cations  International  Corp.,  an  online  payroll  services  company, 
compromising  personal  information  of  current  and  past  stock-
holders.

Purdue University .............................................................................
—An unknown person or group accessed a computer in the College 
of  Liberal  Arts’  Theatre  Division  containing  names  and  SSNs  of 
faculty, staff, students, alumni and business affiliates..

Indiana University ............................................................................

Affected 

30,000 

1,400 

3,500 

Unknown 

1,200 

Unknown 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

(As of 5/9, at least 35 incidents have been disclosed, potentially affecting more than 5.2 million individuals) 

Data Security Incidents—2005—Continued 

Date 

Entity 

Affected 

02/14/05 

02/20/05 

02/24/05 

02/25/05 

02/05 

03/08/05 

03/08/05 

03/09/05 

03/11/05 

03/11/05 

03/11/05 

03/14/05 

03/18/05 

03/23/05 

—Officials  reveal  that  the  F.B.I.  and  campus  police  are  inves-
tigating a computer security breach that left employees’ personal 
information  vulnerable.  It  is  unknown  at  this  point  how  many 
have been affected..

ChoicePoint .........................................................................................
—Company  confirms  it  was  victimized  by  a  customer  fraud  in 
which  public  records  information  about  approximately  30,000 
consumers  may  have  been  compromised;  number  of  potentially 
affected consumers later increased to 145,000..

T-Mobile ...............................................................................................
—Mobile  phone  accounts  of  Paris  Hilton  and  400  T-Mobile  cus-

tomers compromised by hackers.

Westlaw ................................................................................................
—Accused  by  U.S.  Sen.  Charles  Schumer  of  having  ‘‘egregious 
loopholes’’  in  one  of  its  Internet  data  services  that  would  allow 
thieves  to  harvest  SSNs  and  financial  identities  of  millions  of 
people..

Bank of America .................................................................................
—Announced  it  had  lost  computer  data  tapes  containing  personal 
information  on  Federal  employees,  including  some  members  of 
the U.S. Senate..

PayMaxx ...............................................................................................
—Flaws in the online W–2 service of PayMaxx exposed customers’ 

payroll records..

DSW Shoes ...........................................................................................
—Announced  that  credit  card  information  from  customers  of  more 
than  100  DSW  Shoe  Warehouse  stores  was  stolen  from  a  com-
pany  computer’s  database.  The  company  announces  on  April  18, 
the number of affected consumers could be 1.4 million..

Harvard University ...........................................................................
—Intruder gains access to its admission systems and helped appli-
cants log on to learn whether they had been successful weeks be-
fore they were to find out..

Reed Elsevier, Seisint Unit (LexisNexis) .....................................
—Announced  that  hackers  gained  access  to  sensitive,  personal  in-
formation  of  about  32,000  U.S.  citizens  on  databases  owned  by 
Reed Elsevier. The company in April updates the actual number 
of potentially affected consumers to 310,000..

Boston College ....................................................................................
—Announced  that  hackers  had  accessed  personal  information  of 

alumni in a computer system used for fund-raising..

University of California-Berkeley .................................................
—Laptop computer stolen from a graduate division office contained 

the names and Social Security numbers of 98,369 individuals..

Nevada Department of Motor Vehicles ........................................
—Personal  information  compromised  when  thieves  stole  a  com-

puter from a Nevada DMV office..

California State University, Chico ................................................
—Hackers broke into a housing and food service computer system, 
which  contained  names  and  SSNs  of  current,  former  and  pro-
spective students, as well as faculty and staff..

University of Nevada, Las Vegas ...................................................
—Administrators reveal that a hacker had been accessing the per-

sonal information of international students..

Mutual funds .......................................................................................
—Wall  Street  Journal  reveals  numerous  mutual  funds  reported 
data  security  breaches,  including  Armada  Funds;  Pimco,  a  unit 
of German insurance giant Allianz AG; The Dreyfus unit of Mel-
lon  Financial  Corp.;  Bank  of  America  Corp.’s  Columbia  Funds 
unit;  Nuveen  Investments;  The  First  American  Funds  unit  of 
U.S.  Bancorp;  AmSouth  Bancorp’s  fund  unit;  CNI  Charter  fund 
unit of City National Bank of Los Angeles..

145,000 

400 

‘‘Millions’’ 

1.2 million 

25,000 

1.4 million 

200 

310,000 

120,000 

100,000 

8,900+ 

59,000 

5,000 

Unknown 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

(As of 5/9, at least 35 incidents have been disclosed, potentially affecting more than 5.2 million individuals) 

Data Security Incidents—2005—Continued 

34 

Date 

03/25/05 

03/28/05 

03/28/05 

04/08/05 

04/10/05 

04/10/05 

04/12/05 

04/13/05 

04/19/05 

04/23/05 

04/26/05 

04/28/05 

04/28/05 

04/29/05 

Entity 

Northwestern University .................................................................
—Hackers broke into a graduate school server, exposing the Social 

Security numbers of students, faculty, and alumni..

San Jose Medical Group ..................................................................
—Someone  stole  two  computers  that  contained  patient  billing  in-
formation,  including  names,  addresses,  Social  Security  numbers 
and confidential medical information..

University of Chicago Hospital ......................................................
—Announced an employee had been selling patient records. ............
Eastern National (vendor for National Park Service) .............
—Hacker  infiltrated  its  ‘‘eParks.com’’  computer  system  and  may 
have gained access to customer names, credit card numbers and 
billing addresses..

Christus St. Joseph Hospital, Houston, Texas ...........................
—Published  reports  on  4/26  said  the  hospital  had  sent  letters  to 
16,000  patients  saying  their  medical  records  and  SSNs  were 
comprised due to the theft of a computer in a January burglary..
Carnegie Mellon University, Pittsburgh ......................................
—Published reports on 4/21 said the university had sent letters to 
more  than  5,000  students,  employees  and  graduates  that  their 
SSNs and other personal information was comprised in a breach 
of the school’s computer network that was discovered on 4/10..

Tufts University .................................................................................
—Announced it was sending letters to 106,000 alumni, warning of 
‘‘abnormal  activity’’  on  a  computer  that  contained  names,  ad-
dresses, phone numbers, and, in some cases, Social Security and 
credit card numbers..

HSBC North America ........................................................................
—Credit  card  issuer  sending  letters  to  consumers  who  used  Gen-
eral  Motors-branded  MasterCards  to  make  purchases  at  Polo 
Ralph  Lauren,  stating  that  criminals  may  have  obtained  access 
to their credit-card information..

Ameritrade ...........................................................................................
—Online  discount  broker  reported  it  has  notified  current  and 
former  customers  that  it  has  lost  a  backup  computer  tape  con-
taining their personal information..

Georgia Southern University, Statesboro, GA ...........................
—Associated  Press  reports  on  4/28  that  hackers  broke  into  a  GSU 
server  that  contained  thousands  of  credit  card  and  Social  Secu-
rity numbers collected over more than three years..

Foster Wheeler, Clinton, NJ ............................................................
—Engineering/construction  company  writes  to  employees,  retirees, 
advising  them  that  a  hacker  broke  into  the  company’s  computer 
system in February and might have stolen personal data, includ-
ing SSNs and bank deposit information..

Banks in New Jersey ........................................................................
—NBC reports scheme by bank managers and employees who sold 
personal  data  of  about  500,000  holders  of  accounts  of  Bank  of 
America,  Wachovia,  and  Commerce  Bank  branches  in  New  Jer-
sey..

Oklahoma State University .............................................................
—University begins notifying students and alumni about the theft 
of  a  laptop  computer  from  the  career  services  office  that  con-
tained Social Security numbers, genders, ethnicities, class levels 
and  e-mail  addresses  of  most  Stillwater  and  Tulsa  campus  stu-
dents and recent alumni..

Florida International University ...................................................
—Sun-Sentinel  newspaper  in  Orlando  reports  on  a  ‘‘recent  com-
puter  break-in’’  potentially  compromising  personal  data  of  stu-
dents,  professors  and  staffers.  A  school  official  told  the  news-
paper that electronic intruders apparently dialed into FIU’s com-
puters from Europe..

Affected 

21,000 

185,000 

Unknown 

15,000 

16,000 

5,000 

106,000 

180,000 

200,000 

‘‘Thousands’’ 

(est.) 6,700 

500,000 

Unknown 

Unknown 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

(As of 5/9, at least 35 incidents have been disclosed, potentially affecting more than 5.2 million individuals) 

Data Security Incidents—2005—Continued 

Date 

05/02/05 

Entity 

Time Warner .......................................................................................
—Company announces that data on current and former employees 
stored on computer back-up tapes was lost by an outside storage 
company..

Affected 

600,000 

Total—At least 35 incidents, potentially affecting more than 5,244,300 individuals. 

Senator SMITH. Senator Inouye? 
Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
On  the  present  laws  and  rules  and  regulations,  I  can  have  my 
telephone  number  unlisted  to  protect  my  privacy.  I  can  also  de-
mand that spam callers be prohibited from using my number. Can 
I call upon your companies and say to take my name off your list? 
Mr.  SANFORD.  We  have  a  opt-out  program  that  has  restrictions 
on it. You could make a request to opt out of our non-public-record 
information databases if were a victim of identity theft, if you were 
a law enforcement official who has had some threat of risk of harm, 
or  we  have  a  general  other  category  which  says  any  other  threat 
of  risk  of  harm  that  you  would  show  us.  And  that  might  be,  say, 
for example, a domestic-abuse victim. 

Senator  INOUYE.  In  other  words,  you  have  the  final  say  as  to 

whether I can or cannot take it out? 

Mr. SANFORD. That’s correct, Senator. 
Senator INOUYE. Mr. Curling? 
Mr.  CURLING.  Many  of  our  products  already  are  opt-in  products 
driven by the FCRA. There are products that we offer that do have 
opt-out  provisions—the  direct-marketing  products,  et  cetera.  Some 
of our products, though, the ones, in particular, I think, the subject 
of  this  hearing,  the  public-record  products,  are  products  that  there 
is not an opt-out on, except for a law enforcement or a government 
official opt-out. Those are generally not records that are, you know, 
unique  to  ChoicePoint.  They  are  records  that  society  has  deter-
mined  to  be  open  public  records,  and  people  typically  turn  to 
ChoicePoint merely to—for cost effectiveness and convenience to ac-
quire that record. Those are records that we don’t source. We didn’t 
originate  them.  We  merely  extract  them  from  where—government 
repositories and courthouses around the country, and we don’t have 
an opt-out provision for those. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Inouye. 
Senator Bill Nelson? 
Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
And, before I forget it, I would like—because I’m not going to ask 
all the questions here—to submit a number of questions in writing, 
as did Senator McCain. 

Senator SMITH. We will include those questions and ask for their 

Senator BILL NELSON. Thank you. 
And  thank  you,  Mr.  Curling,  for  your  response  to  the  other  Nel-
son with regard to this Nelson’s legislation that is before this com-
mittee saying that, generally, the concept of it, that you would sup-

answer. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

port  it.  And  I  want  to  go  over  those  six  items,  things  like  creating 
a  government  industry  working  group  to  help  develop  best  prac-
tices  for  safeguarding  information,  and  creating  an  Assistant  Sec-
retary  of  Cybersecurity  within  the  Department  of  Homeland  Secu-
rity,  and  tightening  commercial  usage  of  Social  Security  numbers. 
Those  are  things  that  certainly  could  be  embraced.  Is  that  accu-
rate? 

Mr. CURLING. Generally speaking, yes, Senator. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  All  right.  How  about  requiring  all  of  the 
information-broker  companies  to  notify  consumers  when  a  security 
breach  occurs?  You’ve  already  answered  that  in  relation  to  other 
questions, and you generally support that concept. 

Mr. CURLING. Yes. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  How  about  mandates  in  the  law  that  all 
companies  must  reasonably  protect  sensitive  consumer  informa-
tion? 

Mr. CURLING. Yes, Senator. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  And  then  having  a  one-stop  shop?  What-
ever the regulatory agency—my suggestion is that it is the Federal 
Trade  Commission,  but  this  would  be  an  Office  of  Identity  Theft, 
where a consumer could get help to restore their identity. 

Mr.  CURLING.  We  would  agree  with  the  one-stop  shop,  and  we 

agree with enhancing the FTC’s oversight. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  All  right.  Now,  that’s  pretty  much  the 
comprehensive bill that Senator Schumer and I have filed. What do 
you think about that, Mr. Sanford? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  Senator,  it’s  a—it  is  a  very  comprehensive  bill.  I 
believe  the  intent,  in  terms  of  helping  consumers  and  stopping 
identity  theft  and  fraud,  is  certainly  welcome.  I  think  the  parts  of 
the  legislation  that  strike  me  as  the  most  relevant,  that  I  would 
encourage this Committee, is the national notification standard for 
consumers. I would encourage Federal preemption so that we don’t 
have  competing  notification  standards  in  the  market.  I  think  data 
safeguards definitely modeled after GLBA, that flexible framework, 
I think, is the appropriate measure—— 

Senator BILL NELSON. For information brokers? 
Mr.  SANFORD.  Well,  I  think—as  I  mentioned  earlier,  I  think 
the—if you have personally identifying information, which, if it got 
in the wrong hands—and we could agree on what personally identi-
fying information is—and that posed a risk of harm to individuals, 
then  I  would  say  if  you  are  maintaining  that  database,  and  you 
have  a  breach,  then  notice—you  should  give  notice  to  individuals 
when you have that breach. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  But  a  law  that  would  mandate  that  the 
companies  must  reasonably  protect  this  sensitive  consumer  infor-
mation? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  I  agree,  Senator,  that  the  safeguards  that  I  have 
mentioned,  in  GLBA,  I  believe  are  the  right—is  the  right  frame-
work.  I  think  that  would  go  a  long  way  in  protecting  data  for,  not 
just us, but other people who maintain personally identifying infor-
mation. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  What  do  you  think  about  the  one-stop 

shopping? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Mr.  SANFORD.  I’m  not  sure  anybody  could  argue  with  additional 
help in oversight and funding for the Federal Trade Commission to 
help in identity theft. I know that Chairman Majoras testifies how 
many  thousands  of  calls  a  week  they  get,  and  I’m  sure  that  that 
would just be something that would be very helpful. 

Senator BILL NELSON. I’ve talked to her personally about it, and 
she is—without endorsing it, she is clearly very positively inclined. 
Let  me  ask  Mr.  Curling,  because,  my  previous  round,  I  had  the 
chance  to  talk  to  Mr.  Sanford.  ChoicePoint  has  described  itself  as 
a  ‘‘private  intelligence  service.’’  ChoicePoint  markets  itself  as  ‘‘sell-
ing actionable intelligence.’’ Could you explain what this means for 
your  company  to  be  in  the  intelligence  business,  and  explain  how 
consumers would feel comfortable with that? 

Mr. CURLING. Sure. I’m not sure that we characterized ourselves 
as  a  private  intelligence  agency.  I  believe  that  was  an  author  of  a 
book that characterized that. But we do—we do use—— 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  One  of  your  staff  yesterday  told  my  staff 

attorney that it had been characterized that way. 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  I’ll  have  to  have  a  conversation  with  my 
staff.  But  we  are  a  company  that  provides  identification  and  cre-
dential  verification  solutions  to  principally  commercial  enterprises. 
And what we try and do is help them understand and manage the 
risks  that  they  face.  So,  what  we  want  to  give  them—as  you’re 
aware,  data  is  expensive  to  acquire  and  time-consuming  to  ana-
lyze—what  we  want  to  give  them  is  just  the  right  information  at 
the  right  time.  So,  our  services  are  all  oriented  around  things  like 
helping  an  insurance  company  understand  how  to  evaluate  and 
price the risk of an applicant for auto insurance, so that consumer 
gets  the  insurance  policy  that  they  want  at  a  price  that’s  fair  for 
them;  how  to  help  a  commercial  employer  do  a  background  check 
on a prospective employee, so that that employee is able to get the 
job  that  they  want,  but  the  employer  is  able  to  effectively  manage 
the  risk  that  the  society  puts  on  them  to  know  who’s  engaged  in 
their  work  force.  That’s  the  kind  of  actionable  intelligence  that 
ChoicePoint products offer. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  You  have  a  product  named  AutoTrackXP, 
and it’s not subject to the Fair Credit Reporting Act, and it appears 
to  contain  some  of  the  sensitive  consumer  information  that  is  in 
other  products  that  you  admit  are  regulated,  as  are  detailed  and 
full  credit  reports.  Explain  to  the  Committee  why  ChoicePoint  be-
lieves that the AutoTrackXP is not regulated under the Fair Credit 
Reporting Act. 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  that’s  a  search  engine,  not  really  a  report, 
but that product is used for investigative purposes. The largest cus-
tomer set is law enforcement. But, again, as you’ve heard today in 
the  testimony,  there  are  other  markets,  like  fraud  prevention  for 
insurance fraud research, as well as investigative research by com-
mercial  financial  enterprises,  that  run  searches  to  try  and  get  in-
formation back. For those customers, that search does contain sen-
sitive,  personally  identifiable  information.  Since  we’ve  made  the 
business  changes  to  our  business,  we  don’t  offer  that  product  with 
personally identifiable information in it to any segments other than 
law enforcement, large financial institutions, and insurance compa-
nies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  So,  the  theft  that  occurred  by  the  Nige-
rians  faking  the  identity  could  not  have  occurred  in  that  sensitive 
information. 

Mr.  CURLING.  No,  it  did,  in  fact,  occur  in  that  sensitive  informa-
tion,  but,  as  a  result  of  that  fraud,  we  have  changed  our  product, 
and won’t offer—and do not offer that product to those parts of the 
market. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  All  right.  And,  if  I  may,  just  this  last 
question.  ChoicePoint  has  estimated  that  identity  thieves  obtained 
sensitive,  personal  information  on  about  145,000  people.  I  be-
lieve—— 

Mr. CURLING. That’s correct. 
Senator BILL NELSON.—I believe that’s what you’ve stated. 
Mr. CURLING. Yes. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Now,  the  L.A.  Sheriff’s  Department  esti-
mates that figure to be four million. Can you explain why those fig-
ures are so different? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Sure.  I  think  that  the  quoted  number  of  four  mil-
lion  was  a  very  early  estimate  by  the  L.A.  Sheriff’s  Department, 
going back to September or October of last year. That was long be-
fore  the  investigation  had  actually  gone  through  the  searches  that 
had  been  done,  anybody  had  determined  how  many  potentially  af-
fected  consumers  were  affected  by  that.  We’ve  appointed  Robert 
McConnell, a 28-year veteran of the Secret Service and, for the last 
5  years  of  his  career,  the  head  of  the  Federal  Government’s  Inter-
agency Nigerian Organized Crime Task Force. I spoke with Robert 
yesterday.  He  has  confirmed  to  me  that  L.A.  Sheriff’s  Department 
now believes that our estimate is accurate. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Gentlemen, I look forward to working with 

you on this legislation. 

Senator SMITH. Thanks, Senator Nelson. 
We’re  pleased  to  be  joined  by  Senator  Kerry.  We’ve  completed  a 
second  round  of  questions,  Senator.  If  you  have  an  opening  state-
ment or questions for this first panel, we’ll be happy to—— 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator  KERRY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  No,  I  apologize  for 
being  late,  but  we  had  competing  meetings,  as  is  always  the  case 
here. I apologize to the witnesses. 

I’ve  tried  to  get  an  update  as  fast  as  possible  so  I’m  not  overly 
repetitive here. And I know a lot of questions, good questions, have 
been asked. 

Obviously, from the participation here today, you can get a sense 
of  the  importance.  But  you  already  knew  that  before  you  came 
here,  because  of  the  outcry,  publicly,  and  the  concerns  that  people 
are expressing. And the moving, sort of, model statewide, beginning 
with California, of regulation is, obviously, an indication of people’s 
desire to do something. 

I  understand  your  business  models,  and  I  understand  that  the 
information you provide is, obviously, often used for very valid pur-
poses, but, as we move forward, the question of how to protect this 
is,  needless  to  say,  critical.  During  the  campaign  last  year,  and  I 
think  it  came  to  fruition  yesterday  or  today,  President  Bush  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

I both talked about e-medical records and the need to try to reduce 
costs  in  the  medical  system.  And,  obviously,  that’s  critical.  And  I 
just  wonder  if  you  could  share  with  us  a  little  bit,  sort  of,  first  of 
all,  what  types  of  personal  information  currently  do  your—do  you 
maintain in your product lines, including information based on bio-
metrics, DNA, and medical records? 

Mr. Curling? 
Mr.  CURLING.  We  don’t  maintain  any  data  on  biometrics,  DNA, 

or medical data. The data—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Might  you,  as  this  opens  up  now  with  a  certain 
amount of money? I mean, is this not a lucrative business prospect? 
Mr. CURLING. I don’t know whether it’s a lucrative business pros-
pect  or  not,  but  it’s  not  an  area  where  we  have  a  lot  of  expertise 
or  traction.  We  do  have  a  DNA  laboratory  that  supports  our  law 
enforcement  initiatives,  but  that  laboratory,  Bode  Labs,  merely 
takes  specimens  on  behalf  of  law  enforcement  agencies,  processes 
the  DNA,  maintains  chain  of  custody,  and  turns  that  back  over  to 
them  for  forensic  purposes.  Our  scientists  have  been  to  the—Thai-
land  to  work  on  the  tsunami.  We  identified  the  victims  of  the 
World  Trade  Center  tragedy  through  that  laboratory.  But  it’s  a  fo-
rensic-science  laboratory  that’s  really  an  extension  of  the  services 
we do to support law enforcement, not a business—part of our busi-
ness model that we necessarily embrace. 

I  think  it  is  possible  that  the  identifiers  that  we  all  begin  to  see 
used  more  in  our  society  are  perhaps  biometric  identifiers  you’re 
seeing  today,  technological  solutions  beginning  to  be  deployed. 
They  use  authentications  exceeding  User  IDs  and  passwords,  and 
incorporating things like biometrics. But that’s not something that, 
in the industry that I’m in, is in heavy use today. 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Sanford? 
Mr.  SANFORD.  We  don’t  collect  medical  information,  Senator,  or 

biometrics, or DNA, either. 

Senator  KERRY.  What  about  that  information,  Mr.  Curling,  that 
you  do  collect,  in  terms  of  the  forensic  chain-of-custody—is  there 
any intrusive link in there that should be of concern? 

Mr.  CURLING.  No,  sir.  That  data  doesn’t  get—the  data  reposi-
tories  in  ChoicePoint  are  generally  housed  at  the  product  level. 
None  of  the  information  in  Bode  Laboratories,  which  is  in  Spring-
field,  Virginia,  goes  out  of  the  laboratory  into  other  places  in 
ChoicePoint. 

Senator KERRY. When you say you changed your business model, 
and  essentially  have  tightened  procedures,  what  loopholes  did  you 
tighten? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  I  don’t  know  that  I  would  say  we  tightened 
loopholes. We made business decisions that we thought were in the 
best interest of our company, given the experiences that we’ve had, 
and they were basically twofold. One, there are businesses that are 
hard to credential. Those are small businesses. And, given that the 
preponderance  of  our  revenue  is  in  large,  either  government  con-
tracts, or government—or commercial enterprises, small businesses 
are  simply  something  that’s  awful  hard  for  us  to  adequately  cre-
dential and ensure that we know exactly who, on the other end, is 
buying  the  information  products.  We  chose  to  exit  the  market  of 
selling  sensitive,  personal  information  to  those  businesses,  even 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

though  they  have  legitimate  business  interests  to  get  at.  And,  you 
know,  certainly  small  businesses  face  many  of  the  challenges  that 
big businesses do. 

Second,  there  are  products  that  we  sell  that,  while  legal,  don’t 
have  direct  consumer  benefit.  And  so,  we  chose  to  not  sell  to  cer-
tain  segments  of  the  marketplace,  sensitive,  personal  data  that 
they’re legally entitled to get, but they don’t fit our business model. 
Senator  KERRY.  Was  that  small-business  change  specifically  in 

response to the Nigerian—— 
Mr. CURLING. Yes, it was. 
Senator KERRY. It was, OK. 
Is  it  your  judgment  now  that  those  two  problems  were  the  only 
two  problems?  Or  are  you  taking  further  steps  that  we  should  be 
aware of? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Well,  our  investigations,  and  those  of  law  enforce-
ment,  continue.  There’s—you  know,  we  tend  to  think  of  security 
risks  in  five  different  categories—you  know,  basic  physical-posses-
sion  risk,  which  you  can  think  of  as  common  burglary  or  the—just 
loss of data; second, the hacking potential—and we have, like most 
in our industry, you know, monitoring software and extensive tools 
to  try  and  monitor  and  track,  and  preventing  hacking  attempts; 
you  have  properly  credentialed  customers  that  have  an  employee 
that  does  a  search  they’re  not  permitted  to  do,  you  know,  the  typ-
ical  scenario  of  doing  a  background  check  on  somebody’s  girlfriend 
or  neighbor;  you  have  properly  credentialed  customers  that  lose 
track  of  passwords  and  User  IDs,  which  you’ve  already  heard  of— 
testimony  today;  and  then,  last,  you  have,  you  know,  customers 
that get past credentialing procedures that simply should not have 
been  credentialed  as  customers,  and  that’s  the  experience  we  most 
recently had, where the notices were driven by. 

Senator  KERRY.  With  respect  to  the  law  enforcement  agencies,  I 
gather you sell information to about 7,000 agencies. Is that correct? 
Mr.  CURLING.  We  serve  7,000  agencies.  A  lot  of  those  don’t  buy 

data. They’re buying software or tools from us. 

Senator KERRY. So, is there any limitation on the sale of that in-

formation to law enforcement? 

Mr. CURLING. Well, we’re limited by the type of information we’re 
able  to  legally  obtain  from  the  repositories.  The  States  have  laws, 
as does the Federal Government, about what data can be sold and 
under what conditions it can be used. 

Senator KERRY. So, that’s established by the States. 
Mr.  CURLING.  And  by  Federal  Government.  But,  Senator,  large-
ly—and,  as  I  testified  earlier  today,  largely  the  Federal  agencies 
are  turning  to  us  to  buy  otherwise  readily  available  public-record 
information. They’re merely turning to us for convenience and cost- 
effectiveness. 

Senator KERRY. And which law enforcement agencies do you cur-
rently  sell  this—what  I  assume  can  be  termed  sensitive  consumer 
information? 

Mr.  CURLING.  We  sell  to  a  wide  variety  of  Federal—we  serve 
most of the Federal law enforcement agencies, and many State and 
local law enforcement agencies. 

Senator KERRY. Is there any standard of probable cause? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

formation. 

Mr.  CURLING.  There  are—we  have  circumstances  under  which 
they  inform  us  they  want  to  buy  data  for  investigations,  but  we’re 
not privy, nor would you want us to be, to the actual investigations 
those law enforcement agents are conducting. 

Senator KERRY. So, it’s an automatic affirmative response for in-

Mr. CURLING. In most cases, yes, sir. 
Senator KERRY. No matter what. 
A few years ago, you acquired VitalChek, which is a company re-
sponsible  for  handling  vital  records—birth,  death,  marriage,  di-
vorce—in  all  50  states.  How  is  that  information  shared  with 
ChoicePoint? 

Mr.  CURLING.  It’s  not.  That’s  an  ordering  and  payment  platform 
where a consumer orders a vital record directly from a vital-records 
office. We provide a technology infrastructure to those vital-records 
offices. They receive the customer order, they pull the vital record, 
and  they  deliver  it  through  secured  carrier,  directly  back  to  the 
consumer. The records never come through ChoicePoint. 

Senator KERRY. So, there’s no transfer of any of that information 

outside of VitalChek, itself. 

Mr. CURLING. No, sir. 
Senator  KERRY.  Do  both  of  you  accept  the  premise  that  I  think 
has  been  bouncing  around  here  today  that  reasonable  security 
standards  ought  to  apply  universally  to  any  custodian  of  sensitive, 
personal information? 

Mr. SANFORD. Yes, Senator. 
Senator KERRY. And Mr. Curling? 
Mr. CURLING. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  think  most  of  the  other  questions  were 
touched  on.  Let  me  just  ask  you,  for  my  own  edification,  How  do 
you  collect  and  maintain,  store,  and  protect  the  information? 
What’s  the  process  by  which  you  do  that,  if  you  could  go  through 
that? 

Mr. Curling? How do you collect the information and maintain it 

and store it? How do you go about that? 

Mr.  CURLING.  It  varies  widely  by  market.  In  the  largest  market 
we  serve,  which  is  the  insurance  market,  we  gateway  directly  to 
states  to  get  motor-vehicle  records  and  driver’s-license  records,  in 
most cases, and we deliver those back directly to our insurance cus-
tomers  an  application  at  a  time.  So  an  application  comes  in,  we 
break that application down against some decision rules the insur-
ance company has given us, and then we begin to buy information 
products.  Sometimes  we—their  products  that  we  database  and 
warehouse, sometimes we go gateway to them. 

Senator KERRY. Do you gateway to credit-check companies, credit 

companies? 

Mr. CURLING. We do. 
Senator KERRY. Do you see any distinction between the informa-
tion  that  you  use  and  sell,  and  the  information  that’s  on  some-
body’s credit record? 

Mr.  CURLING.  In  many  cases,  from  a  regulatory  standpoint, 
there’s  not  a  difference.  We  are  a  consumer  reporting  agency  gov-
erned  by  the  FCRA  in  many  of  the  information  products  we  have. 
The  insurance  products  would  be  FCRA  products.  We  would  be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

treated similar to a credit-reporting company. The same is true for 
our  pre-employment  workplace  solutions  products  and  our  tenant 
screening products. 

Senator  KERRY.  Do  you  think,  from  a  legal  point  of  view,  that 
any  individual  in  America,  as  a  citizen,  has  a  proprietary  interest 
in their own information? 

Mr. CURLING. I think citizens are obviously very concerned about 

the data—— 

Senator  KERRY.  Proprietary  information,  proprietary  interest.  In 
other  words,  should  you  be  trafficking  in  their  information,  and 
they have no participation in the process? 

Mr.  CURLING.  Again,  the  majority  of  our  transactions  that  con-
tain  sensitive  consumer  information  are  initiated  directly  by  con-
sumers,  so  the  transaction  would  not  happen  if  a  consumer  hadn’t 
initiated it. 

Senator KERRY. But, of course, that depends on knowledge, right? 

The knowledge standard. I mean, the opt-in—— 

Mr. CURLING. Well, they—— 
Senator KERRY.—or out, whether they know or don’t know—— 
Mr. CURLING. Well, they applied for an automobile insurance pol-

icy, and, on the application—— 

Senator  KERRY.  But  they  didn’t  apply  to  have  their  information 
go  to  you  to  be  winning  you  a  profit  for  the  transfer  of  whatever 
their life is, did they? 

Mr. CURLING. I wouldn’t know, Senator. 
Senator KERRY. Mr. Sanford? 
Mr. SANFORD. I don’t believe that a proprietary standard is work-
able.  We  use  public-record  information  to  provide  very  vital  serv-
ices that—— 

Senator KERRY. Is—— 
Mr. SANFORD.—actually help consumers—— 
Senator  KERRY.—is  the  information  of  a  credit  company  public 

record, or is it private—— 

Mr. SANFORD. We are not—— 
Senator KERRY.—privately held—— 
Mr. SANFORD.—we don’t collect—— 
Senator  KERRY.—on  a  specific  kind  of  contract  relationship,  the 

contract between the individual and that particular entity? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  Yes.  We  do  not  collect  financial  or  credit  informa-

tion on individuals, so we’re not in that business. 

Senator  KERRY.  Mr.  Curling,  what  about  that?  Is  it  specifi-

cally—— 

Mr. CURLING. I’m not an expert in the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 
but  I  believe  that  a  consumer—a  credit-reporting  agency  has  opt- 
in  and  opt-out,  both  provisions,  on  it  with  respect  to  certain  uses 
of  their  products.  And,  in  many  cases,  our  products  are  regulated 
by the FTC under FCRA, just as they are. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I  think  one  of  the  things,  Mr.  Chairman, 
we’re  going  to  have  to  think  through  very  carefully  as  we  go  for-
ward  is,  sort  of,  what  is  the  level  of  knowledge  and  options  avail-
able to anybody as to how far and how wide their information goes. 
I think that’s central to this. And I thank you. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Kerry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

We  do  need  to  go  to  our  second  panel,  but  Senator  Nelson  has 

one final brief, burning question. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Yes. And I think this will illustrate the ex-

tent to which information can be covered. 

Both  of  you  have  indicated  that  you  don’t  collect  and  store  med-

ical records. Isn’t that correct? 
Mr. CURLING. That’s correct. 
Mr. SANFORD. That’s correct, Senator. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Well,  for  example,  Mr.  Curling,  you  said 

you specifically represent, as clients, insurance companies. 

Mr. CURLING. We do. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  So,  some  of  those  are  life-insurance  com-

panies. 

companies? 

Mr.  CURLING.  No.  Mostly  property  and  casualty,  sir.  I  should 

have been more specific. Auto and home insurance. 

Senator BILL NELSON. No life insurance companies. 
Mr.  CURLING.  No,  sir.  We  have—may  have  some  life-insurance 
customers in the marketing business, but we don’t do underwriting 
of life-insurance products. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Well,  if  you  represent  life-insurance  com-
panies—and  you’re  saying  you  don’t—they  have  the  medical 
records—— 

Mr. CURLING. That is not—— 
Senator  BILL NELSON.—for  someone  getting  a  life-insurance  pol-

icy that they require a physical exam. 

How about you, Mr. Sanford? Do you represent any life-insurance 

Mr.  SANFORD.  We  have  life-insurance  companies  who  are  cus-
tomers,  but  not  in  the  medical-records  business.  For  example,  the 
legal  departments  of  insurance  corporations.  But  we  don’t  collect 
medical  records,  we  don’t  underwrite  insurance,  we  don’t  have  a 
business that does that. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  You  said,  last  October,  that  you  bought  a 
Florida company, in Boca Raton, named Seisint. Seisint has a pro-
gram called Matrix. It’s one of the most extensive tools that is used 
by  law  enforcement.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  the  officials  of  that  com-
pany  told  me,  within  a  few  days  after  September  11,  that  they 
could determine who were the hijackers, who were the perpetrators 
of  September  11.  That  information,  how  do  you  protect  that  infor-
mation? 

Mr.  SANFORD.  The  Matrix  program  was  a  federally  funded  pilot, 
which  has  ceased.  I  believe  it  stopped  last  month,  actually.  Matrix 
is  a—was  a  search  engine  that  allowed  law  enforcement  to  search 
our  services  for  public-record  information,  and  they  could  also,  at 
the  same  time,  search  their  own  databases.  We  did  not  maintain 
or  manage  that.  That  was  managed,  I  believe,  by  the  Florida  De-
partment  of  Law  Enforcement  on  behalf  of  the  other  States  that 
participated in that. 

Senator BILL NELSON. And so, that system wouldn’t have any bi-
ometric  information,  no  DNA  information,  no  medical  information? 
Mr. SANFORD. Again, the Matrix program, our participation in it, 
is  to  share  our  technology  and  access  to  our  data.  What  the  State 
law  enforcement  organizations  are  searching,  I  believe,  are  things 
like  sexual  offender  databases,  correction  records,  arrest  records 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

when they’re trying to locate a suspect. I’m not aware—I’ll be glad 
to check with my staff and get back to you if there was any medical 
information, access to that. I don’t believe there was. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Blood types, diseases, scars, identification 

marks, et cetera, et cetera. 

Mr. SANFORD. I’ll have to get back to you, Senator. 
Senator BILL NELSON. I would appreciate it very much. 
Senator BILL NELSON. Mr. Chairman, I think you see the concern 
welling up here of the extent of which if these folks, which, thank-
fully,  you  all  are  very,  very  accommodating  here  to  want  to  help 
us develop this legislation, but if we are not successful, you can see 
that  no  one  in  America  is  going  to  have  any  privacy  left  if  people 
can  invade  your  databases.  You  say  you  want  to  present—prevent 
that. That’s what we’re trying to do. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator KERRY. Could I just have one quick follow-up? 
Senator SMITH. You bet, absolutely. 
Senator KERRY. Would either of you sell to a political committee? 
Mr. SANFORD. I think you—Senator, we have legal research busi-
ness, news and business information services. There’s nothing that 
would stop them from having access. I don’t think they would qual-
ify for a permissive use under GLBA or the DPPA, though. I mean, 
those  are  around  fraud  detection  and  prevention  and  law  enforce-
ment type of permissive uses. 

Senator KERRY. But is there anything to stop a committee from— 

have you sold anything to a political—— 

Mr. CURLING. Not that I’m aware of, no, Senator. 
Senator KERRY. But could they buy it? 
Mr. CURLING. I don’t believe that’s a customer segment we serve. 
Senator KERRY. But could they? 
Mr.  CURLING.  I  don’t  believe  they  would  get  credentialed.  But  I 
can  find  out.  I’m  not—It’s  not  a  question  I’ve  heard  before.  But  I 
don’t  believe—I’ve  never  heard—I’ve  been  around  with  the  com-
pany—— 

Senator KERRY. Well, do you have a—— 
Mr. CURLING.—since its inception, and—— 
Senator  KERRY.—do  you  have  a  means  of  checking,  sort  of, 

Mr.  CURLING.  We  have  a  business-purpose  criteria  upon  which 
we’ll enroll people as customers. I don’t believe political committees 
meet  the  business  purpose;  therefore,  I  don’t  believe  we  would  set 
up a customer—— 

Senator KERRY. What about a—— 
Mr. CURLING.—account for them. 
Senator  KERRY.—political  consultant  who’s  doing  sophisticated 

political analysis—— 

Mr. CURLING. We don’t—— 
Senator KERRY.—polling analysis? 
Mr.  CURLING.  I  don’t  believe  they’re  customers  of  ours,  nor  do  I 

the—— 

believe we’d serve them. 

with respect to—— 

Senator KERRY. You don’t believe. But there’s no set of guidelines 

Mr.  CURLING.  I’m  trying  to  be  very  specific.  There  are  very  spe-
cific  guidelines  about  who  we  serve  as  customers.  I’ve  never  heard 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

of  this  customer  segment  being  anybody  we  serve.  The  preponder-
ance  of  our  customers  are  large  insurance  companies,  large  finan-
cial  institutions  trying  to  process  transactions  so  a  consumer  can 
get some kind of benefit—an insurance policy, a job—large retailers 
or  large  customers  of  ours.  We  don’t  have  very  many  customers 
that  aren’t  in  the  large  commercial  space  or  government  enter-
prises. 

Senator BILL NELSON. May I ask a follow-up on that? 
But  if  one  of  your  large  commercial  customers  asked  for  this  in-
formation, and you had some reason to know that they were going 
to use it for political purposes—— 

Mr.  CURLING.  Our  customers,  by  and  large,  have  to  send  us— 
they’re  asking  questions  an  application  at  a  time,  so  I’m  not  sure 
how they’d come in and ask that question, anyway. The most likely 
way they could present themselves is through the direct marketing 
business,  where  we  don’t  sell  sensitive,  personal  identifiable  infor-
mation anyway. But, again, I’ll be happy to get back to the Senator 
and the Committee on that. I’m not aware this is a market we have 
any interest or any services to. 

Senator  SMITH.  Like  I  said  at  the—earlier  in  the  hearing,  Sen-
ator,  this  was  a  question  that  didn’t  register  Republican  or  Demo-
crat, but maybe both sides are pretty interested now. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator SMITH. But I think you raise—— 
Senator  KERRY.  Well,  I’ve  seen  some  pretty  sophisticated  anal-

ysis based on those things. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SMITH.  Yes.  But  in  all  seriousness,  I  think  your  point  is 
well  taken,  and  I  think  both  sides  do  have  an  interest  in  making 
sure that people’s rights and privacy are protected. 

And  so,  we  appreciate  very  much,  gentlemen,  your  being  here 
today  and  for  the  contribution  you’ve  made  to  our  understanding 
of  this  issue  and  the  kind  of  problem  we’re  trying  to  wrestle  with 
and  get  some  results  for  the  American  people.  So,  we  thank  you. 
And  we’ll  now  call  forward  our  second  panel.  It  will  consist  of 
Ms.  Jennifer  T.  Barrett,  Chief  Privacy  Officer  of  Acxiom  Corpora-
tion,  in  Little  Rock,  Arkansas;  Mr.  Paul  Kurtz,  Executive  Director 
of  the  Cyber  Security  Industry  Alliance,  Arlington,  Virginia;  Mr. 
Marc  Rotenberg,  President  and  Executive  Director,  Electronic  Pri-
vacy  Information  Center,  in  Washington,  D.C.;  and  Ms.  Mari 
Frank,  of  Mari  J.  Frank,  Esquire,  &  Associates,  of  Laguna  Niguel, 
California. 

Senator Pryor will introduce Ms. Barrett. Thank you all for being 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
It’s  really  an  honor  for  me  to  introduce  to  the  Committee  today 
Jennifer  Barrett.  She’s  the  Chief  Privacy  Officer  at  Acxiom  Cor-
poration. And I think that title is very significant, because, as I un-
derstand  it,  Ms.  Barrett  was  one  of  the  first  chief  privacy  officers 
anywhere  in  the  Nation,  and  I  think  it  underscores  a  commitment 
that this particular company has, of trying to find that balance be-
tween  privacy  issues  and  also  the  burgeoning  information  age  and 
the needs that we have there. 

here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

So, Acxiom is a company that was founded in 1969. I think she’s 
been with the company for a number of years—maybe not since the 
very  beginning,  but  from  the  early  days,  at  least.  And  it  is  based 
in Arkansas. And it employs more than 6,300 people in eight coun-
tries, with an annual revenue of $1.2 billion. 

So, we’re fortunate in our State to have, really, the industry lead-
er  there,  and  we  look  forward  to  hearing  her  insights  on  this  sub-
ject matter today. 

Senator SMITH. Ms. Barrett, why don’t we start with you? 

STATEMENT OF JENNIFER T. BARRETT, 

CHIEF PRIVACY OFFICER, ACXIOM CORPORATION 

Ms. BARRETT. Thank you, Senator Smith and Senator Pryor. And 
thank  you  for  allowing  Acxiom  the  opportunity  to  participate  in 
this important hearing. 

I ask that my written statement be inserted in the record. 
Senator SMITH. Without objection. 
Ms.  BARRETT.  Mr.  Chairman,  let  me  be  blunt.  The  bad  guys  are 
smart,  and  they’re  getting  better  organized  and  using  their  skills 
to  illegally  and  fraudulently  access  information.  Acxiom  must, 
therefore,  remain  vigilant  and  innovative  by  constantly  improving, 
auditing, and testing our systems—and, yes, even learning from se-
curity breaches in the marketplace. Information is an integral part 
of  the  American  economy,  and  Acxiom  recognizes  its  responsibility 
to safeguard the personal information it collects and brings to mar-
ket. 

As FTC Chairman Majoras recently stated in her testimony both 
before  the  Senate  and  the  House,  there’s  no  such  thing  as  perfect 
security, and breaches can happen even when a company has taken 
every  reasonable  precaution.  Although  we  believe  this  is  true,  no 
one  has  a  greater  interest  than  Acxiom  in  protecting  the  informa-
tion  we  have,  because  our  very  existence  depends  on  it  and  how 
well we do that. 

Acxiom’s  U.S.  business  includes  two  distinct  components,  our 
computer services and a line of information products. Our computer 
services,  which  represent  more  than  80  percent  of  the  company’s 
business,  helps  businesses,  not-for-profit  organizations,  political 
parties,  and  government  manage  their  own  information.  Less  than 
20  percent  of  Acxiom’s  business  comes  from  its  four  information 
product 
line,  background 
screening  products,  directory  products,  and  marketing  products. 
Our fraud management and background screening products are the 
only  Acxiom  products  containing  sensitive  information,  and  they 
represent less than 10 percent of our business. 

lines—a  fraud-management  product 

Acxiom  would  like  to  take  this  opportunity  to  set  the  record 
straight  in  a  number  of  misunderstandings  that  have  developed 
about the company: 

First, Acxiom does not maintain one big database containing dos-
siers  on  anyone.  Instead,  we  maintain  discreet,  segregated  data-
bases for each product. 

Second, Acxiom does not commingle our clients’ information from 
our  computer  services  business  with  our  information  products. 
Such  activity  would  constitute  a  violation  of  our  contracts  and  of 
consumer privacy. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Third,  Acxiom’s  fraud-management  products  are  sold  only  to  a 
handful  of  large  companies  and  government  agencies  who  have  a 
legitimate  need  for  them.  The  information  utilized  in  these  prod-
ucts  is  covered  under  the  Safeguards  Rules  and  Use  Rules  of 
Gramm-Leach-Bliley,  and  both  State  and  Federal  driver  privacy 
protection laws. 

Fourth,  Acxiom’s  fraud-management  verification  services  only 
validate  information  already  in  the  client’s  possession.  Access  to 
additional information is available only to law enforcement and the 
internal  fraud  departments  of  large  financial  institutions  and  in-
surance companies. 

Fifth,  our  background  screening  products  are  covered  under  the 
Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act,  and  we  do  not  pre-aggregate  any  of  the 
information provided. 

Beyond  these  protections,  there  are  additional  safeguards  that 

exist: 

First, because public information is blended with regulated infor-
mation  in  both  our  fraud-management  and  background  screening 
products,  Acxiom  voluntarily  applies  the  more  stringent  security 
standard  to  all  such  blended  data,  even  though  not  required  to  by 
law. 

Second,  since  1997,  Acxiom  has  posted  its  privacy  policy  on  our 
website,  describing  our  online  and  offline  practices;  thus,  volun-
tarily subjecting the company to FTC rules governing unfair or de-
ceptive conduct. 

Third,  the  company  has  imposed  our  own  internal,  more  restric-
tive  guidelines  for  the  use  of  sensitive  information  such  as  Social 
Security numbers. 

Fourth,  all  of  Acxiom’s  information  products  and  practices  have 
been audited on an annual basis since 1997, and our security poli-
cies  are  regularly  audited,  both  internally  and  by  many  of  our  cli-
ents. 

Two  years  ago,  Acxiom  experienced  a  security  breach  on  one  of 
our  external  file-transfer  servers.  Fortunately,  the  vast  majority  of 
information involved was of a nonsensitive nature, and law enforce-
ment  was  able  to  apprehend  the  suspects  and  ascertained  that 
none  of  the  information  was  used  to  commit  identity  fraud.  Since 
then, Acxiom has put in place even greater protections for the ben-
efit of both consumers and our clients. 

In  conclusion,  ongoing  privacy  concerns  indicate  that  the  adop-
tion  of  additional  legislation  may  be  appropriate.  Acxiom  supports 
efforts  to  pass  federally  preemptive  legislation  requiring  notice  to 
the  consumers  in  the  event  of  a  security  breach  which  places  con-
sumers  at  risk  of  identity  fraud.  Acxiom  also  supports  the  recent 
proposal from FTC Chairman Majoras for extension of the Gramm- 
Leach-Bliley Safeguards Rules. 

Senator  Smith,  on  behalf  of  Acxiom,  I  want  to  express  my  grati-
tude for the opportunity to participate in this hearing. I’ll be happy 
to answer any questions the Committee may have. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Barrett follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JENNIFER T. BARRETT, 
CHIEF PRIVACY OFFICER, ACXIOM CORPORATION 

Summary 

Acxiom  has  an  inherent  responsibility  to  safeguard  the  personal  information  we 
collect  and  bring  to  the  market,  and  we  have  focused  on  assuring  the  appropriate 
use  of  these  products  and  providing  a  safe  environment  for  this  information  since 
1991 when the company brought its first information products to market. 

Information has become an ever growing and ever more integral part of the Amer-
ican  economy.  Information  is  the  facilitator  of  convenience  and  competition,  and  it 
provides  the  tools  that  reduce  fraud  and  terrorism.  As  such,  we  believe  that  it  is 
Acxiom’s  obligation  to  provide  effective  safeguards  to  protect  the  information  we 
bring to market regardless of the difficulties encountered in doing so. 

Only Acxiom’s fraud management and background screening products involve the 
transfer of sensitive information. These products, therefore, are subject to law, regu-
lations and our own company policies that help protect against misuse. 

GLBA  and  DPPA:  Our  fraud  management  products  utilize  information  covered 
under  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act  (GLBA),  and  driver’s  license  information 
covered  under  both  State  and  Federal  driver’s  privacy  protection  acts  (DPPAs). 
FCRA and FACTA: Our background screening products are covered by all of the 
regulations  and  consumer  protections  established  by  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting 
Act (FCRA) and the Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions Act (FACTA). 
Safeguarding Public Record Information: Although a heightened level of protec-
tion  is  not  mandated  for  public  record  information,  by  virtue  of  the  fact  that 
such  public  information  is  blended  with  regulated  information,  Acxiom  volun-
tarily chooses to apply the more stringent standards of the above-mentioned reg-
ulations to the resulting products. 

Although Acxiom’s directory and marketing products do not contain any sensitive 
information that could put a consumer at risk for identity fraud, Acxiom is still sub-
ject to the following critical safeguards: various industry guidelines, compliance with 
all  requirements  in  the  original  notice  to  consumers  at  the  time  the  data  was  col-
lected,  and  voluntary  compliance  with  those  laws  to  which  our  clients  themselves 
are subject. 

There has been much discussion, especially in recent weeks, about whether exist-
ing  Federal  law  sufficiently  protects  consumers  from  harm.  In  this  regard,  Acxiom 
does  believe  that  additional,  appropriately  tailored  measures,  such  as  Federal  pre-
emptive  legislation  requiring  notice  to  consumers  in  the  event  of  a  security  breach, 
would  assist  Acxiom,  the  rest  of  the  information  services  industry  and  businesses 
in  general  in  ensuring  that  consumers  are  protected  from  fraud  and  identity  theft. 
But, as FTC Chairman Majoras has said, even the best security systems imaginable 
and the strongest laws possible can nonetheless be circumvented by inventive crimi-
nals’ intent on committing fraud. 
Introduction 

Chairman Stevens, Senator Inouye, and distinguished members of the Committee, 
thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  to  explore  the  treatment  of  data  broker  services 
under  existing  State  and  Federal  laws  as  well  as  possible  solutions  to  the  crime  of 
identity  theft.  Acxiom  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  today’s  hearing. 
Acxiom  has  an  inherent  responsibility  to  safeguard  the  personal  information  we 
collect  and  bring  to  the  market,  and  we  have  focused  on  assuring  the  appropriate 
use  of  these  products  and  providing  a  safe  environment  for  this  information  since 
1991 when the company brought its first information products to market. 

It is important that we all recognize that information has become an ever growing 
and ever more integral part of the American economy. Information is the facilitator 
of convenience, competition and provides the tools that reduce fraud and terrorism. 
As  such,  we  believe  that  it  is  Acxiom’s  obligation  to  provide  effective  safeguards  to 
protect the information we bring to market regardless of the difficulties encountered 
in doing so. 

Let  me  be  blunt.  The  bad  guys  are  smart  and  getting  more  organized.  They  will 
use  all  of  the  skills  available  to  them  to  try  to  find  ways  to  obtain  the  information 
they  need  to  commit  fraud.  Acxiom  must  therefore  remain  vigilant  and  innovative, 
and  that  is  why  we  employ  a  world-class  information  security  staff  to  help  us  fend 
off  criminals  who  attempt  to  access  Acxiom’s  data.  Acxiom  is  constantly  improving, 
auditing  and  testing  its  systems.  Yes,  Acxiom  is  even  learning  from  security 
breaches when they occur, and we are certain that other responsible companies are 
doing so as well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Acxiom’s  U.S.  business  includes  two  distinct  components:  customized  computer 
services  and  a  line  of  information  products.  Acxiom’s  computer  services  represent 
the vast majority of the company’s business and they include a wide array of leading 
technologies  and  specialized  computer  services  focused  on  helping  clients  manage 
their own customer information. These services are offered exclusively to large busi-
nesses, not-for-profit organizations, political parties and candidates, and government 
agencies.  Acxiom’s  private  sector  computer  services  clients  represent  a  ‘‘who’s  who’’ 
of  America’s  leading  companies.  Acxiom  helps  these  clients  improve  the  loyalty  of 
their  customers  and  increase  their  market  share,  while  reducing  risk  and  assisting 
them  with  their  compliance  responsibilities  under  State  and  Federal  law.  Finally, 
Acxiom helps government agencies improve the accuracy of the personal information 
they currently hold. 

The  balance  of  Acxiom’s  business  comes  from  information  products  that  are  com-
prised  of  four  categories:  fraud  management  products,  background  screening  prod-
ucts, directory products and marketing products. These four product lines represent 
less than 20 percent of the company’s total business and the fraud management and 
background  screening  products  represent  less  than  10  percent.  While  each  product 
plays a unique role, all of Acxiom’s information products help fill an important gap 
in today’s business-to-consumer relationship. 

To  understand  the  critical  role  Acxiom  plays  in  facilitating  the  Nation’s  economy 
and  safeguarding  consumers,  it  is  important  to  understand  what  the  company  does 
not  do.  Over  the  years,  a  number  of  myths  have  developed  about  Acxiom  that  re-
quire clarification. Please allow us to set the record straight: 

49 

As  Chairman  Deborah  Majoras  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  recently  stated 
in  her  testimony  before  the  Senate,  ‘‘[T]here  is  no  such  thing  as  perfect  security, 
and  breaches  can  happen  even  when  a  company  has  taken  every  reasonable  pre-
caution.’’  Even  though  we  believe  that  this  is  true,  no  one  has  a  greater  interest 
than  Acxiom  in  protecting  information  because  the  company’s  very  existence  de-
pends on securing personal information pertaining to consumers. 

In order to enjoy the benefits provided by a robust information-based economy and 
also  to  keep  our  citizens  safe  from  fraudulent  activity,  there  are  no  quick  fixes  or 
easy  solutions.  We  believe  that  it  is  necessary  that  cooperation  exists  among  policy 
makers,  information  service  providers,  Acxiom’s  clients,  law  enforcement  and  con-
sumers. We applaud your interest in exploring these issues and we very much want 
to  be  a  resource  in  helping  you  achieve  the  proper  legislative  balance  we  all  seek. 
About Acxiom Corporation 

Founded  in  1969,  Acxiom  is  headquartered  in  Little  Rock,  Arkansas,  with  oper-
ations  throughout  the  United  States,  and  with  processing  centers  in  Arkansas,  Illi-
nois, Arizona, Ohio and California. The company also has offices in nine other coun-
tries across Europe and Asia. From a small company in Arkansas, Acxiom Corpora-
tion  has  grown  into  a  publicly  traded  corporation  with  more  than  6,000  employees 
worldwide 

• Acxiom  does  not  maintain  one  big  database  that  contains  detailed  information 
about all individuals. Instead, the company safeguards discrete databases devel-
oped  and  tailored  to  meet  the  specific  needs  of  Acxiom’s  clients—entities  that 
are  appropriately  screened  and  with  whom  Acxiom  has  legally  enforceable  con-
tractual commitments. I cannot call up from the company’s databases a detailed 
dossier on myself or any individual. 
• Acxiom  does  not  provide  information  on  particular  individuals  to  the  public, 
with  the  exception  of  Acxiom’s  telephone  directory  products.  These  products, 
which  are  available  on  several  Internet  search  engines,  contain  information  al-
ready  available  to  the  public.  The  other  information  Acxiom  processes  is  pro-
vided only to legitimate businesses for specific, legitimate business purposes. 
• Acxiom’s  does  not  have  any  information  in  either  its  directory  or  marketing 
products  which  could  be  used  to  commit  identity  fraud.  Acxiom  also  does  not 
include  detailed  or  specific  transaction-related  information,  such  as  what  pur-
chases  an  individual  made  on  the  Internet  or  what  websites  they  visited.  The 
company’s  directory  products  include  only  name,  address,  and  telephone  infor-
mation. The company’s marketing products include only information that is gen-
eral in nature and not specific to an individual purchase or transaction. 
• Acxiom does not commingle client information that the company processes in its 
computer  services  business  with  any  of  our  information  products.  Such  activity 
would  constitute  a  violation  of  the  company’s  services  contracts  with  those  cli-
ents  and  a  violation  of  consumer  privacy.  A  client  for  whom  the  company  per-
forms  services  may  have  a  different  agreement  with  us  as  a  data  contributor, 
but these two relationships are kept entirely separate. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

Acxiom’s  fraud  management  products  are  sold  exclusively  to  a  handful  of  large 
companies  and  government  agencies—they  are  not  sold  to  individuals.  The  com-
pany’s  verification  services  only  validate  that  the  information  our  client  has  ob-
tained  from  the  consumer  is  correct.  Only  law  enforcement,  government  agencies 
and  the  internal  fraud  departments  of  large  financial  institutions  and  insurance 
companies have access to additional information. 

Acxiom’s  background  screening  products  provide  employment  and  tenant  screen-
ing  services  which  utilize  field  researchers  who  do  in-person,  real-time  research 
against  public  records  and  make  calls  to  past  employers  to  verify  the  information 
provided by the consumer. Where permitted by law, a pre-employment credit report 
can also be obtained. Acxiom does not pre-aggregate information for these products. 
Acxiom’s  directory  information  products  contain  only  contact  information  on  con-
sumers  such  as  name,  address  and  telephone  number.  They  are  collected  so  busi-
nesses and consumers can locate other businesses or consumers. They are compiled 
from  the  white  and  yellow  pages  of  published  U.S.  and  Canadian  telephone  direc-
tories and from information available from the various directory assistance services 
provided by the telephone companies. 

Acxiom’s marketing information products provide demographic, lifestyle and inter-
est information to companies to reach prospective new customers who are most like-
ly  to  have  an  interest  in  their  products  and  to  better  understand  and  serve  the 
needs  of  existing  customers.  They  are  compiled  from  pubic  records,  surveys  and 
summarized customer information primarily from publishers and catalogers. 
Respecting and Protecting Consumers’ Privacy 

Acxiom  has  a  longstanding  tradition  and  engrained  culture  of  protecting  and  re-
specting consumer interests in our business. The company is today, and always has 
been,  a  leader  in  developing  self-regulatory  guidelines  and  in  establishing  security 
policies  and  privacy  practices.  There  are,  as  explained  below,  numerous  laws  and 
regulations  that  govern  our  business.  Ultimately,  however,  Acxiom’s  own  com-
prehensive  approach  to  information  use  and  security  goes  far  beyond  what  is  re-
quired by either law or self-regulation. 
Safeguards  Applicable  to  Products  Involving  the  Transfer  of  Sensitive  Information 
Only Acxiom’s fraud management and background screening products involve the 
transfer of sensitive information. These products, therefore, are subject to law, regu-
lations and our own company policies that help protect against identity fraud. These 
legal protections and additional safeguards are addressed below: 

GLBA,  DPPAs,  and  FTC:  Our  fraud  management  products  utilize  information 
covered  under  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act  (GLBA),  and  driver’s  license  infor-
mation  covered  under  both  State  and  Federal  driver’s  privacy  protection  acts 
(DPPAs). These obligations include honoring GLBA and DPPA notice and choice 
related  to  sharing  and  use  of  the  information,  the  GLBA  Safeguard  Rules  and 
FTC Privacy Rule and Interagency Guidelines. Any uses of data must fall with-
in one of the permitted uses or exceptions specified in these laws. 
FCRA and FACTA: Our background screening products are covered by all of the 
regulations  and  consumer  protections  established  by  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting 
Act (FCRA) and the Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions Act (FACTA). These 
protections  include:  the  requirement  that  a  consumer  authorize  the  creation  of 
employment  reports;  notice  of  adverse  actions  taken  based  on  such  report;  and 
the right of consumers to obtain a copy of such reports and to dispute inaccura-
cies.  Finally,  such  regulations  require  that  re-verification  or  correction  of  dis-
puted information be performed in a timely manner. 
Safeguarding  Public  Record  Information:  Public  records  are  used  in  both 
Acxiom’s  fraud  management  and  background  screening  products.  Although  a 
heightened  level  of  protection  is  not  mandated  for  such  public  record  informa-
tion, by virtue of the fact that such public information is blended with regulated 
information,  Acxiom  voluntarily  chooses  to  apply  the  more  stringent  standards 
of the above-mentioned regulations to the resulting products. 

Safeguards Applicable to Other Products 

Although Acxiom’s directory and marketing products do not contain any sensitive 
information that could put a consumer at risk for identity fraud, Acxiom is still sub-
ject to the following critical safeguards: various industry guidelines, compliance with 
all  requirements  in  the  original  notice  to  consumers  at  the  time  the  data  was  col-
lected,  and  voluntary  compliance  with  those  laws  to  which  our  clients  themselves 
are subject. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

Telephone Directory Safeguards: Acxiom’s directory products comply with all ap-
plicable policies regarding unpublished and unlisted telephone numbers and ad-
dresses.  In  addition,  because  Acxiom  recognizes  that  consumers  may  object  to 
published  listings  being  available  on  the  Internet,  Acxiom  itself  offers  an  opt- 
out  from  such  use.  Further,  Acxiom  voluntarily  suppresses  all  telephone  num-
bers  found  on  the  Federal  Trade  Commission’s  Do-Not-Call  Registry  and  the 
eleven  other  State  Do-Not-Call  registries,  when  providing  phone  numbers  for 
targeted telemarketing purposes. 
Marketing  Product  Safeguards:  Acxiom’s  marketing  products  comply  with  all 
the self-regulatory guidelines issued by the Direct Marketing Association. These 
requirements include notice and the opportunity to opt-out. Consumers have the 
ability  to  opt-out  from  Acxiom’s  marketing  products  by  calling  the  company’s 
toll-free Consumer Hotline, accessing its website, or by writing to the company. 
Since Acxiom does not have a customer relationship with individual consumers, 
Acxiom  coordinates  with  its  industry  clients  to  research  and  resolve  consumer 
inquiries. 

Additional Safeguards 

Acxiom  takes  seriously  its  responsibility  to  assure  that  all  the  information  we 
bring  to  market  is  appropriate  for  the  use  to  which  it  is  intended  and  to  provide 
adequate safeguards specifically aimed at protecting against unauthorized use. 

Privacy Policy/FTC Jurisdiction: Since 1997, long before it was a common prac-
tice, Acxiom has posted its privacy policy on the company’s website. The privacy 
policy describes both Acxiom’s online and offline consumer information products. 
The policy further describes: what data Acxiom collects for these products; how 
such  data  is  used;  the  types  of  clients  to  which  such  data  is  licensed;  as  well 
as  the  choices  available  to  consumers  as  to  how  such  data  is  used.  By  making 
these extensive disclosures, Acxiom has voluntarily subjected itself to Section 5 
of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  Act,  which  prohibits  unfair  or  deceptive  con-
duct  in  the  course  of  trade  or  commerce,  as  well  as  various  State  statutes  gov-
erning unfair and deceptive acts and practices. 
Consumer  Care  Department/Consumer  Hotline:  Acxiom  maintains  a  Consumer 
Care  Department  led  by  a  Consumer  Advocate  whose  team  interacted  with 
more  than  50,000  consumers  in  the  past  12  months  by  way  of  answering  ques-
tions,  resolving  issues,  processing  opt-outs,  and  handling  requests  for  access  to 
Acxiom’s  fraud  management,  background  screening,  directory  and  marketing 
products.  Acxiom  provides  consumers  who  contact  the  company  (through  the 
company website, or by calling a toll-free Consumer Hotline or by writing to the 
company)  the  options  of:  opting-out  of  all  of  Acxiom’s  marketing  products;  re-
ceiving an information report from the company’s fraud management and direc-
tory products; or receiving a consumer report as specified in the FCRA from the 
company’s background screening products. Acxiom encourages consumers to no-
tify  the  company  if  the  information  in  any  of  these  reports  is  inaccurate  and 
it  is  the  company’s  policy  either  to  correct  the  information,  to  delete  it  or  to 
refer the consumer to the appropriate source to obtain the requested correction, 
such as a county or State agency. 
Certification and Compliance with Federal and State Law: Acxiom’s privacy pol-
icy  is  designed  to  adhere  to  all  Federal,  State,  and  local  laws  and  regulations 
on the use of personal information. The company is also certified under the De-
partment of Commerce’s European Union Safe Harbor and the Better Business 
Bureau’s Online Seal. 
Consumer Education: Acxiom believes that consumers should be educated about 
how businesses use information. To that end, Acxiom publishes a booklet, enti-
tled  ‘‘Protecting  Your  Privacy  in  the  Information  Age—What  Every  Consumer 
Should  Know  About  the  Use  of  Individual  Information,’’  which  is  available  for 
free both on the company’s website and upon written or telephone request. 
Voluntary  Acxiom  Policies:  Above  and  beyond  the  industry-accepted  guidelines 
with  which  Acxiom  complies,  Acxiom  also  has  established  its  own  internal 
guidelines,  which  are  more  restrictive  than  industry  standards.  For  example, 
Acxiom  only  collects  the  specific  information  required  to  meet  its  clients’  infor-
mation  needs,  and  the  company  properly  disposes  of  the  remaining  data,  when 
information is compiled from public records. Acxiom has also implemented spe-
cific  guidelines  regarding  the  use  and  protection  of  information  that  could  be 
involved in identity fraud, such as Social Security numbers. 
Information Practice and Security Audits: Acxiom has had a longstanding focus 
on  the  appropriate  use  of  information  in  developing  and  delivering  its  informa-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

tion products. While the creation of strong information use policies is a business 
imperative,  assuring  these  policies  are  followed  is  equally  important.  To  this 
end, all of Acxiom’s information products and practices have been internally and 
externally audited on an annual basis since 1997. 
Since  many  of  Acxiom’s  computer  service  clients  are  financial  institutions  and 
insurance agencies, Acxiom has been regularly audited for many years by these 
clients.  Furthermore,  Acxiom  must  honor  the  safeguards  and  security  policies 
of  the  company’s  clients.  Since  Acxiom’s  security  program  is  enterprise-wide,  it 
is  the  company’s  policy  to  institute  these  high  levels  of  protection  across  all 
lines of business. These client audits, along with Acxiom’s own internal security 
audits,  provide  Acxiom  with  regular  and  valuable  feedback  on  ways  to  stay 
ahead  of  hackers  and  fraudsters  who  may  attempt  to  gain  unauthorized  access 
to Acxiom’s systems. 

Lessons Learned 

Two years ago, Acxiom experienced a security breach on one of the company’s ex-
ternal  file  transfer  servers.  The  hackers  were  employees  of  an  Acxiom  client  and  a 
client’s  contractor.  As  users  with  legitimate  access  to  the  server,  the  hackers  had 
received authority to transfer and receive their own files. The hackers did not pene-
trate the firewalls to Acxiom’s main system. They did, however, exceed their author-
ity  when  they  accessed  an  encrypted  password  file  on  the  server  and  successfully 
unencrypted  about  10  percent  of  the  passwords,  which  allowed  them  to  gain  access 
to other client files on the server. Fortunately, the vast majority of the information 
involved in this incident was of a non-sensitive nature. 

Upon learning of the initial breach from law enforcement, Acxiom immediately no-
tified  all  affected  clients  and,  upon  further  forensic  investigation,  the  company  in-
formed  law  enforcement  regarding  a  second  suspected  security  incident.  Fortu-
nately,  in  both  instances,  law  enforcement  was  able  to  apprehend  the  suspects,  re-
cover  the  affected  information  and  ascertain  that  none  of  the  information  was  used 
to commit identity fraud. One of the hackers pled guilty and was recently sentenced 
to 48 months in Federal prison. The other is currently awaiting trial. 

As  a  result  of  the  breach,  Acxiom  cooperated  with  audits  conducted  by  dozens  of 
its  clients,  and  both  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  and  the  Office  of  the  Comp-
troller  of  the  Currency  examined  Acxiom’s  processes  to  ensure  that  the  company 
was in compliance with all applicable laws and its own stated policies. 

This  experience  taught  Acxiom  additional  valuable  lessons  regarding  the  protec-
tion of information. For example, Acxiom now requires the use of more secure pass-
words  on  the  affected  server.  The  process  for  transferring  files  has  been  changed, 
specifically  by  keeping  information  on  the  server  for  much  shorter  periods  of  time. 
And  while  it  was  always  a  recommended  internal  policy,  Acxiom  now  requires  that 
all sensitive information passed across such servers be encrypted. In addition, while 
Acxiom  has  had  in  place  a  Security  Oversight  Committee  for  many  years,  the  com-
pany  has  also  now  appointed  a  Chief  Security  Officer  with  more  than  20  years  of 
IT  experience.  In  short,  Acxiom’s  systems  are  more  secure  today  as  a  result  of  the 
company’s experience and dedication to the privacy of consumers. 
The Need For Additional Legislative Safeguards 

There has been much discussion, especially in recent weeks, about whether exist-
ing  Federal  law  sufficiently  protects  consumers  from  harm.  In  this  regard,  Acxiom 
does  believe  that  additional,  appropriately  tailored  legislation  would  assist  Acxiom, 
the  rest  of  the  information  services  industry  and  businesses  in  general  in  ensuring 
that consumers are protected from fraud and identity theft. But, as FTC Chairman 
Majoras has said, even the best security systems imaginable and the strongest laws 
possible  can  nonetheless  be  circumvented  by  inventive  criminals’  intent  on  commit-
ting fraud. 

Breach Notification: Acxiom supports efforts to pass Federal preemptive legisla-
tion requiring notice to consumers in the event of a security breach, where such 
breach  places  consumers  at  risk  of  identity  theft  or  fraud.  California  imple-
mented  similar  legislation  several  years  ago,  and  over  thirty  other  states  are 
involved  in  passing  similar  laws.  The  bottom  line  is  that  consumers  deserve  a 
nationwide  mandate  that  requires  that  they  be  notified  when  they  are  at  risk 
of identity theft, so they can take appropriate steps to protect themselves. 
Extension of the GLBA Safeguards Rule: Currently, Acxiom voluntarily subjects 
itself  to  the  GLBA  Safeguards  Rule  with  respect  to  the  company’s  computer 
services  and  information  products.  Acxiom  also  complies  with  the  California 
safeguards law (AB 1950). FTC Chairman Majoras recently has proposed an ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

tension  of  the  GLBA  Safeguards  Rule  to  the  information  services  industry  as 
a whole. Acxiom supports her recommendation. 

Mr.  Chairman,  Acxiom  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  participate  in  this  hearing 
and to assist Congress in identifying how best to safeguard the Nation’s information 
and  data.  Acxiom  is  available  to  provide  any  additional  information  the  Committee 
may request. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you, Ms. Barrett. 
Mr. Kurtz? 

STATEMENT OF PAUL B. KURTZ, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

CYBER SECURITY INDUSTRY ALLIANCE (CSIA) 

Mr. KURTZ. Thank you, Senator Smith. It’s a pleasure to be here 
today. Thank you for inviting the Cyber Security Industry Alliance 
to testify before this Committee. As Executive Director of CSIA, I’m 
pleased to speak about the importance of securing personal identity 
information. 

Prior  to  leading  CSIA,  I  served  for  16  years  in  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment,  12  years  at  the  State  Department  and  4  years  at  the 
White House, where I served on the National Security Council and 
the  Homeland  Security  Council,  working  on  counterterrorism  and 
critical infrastructure protection. 

CSIA is an organization of 15 CEOs consisting of the world’s top 
security  providers  who  offer  the  technical  expertise  and  depth  of 
focus and encourage a better understanding of cybersecurity policy 
issues.  We  believe  ensuring  the  security,  the  integrity,  and  the 
availability  of  global  information  systems  is  fundamental  to  eco-
nomic and national security. 

We need, simply, to come to terms with our reliance on informa-
tion  systems  and  the  vast  amount  of  personal  information  in  stor-
age and in transit in such systems. Our information systems must 
be  secure  and  reliable—in  particular,  protecting  personal  informa-
tion  from  unauthorized  disclosure.  We  need  a  strategic  approach 
that  is  more  preventative  or  preemptive  in  nature,  rather  than 
largely reactive and defensive, as a recent CRS study on cybersecu-
rity indicates. 

Every electronic breach of personal information is another reason 
for  consumers  to  lose  trust  in  our  information  systems.  A  recent 
survey  conducted  by  the  Poneman  Institute  revealed  that  57  per-
cent of consumers with high trust in their primary banks say they 
would cease all online services with their current bank in the event 
of  a  single  security  breach.  The  loss  of  trust  or  confidence  in  our 
information  systems  inhibits  economic  growth,  the  security  of  our 
citizens and Nation. 

CSIA believes the right approach to securing consumers’ personal 
data  requires  a  blend  of  appropriate  policies,  technical  expertise, 
and  security  technologies.  Let  me  be  clear,  we  are  not  mandating 
specific technology solutions. A key question before this Committee 
is defining the government’s role, whether directly or indirectly, in 
fostering the protection of personal information on information sys-
tems  owned  and  operated  by  the  private  sector.  This  Committee, 
rightfully,  will  also  examine  where  the  marketplace  is  succeeding 
at protecting personal information, and where it is failing. 

At  this  critical  time  of  technology  development  and  innovation, 
the  United  States,  as  an  economic  force  and  a  global  technology 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

leader, must carefully chart a public-policy approach to information 
security  that  continues  to  encourage  innovation  while  also  pro-
viding protection. 

There is no silver-bullet approach solution. There are two funda-
mental areas requiring protection: the storage of personal informa-
tion,  such  as  names,  addresses,  and  Social  Security  numbers,  and 
the  movement  of  the  data.  Movement  of  the  data  amplifies  the 
challenge of security, because it creates weak points, if you will, in 
the  system.  The  movement  of  data  makes  it  difficult  to  define  the 
set of users who should take action to secure the personal informa-
tion. 

So,  what  is  the  solution  set?  It  involves  a  combination  of  tech-
nologies,  policies,  and  expertise.  Key  policies  and  technologies  in-
clude vetting employees, establishing and enforcing corporate secu-
rity  policies,  encryption,  auditing,  monitoring,  anti-virus,  intrusion 
detection,  and  firewalls,  strong  authentication  and  access  controls. 
These  technologies,  in  particular,  are  critical,  as  passwords  are  in-
herently weak and easily compromised. 

Market  adoption  of  security  technologies,  however,  is  mixed. 
Some  enterprises,  however,  are  beginning  to  see  security  as  a 
means to differentiate themselves from their competition. Congress 
should examine the protection of personal information more broad-
ly  than  just  the  data  brokers,  as  other  organizations  possess  sig-
nificant  amounts  of  personal  data.  We  have  seen  evidence  of  those 
breaches in recent days. 

In  this  context,  CSIA  recommends  Congress  consider  the  fol-

lowing: 

new ones. 

Take  a  holistic  approach  to  understanding  what  cybersecurity 
problems  are,  such  as  spyware,  phishing,  data-warehouse  security. 
They  are,  in  fact,  all  related.  In  each  case,  the  target  is  personal 
information in order to commit electronic fraud. 

Two,  harmonize  any  legislation  with  existing  legislation  at  the 
Federal level, filling gaps rather than duplicating requirements al-
ready contained in existing law. 

Use  existing  standards  wherever  possible,  rather  than  creating 

Preempt State law, where appropriate, in order to avoid a patch-
work  quilt  of  regulations  relating  to  the  security  of  personal  infor-
mation. 

Encourage the broader use of security technologies without man-
dating  such  solutions.  California,  the  Data  base  Protection  Act, 
1386,  which  went  into  effect  in  July  2003,  encourages  the 
encryption of personal information without mandating it. 

Investigate incentives, including safe harbors, tax benefits, third- 
party or self-certification, insurance, and adoption of best practices. 
Increase penalties for identity theft and cybercrimes, and ensure 

appropriate resources are available. 

Ratify  the  Council  of  Europe’s  Convention  on  Cybercrime,  which 
will  create  a  global  framework  for  prosecuting  and  investigating 
cybercriminals. We need to see this in a global fashion. 

We need, also, to have leadership on the part of Federal Govern-
ment,  the  formation  of—or,  excuse  me,  an  Assistant  Secretary  at 
DHS focus on cybersecurity will be helpful. 

And we also can’t forget R&D. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

Let  me  close  by  noting,  again,  the  recent  CRS  study  on  cyberse-
curity.  The  study  states  there  is  currently  no  unified  national 
framework for improving cybersecurity, and there are several areas 
of  weaknesses  where  such  a  framework  could  be  useful  in  gener-
ating improvements, and several means of leverage exist that could 
be  used  in  the  development  or  implementation  of  such  a  frame-
work. 

We  believe  the  points  noted  above  offer,  if  you  will,  guideposts 

for the government’s role in creating such a framework. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  Thank  you  very 

much. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Kurtz follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PAUL B. KURTZ, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

CYBER SECURITY INDUSTRY ALLIANCE (CSIA) 

Thank you Chairman Stevens and Co-Chairman Inouye for inviting the Cyber Se-
curity  Industry  Alliance  (CSIA)  to  testify  before  this  committee  on  Identity  Theft/ 
Data  Broker  Services.  As  Executive  Director  of  CSIA,  I  am  pleased  to  speak  about 
the importance of securing personal identifying information. 

The Federal Trade Commission estimates that 27 million Americans were victims 
of  some  kind  of  ID  theft  in  the  past  five  years.  Other  studies  suggest  1  in  20  U.S. 
citizens  have  been  hit  by  electronic  fraud.  The  numbers  are  staggering.  Every  elec-
tronic  breach  of  personal  information  is  another  reason  for  consumers  to  lose  trust 
in our information systems. A recent survey conducted by the Poneman Institute re-
vealed that 57 percent of consumers with high trust in their primary bank say they 
would cease all online services with their current bank in the event of a single pri-
vacy breach. The loss of trust or confidence in our information systems inhibits eco-
nomic  growth,  our  security  as  citizens  as  well  as  a  nation.  CSIA  believes  the  right 
approach to securing consumers’ personal data requires a blend of appropriate poli-
cies, technical expertise and security technologies. 

A  central  question  before  this  Committee  today  is  defining  the  government’s 
role—whether  directly  or  indirectly—in  protecting  personal  information  residing  on 
information  systems  owned  and  operated  by  the  private  sector.  This  Committee, 
rightfully,  will  also  look  at  where  the  marketplace  is  succeeding  at  protecting  per-
sonal information and where it is failing. At this critical time of technology develop-
ment  and  innovation,  the  United  States,  as  an  economic  force  and  a  global  tech-
nology leader, must carefully chart a public policy approach to information security 
that continues to encourage innovation while also providing protections. 

In my testimony today, I will cover four areas. 
• A brief introduction to CSIA; 
• Security challenges in securing electronic data; 
• Solutions and market activity; and 
• Recommendations for Congress’ consideration in securing electronic data. 

Introduction to CSIA 

CSIA  is  dedicated  to  enhancing  cybersecurity  through  public  policy  initiatives, 
public  sector  partnerships,  corporate  outreach,  academic  programs,  alignment  be-
hind  emerging  industry  technology  standards  and  public  education.  CSIA  is  led  by 
CEOs  from  the  world’s  top  security  providers,  who  offer  the  technical  expertise, 
depth and focus to encourage a better understanding of cyber security policy issues. 
We  believe  that  ensuring  the  security,  integrity  and  availability  of  global  informa-
tion  systems  is  fundamental  to  economic  and  national  security.  We  are  committed 
to  working  with  the  public  sector  to  research,  create  and  implement  effective  agen-
das  related  to  national  and  international  compliance,  privacy,  cybercrime,  and  eco-
nomic  and  national  security.  We  work  closely  with  other  associations  representing 
vendors, critical infrastructure owners and operators, as well as consumers. 

CSIA’s  initiatives  range  from  examining  the  cybersecurity  implications  of  Sar-
banes-Oxley  to  the  security  and  reliability  of  Internet  telephony,  also  known  as 
Voice  over  IP,  to  advocating  more  government  leadership  in  identifying  and  pro-
tecting critical information infrastructure. 

CSIA understands that the private sector bears a significant burden for improving 
cyber security. CSIA embraces the concept of sharing that responsibility between in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

formation technology suppliers and operators to improve cyber security. Cyber secu-
rity also requires bi-partisan government leadership. 

Members of the CSIA include BindView Corp.; Check Point Software Technologies 
Ltd.;  Citadel  Security  Software  Inc.;  Citrix  Systems,  Inc.;  Computer  Associates 
International, Inc.; Entrust, Inc.; Internet Security Systems Inc.; iPass Inc.; Juniper 
Networks,  Inc.;  McAfee,  Inc;  PGP  Corporation;  Qualys,  Inc.;  RSA  Security  Inc.;  Se-
cure  Computing  Corporation;  Symantec  Corporation  and  TechGuard  Security,  LLC. 
Challenges in Securing Electronic Data 

Many  large  organizations,  from  corporations  to  universities  and  health  care  sys-
tems,  are  conducting  more  of  their  business  using  network  technology  such  as  the 
Internet.  Therefore,  customers,  employees,  students  and  patients  are  having  their 
personally identifiable information gathered into vast electronic data storage reposi-
tories. Some industries already have requirements to protect personally identifiable 
information, such as the banking and health communities. Laws and regulations are 
being created at various levels to address security and privacy because the criminal 
activity related to stealing these electronic data is increasing exponentially. Multiple 
laws  requiring  potentially  different  requirements  will  quickly  make  compliance  an 
overly complex task. 

The problem of ensuring security and confidentiality of electronic data is complex. 
There  are  two  fundamental  areas  requiring  protection.  The  first  is  protecting  the 
storage  of  personal  information  in  data  warehouses  such  as  names,  addresses  and 
Social Security numbers. The second is protecting the movement of these data to and 
from the data warehouse. 

Technical security safeguards are used to address both the storage and movement 
issues.  Policy  is  also  crucial  for  it  governs  implementation  of  the  technical  safe-
guards  and  access  to  the  data.  Movement  of  the  data  amplifies  the  challenge  of  se-
curity  because  it  creates  weak  points  in  the  system.  Those  points  are  often  outside 
the direct control of security administrators overseeing data warehouses. The move-
ment  of  data  makes  it  difficult  to  define  the  set  of  users  who  should  take  action  to 
ensure the security of personal information by a select group. Therefore, policy and 
best practices play a pivotal role in shoring up weak points. 

The core information technology application of large data holders is a ‘‘data ware-
house.’’ It accumulates disparate records then analyzes, stores and distributes a vast 
amalgamation  of  information—billions  of  records  about  hundreds  of  millions  of 
Americans.  Many  elements  of  the  technology  require  special  provisioning  for  secu-
rity,  including  applications,  systems  and  networks.  A  secure  solution  requires  secu-
rity provisions at the original source of data, at the data holder, at service providers, 
and at each customer location accessing the warehouse. The holder’s control of secu-
rity diminishes as information passes over external networks. Control vanishes once 
information is injected into the customer’s internal applications. 

The  data  warehouse’s  database  management  system  handles  security  and  access 
control.  Securing  the  warehouse  is  mostly  a  function  of  establishing,  granting  and 
updating  access  control  permissions  and  rights—a  configuration  process  based  on 
policy.  Security  requirements  extend  to  appropriate  configuration  of  access  controls 
and  permissions  for  software  applications  feeding  information  into  the  data  ware-
house. 

Data warehouse technology operates on a networked system of servers. The serv-
ers  may  physically  exist  on  premise  at  the  data  holder  or  at  an  external  hosting 
service  provider.  Other  systems  for  the  data  warehouse  include  access  devices  such 
as  PCs,  laptops,  handheld  computing  devices,  and  telephones.  Primary  security  for 
all systems is mostly a function of their operating systems. Proper installation, con-
figuration and patching of bugs in the operating system software are crucial for se-
cure systems. 
Solutions and Market Activity 

Before  considering  steps  the  government  should  take  to  facilitate  securing  elec-
tronic  data,  it  is  appropriate  to  discuss  solutions  and  market  activity.  There  is  no 
‘‘silver  bullet’’  technical  or  policy  solution  to  secure  data  warehouses.  A  variety  of 
technologies and policies are required. Key technologies and policies include: 

to management on who should access what, when and where. 

• Policy  Management:  Enforces  security  rules  and  regulations.  Provides  guidance 
• Vulnerability  Management:  Remediate  vulnerabilities  through  scanning  devices 
that  identify  and  patch  vulnerabilities,  as  well  mitigate  misconfigurations,  un-
necessary  services,  unsecured  accounts,  and  malicious  code.  Addressing  major 
classes  of  network  and  desktop  vulnerability  improves  IT  enterprise  and  oper-
ational stability. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

• Intrusion  Detection/Prevention:  Technologies  that  monitor  content  of  network 
traffic for infections and block traffic carrying infected files or programs. Reduc-
ing  incoming  sick  traffic  closes  another  window  for  criminals  to  access  these 
data. 
• Authentication:  A  critical  first  step  to  ensuring  only  appropriate  users  may  ac-
cess  the  data  is  using  digital  certificates  and  multiple  factor  authentication. 
This is a way to confirm legitimate customers and control internal end-user ac-
cess.  Strong  authentication  also  mitigates  the  problem  of  passwords,  which  are 
inherently weak, from being hacked or otherwise compromised. 
• Access  Controls:  Ensure  that  authenticated  users  and  applications  can  access 
only that data and information which they have been granted authority to use. 
Access  controls  may  be  based  on  a  number  of  factors,  including  an  individual’s 
role  in  an  organization.  They  are  particularly  important  to  prevent  insider  at-
tacks and as a deterrent to inappropriate browsing of sensitive data. 
• Audit Files: Detailed and protected records of computer and network traffic and 
transactions that can help ensure policy compliance and assist in forensic inves-
tigations of computer crime. 
• Encryption: Transforms data into password (key)-protected packets that prevent 
reading  by  unauthorized  users.  Secure  communication  enables  data  warehouse 
vendors to safely and efficiently serve their customers. 
• Anti-Virus: Software automatically checks new files for infection. Inoculates PCs 
• Firewall:  Blocks  unauthorized  traffic  from  entering  PCs  and  servers  from  the 

and applications from diseased software code attempting to cause harm. 

Internet. Protects end-users from unwanted activity on their PCs. 

Some  enterprises  are  beginning  to  see  security  as  a  means  to  differentiate  them-
selves from their competition. For example, a well known e-trading firm is working 
with a CSIA member to use two factor authentication to improve the security of cus-
tomer  accounts.  Some  Internet  Service  Providers  (ISPs)  are  differentiating  them-
selves  from  others  by  highlighting  the  steps  they  are  taking  to  protect  personal  in-
formation.  Other  CSIA  member  firms  are  providing  managed  security  services, 
encryption technologies, intrusion prevention, vulnerability management services to 
a variety of owners and operators of infrastructure. 
Policy Considerations for Securing Electronic Data 

The security of data warehouses will require a blend of appropriate policies, tech-
nical  expertise,  and  security  technologies.  Technical  provisions  for  security  are 
aimed to thwart unauthorized access to personally identifiable information—wheth-
er  by  electronic  hackers  who  break  in  by  securing  a  legitimate  password  (e.g. 
NexisLexis),  or  by  in-person  fraud  (e.g.  ChoicePoint).  Technical  provisions  are  only 
as strong as the security policy which implements them. 

Security  breaches  of  data  warehouses  can  adversely  affect  the  life  of  any  Amer-
ican  so  it  is  appropriate  for  Congress  to  establish  national  policies  in  conjunction 
with the private sector for the protection and privacy of personal information. 

While  Congress  is  largely  focused  on  data  brokers,  the  protection  of  personal  in-
formation  is  also  critical  in  other  businesses  where  data  warehouse  technology  is 
used and where similar risks exist. Congress should examine the issue more broadly 
as it contemplates the need for legislation. 

In this context, CSIA recommends Congress to consider the following: 
• Take  a  holistic  approach  to  addressing  cyber  security.  Currently,  Congress  is 
considering  cyber  security  problems  such  as  spyware,  phishing,  and  data  ware-
house  security  on  an  individual  basis.  In  fact,  each  of  these  problems  has  at 
least  one  issue  in  common:  the  attacker  is  seeking  an  individual’s  personal  in-
formation in order to commit financial fraud. We can anticipate similar exploits 
in the future. 
• Harmonize  any  new  legislation  with  existing  legislation  at  the  Federal  level, 
filling  gaps  rather  than  duplicating  requirements  already  contained  in  existing 
law, such as Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (GLBA), the Health Insurance Portability 
and  Accounting  Act  (HIPAA),  and  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  (FCRA).  Use 
existing  security  standards  wherever  possible,  rather  than  creating  new  ones. 
This  approach  would  provide  a  framework  for  identifying  areas  of  risk,  as  well 
as encouraging industry best practices. 
• A  piecemeal  approach  by  Congress,  in  conjunction  with  the  numerous  laws 
states  are  passing  will  present  consumers  and  businesses  with  a  ‘‘patchwork’’ 
quilt  of  confusing  laws  and  complicated  compliance  issues.  Already  states  are 
stepping  into  the  void  and  creating  a  confusing  patchwork  of  legislation  on  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

issue.  Legislation  regulating  spyware  has  been  introduced  in  24  State  legisla-
tures  this  year,  with  approaches  ranging  from  studies  to  changes  in  criminal 
code.  Anti-phishing  legislation  is  sitting  on  the  Governor’s  desk  in  Hawaii,  and 
pending  in  states  including  Texas  and  Florida.  And  there  are  more  than  300 
bills pending on identity theft in our Nation’s State legislatures. A Federal pre-
emption  of  the  many  laws  recently  passed  or  currently  contemplated  at  the 
State level related to spyware, phishing, and data broker security would allevi-
ate much of the concern and consternation within the private sector as a whole. 
However,  any  preemptive  Federal  law  should  maintain,  at  the  minimum,  the 
security standards already put in place by corresponding state legislation. 
• Encourage broader use of security technologies without mandating specific tech-
nology solutions. Urge adoption of the approach utilized in CA 1386 which calls 
for disclosure of a breach involving unencrypted data. 
• To  encourage  stronger  cyber  security,  Congress  should  investigate  incentives, 
including ‘‘safe harbors’’, tax benefits, third-party or self certification, insurance 
and  the  adoption  of  best  practices,  without  mandating  specific  technology  solu-
tions. Dictating a specific technology is counterproductive as it stifles innovation 
and discourages creativity. 
• Congress  should  increase  penalties  for  identity  theft  and  other  cyber  crimes  as 
well  as  ensure  appropriate  resources  are  available  to  law  enforcement  authori-
ties.  The  Senate  should  swiftly  ratify  the  Council  of  Europe’s  Convention  on 
Cybercrime  which  would  create  a  global  framework  for  investigating  and  pros-
ecuting cyber criminals. 
• Congress should also take a long-term view of information security. There is no 
coherent  cyber  security  R&D  agenda.  Significant  Federal  funding  is  closeted  in 
classified  programs.  While  our  national  security  needs  must  be  met,  we  must 
anticipate that privately owned and operated networks will be attacked as well. 
We  need  to  develop  resilient,  fault  tolerant  networks  which  degrade  gracefully 
under attack. 

Leadership  in  information  technology  is  a  constantly  moving  target.  As  the  tech-
nology changes and improves, so must its security. Likewise, as the need for public 
protection evolves, so must our public policy. We call on Congress and the Adminis-
tration  to  work  with  the  private  sector  to  develop  a  holistic  approach  to  protecting 
our Nation’s personal information. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Rotenberg? 

STATEMENT  OF  MARC  ROTENBERG,  PRESIDENT/EXECUTIVE 
DIRECTOR,  ELECTRONIC  PRIVACY  INFORMATION  CENTER 
(EPIC) 
Mr.  ROTENBERG.  Senator  Smith,  Senator  Nelson,  Senator  Pryor, 

thank you for the opportunity to testify today. 

My  name  is  Marc  Rotenberg.  I’m  an  Executive  Director  at  the 
Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center.  EPIC  is  a  nonpartisan  re-
search  organization,  and  we  focus  our  work  on  emerging  civil-lib-
erties  and  privacy  issues.  We’d  like  to  thank  you  for  holding  this 
hearing today on identity theft and data brokers. 

We have a particular interest in this topic. Over the last several 
months,  you,  many  of  your  constituents,  and  the  American  public 
have  read  quite  a  bit  about  the  massive  data  disclosures  taking 
place  across  the  United  States.  But  it  was  actually  last  year  that 
EPIC  wrote  to  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  and  urged  the  FTC 
to begin an investigation of ChoicePoint and other companies in the 
data-broker  industry.  And  we  expressed  particular  concern  about 
the products that were not covered under the Fair Credit Reporting 
Act. Our view was that these products contained much of the same 
sensitive information that would otherwise be regulated under Fed-
eral  law.  And,  because  this  information  wasn’t  covered  under  Fed-
eral law, we explained to the FTC, there was heightened risk of the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

loss  of  privacy  of  American  consumers,  of  data  breaches.  And,  in 
fact,  many  of  the  problems  that  we  wrote  about  last  year  to  the 
FTC  came  to  pass  over  the  last  several  months.  So,  we’re  very 
pleased that you’re holding this hearing today. 

I’m going to focus my testimony this afternoon on the legislative 
proposals that have been put forward, because I think it’s very im-
portant  to  understand  the  need  to  pass  legislation  at  this  point  in 
time. 

Now, I will say, also, that, clearly, the companies have taken im-
portant  steps,  since  the  breaches  have  occurred,  to  try  to  improve 
their business practices and reduce the likelihood that future prob-
lems will arise, and they should be applauded for this. 

Senator  SMITH.  But  those  steps,  in  your  view,  are  not  sufficient. 
Mr. ROTENBERG. No, I don’t think they are sufficient, sir. 
Senator SMITH. So legislation is necessary. 
Mr. ROTENBERG. I think legislation is part of the solution. 
Now,  just  to  put  this  in  context,  this  is  not  unlike  the  situation 
that the Congress faced when it first considered the Fair Credit Re-
porting  Act.  People  understood  that  information  about  American 
consumers  would  be  important  for  credit  determinations  and  for 
loans. But it was also the case that that information had to be ac-
curate  and  used  only  for  appropriate  purposes.  So,  Congress  was 
able to pass the FCRA, improve the accuracy and reliability of the 
information  for  the  businesses  that  had  an  appropriate  reason  to 
use  it,  and,  at  the  same  time,  safeguard  the  privacy  of  American 
consumers. 

And what I’m suggesting today is that I think a similar approach 

should be taken with the information-broker industry. 

Now, you’ve heard quite a bit so far about industry’s support for 
a  notification  bill.  And  we  think  this  is  also  a  good  starting  point. 
Certainly,  the  notification  law  in  California  made  it  possible  for 
people  to  learn  when  this  breach  occurred,  and  to  protect  them-
selves  so  that  they  could  minimize  the  risk  resulting  from  the  im-
proper use of their personal information. And I think that approach 
will likely be adopted across the United States. 

But I don’t think notification is adequate. And it is the two bills 
that  are  pending  before  this  Committee,  S.  500  and  S.  768,  that  I 
think point us in the direction of how we reduce the likelihood that 
future problems will occur. 

S.  500,  for  example,  will  give  the  FTC  the  authority  to  establish 
basic  regulations  to  ensure  that  companies  in  the  information- 
broker  industry—make  sure  that  the  information  is  accurate  and 
reliable, and establish privacy safeguards. 

But I think the better approach, and the one that I know Senator 
Nelson has spent a great deal of time on, is S. 768. This legislation 
really gets to the key problems today in the United States, not only 
ensuring the accuracy of this information, but dealing directly with 
the  problem  if  the  misuse  of  the  Social  Security  number,  which  is 
clearly  contributing  to  the  problem  of  identity  theft—limiting  the 
circumstances  under  which  personal  information  may  be  sold,  giv-
ing  individuals  a  private  right-of-action,  and  ensuring  that  the 
types  of  safeguards  are  established,  that  international  cooperation 
is  made  possible,  and  that  the  FTC  reports  to  you  on  an  annual 
basis  about  how  their  work  is  progressing  to  limit  the  problem  of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

identity  theft.  I  think  also  the  establishment  of  an  identity  theft 
center  within  the  FTC  would  come  as  an  enormous  benefit  to 
American consumers. 

As  you  may  know,  identity  theft  is  now  the  number  one  crime 
in  the  United  States.  The  FTC  puts  the  figure  at  over  $50  billion. 
It’s one out of 20 adults in this country. I think S. 768 provides the 
type  of  framework,  the  type  of  comprehensive  solution,  consistent 
with  the  approach  that  was  taken  with  the  FCRA  for  the  credit- 
reporting  industry  30  years  ago,  that  the  American  public  needs 
today. 

So,  I  thank  you,  again,  for  holding  this  hearing,  and  I  hope  the 

Committee will be able to take action on that bill. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Rotenberg follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARC ROTENBERG, PRESIDENT/EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

ELECTRONIC PRIVACY INFORMATION CENTER (EPIC) 

Mr.  Chairman,  and  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to 
appear  before  you  today.  My  name  is  Marc  Rotenberg  and  I  am  Executive  Director 
and  President  of  the  Electronic  Privacy  Information  Center  in  Washington,  DC. 
EPIC  is  a  non-partisan  public  interest  research  organization  established  in  1994  to 
focus  public  attention  on  emerging  civil  liberties  issues.  We  are  very  pleased  that 
you  have  convened  this  hearing  today  on  Identity  Theft  and  Data  Broker  Services. 
The main point of my testimony today is to make clear the extraordinary urgency 
of addressing the unregulated sale of personal information in the United States and 
how  the  data  broker  industry  is  contributing  to  the  growing  risk  of  identity  theft 
in  the  United  States.  There  is  every  indication  that  this  problem  is  getting  worse. 
Whatever  your  views  may  be  on  the  best  general  approach  to  privacy  protection, 
I urge you to take aggressive steps to regulate the information-broker industry and 
to protect the privacy and security of Americans. 
The Significance of the ChoicePoint Matter 

With  all  the  news  reporting  of  the  last  few  months,  it  has  often  been  difficult  to 
tell  exactly  how  a  criminal  ring  engaged  in  identity  theft  obtained  the  records  of 
at  least  145,000  Americans.  According  to  some  reports,  there  was  a  computer 
‘‘break-in.’’ Others described it as ‘‘theft.’’ 1 In fact, ChoicePoint simply sold the infor-
mation.2 This  is  ChoicePoint’s  business  and  it  is  the  business  of  other  companies 
that are based primarily on the collection and sale of detailed information on Amer-
ican consumers. In this most recent case, the consequences of the sale were severe. 
According to California police, at least 750 people have already suffered financial 
harm.3 Investigators  believe  data  on  at  least  400,000  individuals  may  have  been 
compromised.4 Significantly, this was not an isolated incident. Although ChoicePoint 
CEO Derek Smith said that the recent sale was the first of its kind, subsequent re-
ports  revealed  that  ChoicePoint  also  sold  similar  information  on  7,000  people  to 
identity thieves in 2002 with losses over $1 million.5 And no doubt, there may have 
been many disclosures before the California notification law went into effect as well 
as more recent disclosures of which we are not yet aware. 

The consumer harm that results from the wrongful disclosure of personal informa-
tion  is  very  clear.  According  to  the  Federal  Trade  Commission,  last  year  10  million 
Americans  were  affected  by  identity  theft.  Identity  theft  is  the  number  one  crime 
in  the  country.  For  the  fifth  year  in  a  row,  identity  theft  topped  the  list  of  com-
plaints,  accounting  for  39  percent  of  the  635,173  consumer  fraud  complaints  filed 
with the agency last year.6 And there is every indication that the level of this crime 
is increasing. 

ChoicePoint is not the only company that has improperly disclosed personal infor-
mation on Americans. Bank of America misplaced back-up tapes containing detailed 
financial information on 1.2 million employees in the Federal Government, including 
many Members of Congress.7 Lexis-Nexis originally reported that it made available 
records  from  its  Seisint  division  on  32,000  Americans  to  a  criminal  ring  that  ex-
ploited  passwords  of  legitimate  account  holders.8 That  number  was  later  revised  to 
310,000.9 DSW,  a  shoe  company,  announced  that  103  of  its  175  stores  had  cus-
tomers’  credit  and  debit  card  information  improperly  accessed.10 Last  week,  Time 
Warner  revealed  that  it  lost  track  of  detailed  data  concerning  600,000  current  and 
previous employees. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

Legislation in this area is long overdue. Regrettably, ChoicePoint and other infor-
mation  brokers  have  spent  a  great  deal  of  time  and  money  trying  to  block  effective 
privacy  legislation  in  Congress.  According  to  disclosure  forms  filed  with  the  U.S. 
House  and  Senate,  obtained  by  the  Wall  Street  Journal,  ChoicePoint  and  six  of  the 
country’s  other  largest  sellers  of  private  consumer  data  spent  at  least  $2.4  million 
last year to lobby Members of Congress and a variety of Federal agencies. The Jour-
nal  reports  that,  ‘‘ChoicePoint  was  the  biggest  spender,  with  $970,000  either  paid 
to outside lobbyists or spent directly by the company.’’ 11 

But the real cost for these activities is borne by Americans, all across the country. 
This improper disclosure and use of personal information is contributing to identity 
theft,  which  is  today  the  number  one  crime  in  the  United  States.  According  to  a 
2003 survey by the Federal Trade Commission, over a one-year period nearly 5 per-
cent of the adult populations were victims of some form of identity theft.12 
Growing Dependence on the Information Broker Industry 

Mr.  Chairman,  the  representatives  of  the  information-broker  industry  will  testify 
this morning that the American economy and even our national security are becom-
ing  increasingly  dependent  on  this  industry.  In  many  respects,  this  is  true.  These 
companies  have  become  the  true  invisible  hand  of  the  information  economy.  Their 
ability to determine the opportunities for American workers, consumers, and voters 
is  without  parallel.  If  a  ChoicePoint  record  says  you  were  late  on  a  rent  payment, 
whether  or  not  that’s  true,  you  may  lose  a  chance  for  a  new  apartment  or  a  job. 
If  one  of  these  companies  wrongfully  removes  registered  voters  from  the  voting 
roles, those people are denied their Constitutional right to vote. 

The  stakes  becomes  even  higher  with  homeland  security.  Axciom,  for  example, 
may play a central role in the identity verification procedures for Secure Flight, the 
new  airline  passenger  pre-screening  system.  According  to  the  Wall  Street  Journal, 
a  Virginia  company  named  Eagle  Force  has  tested  sample  passenger  information 
against  commercial  databases  supplied  by  Arkansas-based  Acxiom  Corp.13 Acxiom 
is  the  same  company  that  stirred  controversy  after  it  shared  information  about 
JetBlue Airways’ passengers, without their knowledge, with a defense contractor in 
2002.14 

Even  as  we  become  more  reliant  on  these  firms,  the  reports  of  problems  in  the 
industry  and  the  skyrocketing  problem  of  identity  theft  have  made  clear  that  Con-
gress  must  step  in.  There  are  simply  no  market  mechanisms  that  protect  privacy, 
ensure accuracy, or limit security breaches where there is no direct obligation to the 
person whose personal information is at risk. 
EPIC’s Efforts To Bring Public Attention to the Problems With ChoicePoint 
Well  before  the  recent  news  of  the  ChoicePoint  debacle  became  public,  EPIC  had 
been  pursuing  the  company  and  had  written  to  the  FTC  to  express  deep  concern 
about  its  business  practices  and  its  ability  to  flout  the  law.  On  December  16,  2004, 
EPIC  urged  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  to  investigate  ChoicePoint  and  other 
data brokers for compliance with the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA), the Federal 
privacy  law  that  helps  insure  that  personal  financial  information  is  not  used  im-
properly.15 The  EPIC  letter  said  that  ChoicePoint  and  its  clients  had  performed  an 
end-run around the FCRA and was selling personal information to law enforcement 
agencies, private investigators, and businesses without adequate privacy protection. 
ChoicePoint  wrote  back  to  us  to  say,  in  effect,  that  there  was  no  problem.  The 
company  claimed  to  comply  fully  with  FCRA  and  that  the  question  of  whether 
FCRA,  or  other  Federal  privacy  laws,  should  apply  to  all  of  its  products  as  simply 
a policy judgment. It made this claim at the same time it was spending several mil-
lion dollars over the last few years to block the further expansion of the FCRA. 

Mr.  Chairman,  hindsight  may  be  20–20,  but  it  is  remarkable  to  us  that 
ChoicePoint had the audacity to write such a letter when it already knew that State 
investigators  had  uncovered  the  fact  that  the  company  had  sold  information  on 
American  consumers  to  an  identity  theft  ring.  They  were  accusing  us  of  inaccuracy 
at the same time that State and Federal prosecutors knew that ChoicePoint, a com-
pany  that  offered  services  for  business  credentialing,  had  exposed  more  than  a  hun-
dred thousand Americans to a heightened risk of identity theft because it sold data 
to crooks. 

But  the  problems  with  ChoicePoint  long  preceded  this  recent  episode.  Thanks  to 
Freedom of Information Act requests relentlessly pursued by EPIC’s Senior Counsel 
Chris  Hoofnagle,  we  have  obtained  over  the  last  several  years  extraordinary  docu-
mentation of ChoicePoint’s growing ties to Federal agencies and the increasing con-
cerns about the accuracy and legality of these products.16 So far, EPIC has obtained 
FOIA  documents  from  nine  different  agencies  concerning  ChoicePoint.  One  docu-
ment from the Department of Justice, dated December 13, 2002, discusses a ‘‘Report 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

of  Investigation  and  Misconduct  Allegations . . . Concerning  Unauthorized  Disclo-
sure  of  Information.’’ 17 There  are  documents  from  the  IRS  that  describe  how  the 
agency  would  mirror  huge  amounts  of  personal  information  on  IRS  computers  so 
that  ChoicePoint  could  perform  investigations.18 Several  documents  describe 
ChoicePoint’s  sole  source  contracts  with  such  agencies  as  the  United  States  Mar-
shals Service and the FBI.19 

Among the most significant documents obtained by EPIC were those from the De-
partment  of  State,  which  revealed  the  growing  conflicts  between  the  United  States 
and  foreign  governments  that  resulted  from  the  efforts  of  ChoicePoint  to  buy  data 
on citizens across Latin America for use by the U.S. Federal law enforcement agen-
cies.20 One  document  lists  news  articles  that  were  collected  by  the  agency  to  track 
outrage  in  Mexico  and  other  countries  over  the  sale  of  personal  information  by 
ChoicePoint.21 A  second  document  contains  a  cable  from  the  American  Embassy  in 
Mexico to several different government agencies warning that a ‘‘potential firestorm 
may  be  brewing  as  a  result  of  the  sale  of  personal  information  by  ChoicePoint.22 A 
third  set  of  documents  describes  public  relations  strategies  for  the  American  Em-
bassy  to  counter  public  anger  surrounding  the  release  of  personal  information  of 
Latin Americans to ChoicePoint.23 
Lessons of ChoicePoint 

The  ChoicePoint  incident  proves  many  important  lessons  for  the  Congress  as  it 

considers how best to safeguard consumer privacy in the information age. 

First, it should be clear now that privacy harms have real financial consequences. 
In  considering  privacy  legislation  in  the  past,  Congress  has  often  been  reluctant  to 
recognize  the  actual  economic  harm  that  consumers  suffer  when  their  personal  in-
formation is misused, when inaccurate information leads to the loss of a loan, a job, 
or insurance. Consumers suffer harms both from information that is used for fraud 
and  inaccurate  information  that  leads  to  lost  opportunities  through  no  fault  of  the 
individual. 

A  clear  example  of  how  the  company  has  contributed  to  the  growing  problem  of 
identity  theft  may  be  found  in  ChoicePoint’s  subscriber  agreement  for  access  to 
AutoTrackXP,  a  detailed  dossier  of  individuals’  personal  information.  A  sample 
AutoTrackXP report on the ChoicePoint website shows that it contains Social Secu-
rity  Numbers;  driver  license  numbers;  address  history;  phone  numbers;  property 
ownership  and  transfer  records;  vehicle,  boat,  and  plane  registrations;  UCC  filings; 
financial  information  such  as  bankruptcies,  liens,  and  judgments;  professional  li-
censes;  business  affiliations;  ‘‘other  people  who  have  used  the  same  address  of  the 
subject,’’  ‘‘possible  licensed  drivers  at  the  subject’s  address,’’  and  information  about 
the  data  subject’s  relatives  and  neighbors.24 This  sensitive  information  is  available 
to  a  wide  array  of  companies  that  do  not  need  to  articulate  a  specific  need  for  per-
sonal  information  each  time  a  report  is  purchased.  ChoicePoint’s  subscriber  agree-
ment  shows  that  the  company  allows  access  to  the  following  businesses:  attorneys, 
law  offices,  investigations,  banking,  financial,  retail,  wholesale,  insurance,  human 
resources,  security  companies,  process  servers,  news  media,  bail  bonds,  and  if  that 
isn’t enough, ChoicePoint also includes ‘‘other.’’ 

Second,  it  should  be  clear  that  market-based  solutions  fail  utterly  when  there  is 
no direct relationship between the consumer and the company that proposed to col-
lect and sell information on the consumer. While we continue to believe that privacy 
legislation is also appropriate for routine business transactions, it should be obvious 
to  even  those  that  favor  market-based  solutions  that  this  approach  simply  does  not 
work  where  the  consumer  exercises  no  market  control  over  the  collection  and  use 
of  their  personal  information.  As  computer  security  expert  Bruce  Schneier  has 
noted,  ‘‘ChoicePoint  doesn’t  bear  the  costs  of  identity  theft,  so  ChoicePoint  doesn’t 
take  those  costs  into  account  when  figuring  out  how  much  money  to  spend  on  data 
security.’’ 25 This  argues  strongly  for  regulation  of  the  information-broker  industry. 
Third, there are clearly problems with both the adequacy of protection under cur-
rent Federal law and the fact that many information products escape any kind pri-
vacy  rules.  ChoicePoint  has  done  a  remarkable  job  of  creating  detailed  profiles  on 
American consumers that they believe are not subject to Federal law. Products such 
as  AutoTrackXP  are  as  detailed  as  credit  reports  and  have  as  much  impact  on  op-
portunities in the marketplace for consumers as credit reports, yet ChoicePoint has 
argued that they should not be subject to FCRA. Even their recent proposal to with-
draw the sale of this information is not reassuring. They have left a significant loop-
hole  that  will  allow  them  to  sell  the  data  if  they  believe  there  is  a  consumer  ben-
efit.26 

But even where legal coverage exists, there is insufficient enforcement, consumers 
find  it  difficult  to  exercise  their  rights,  and  the  auditing  is  non-existent.  According 
to EPIC’s research, while ChoicePoint claims to monitor their subscribers for wrong-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

doing, there is no public evidence that the company has referred a subscriber to au-
thorities for violating individuals’ privacy. In other words, in the case where a legiti-
mate  company  obtains  personal  information,  there  is  no  publicly  available  evidence 
that ChoicePoint has any interest in whether that information is subsequently used 
for illegitimate purposes. 

Law  enforcement,  which  has  developed  increasingly  close  ties  to  information  bro-
kers  such  as  ChoicePoint,  seems  to  fall  entirely  outside  of  any  auditing  procedures. 
This  is  particularly  troubling  since  even  those  reports  that  recommend  greater  law 
enforcement  use  of  private  sector  databases  for  public  safety  recognize  the  impor-
tance of auditing to prevent abuse.27 

And  of  course  there  are  ongoing  concerns  about  the  broad  permissible  purposes 
under the FCRA, the use of credit header information to build detailed profiles, and 
the difficulty that consumers continue to face in trying to obtain free credit reports 
that they are entitled to under the FACTA. 

Fourth,  we  believe  this  episode  also  demonstrates  the  failure  of  the  FTC  to  ag-
gressively pursue privacy protection. We have repeatedly urged the FTC to look into 
these  matters.  On  some  occasions,  the  FTC  has  acted.28 But  too  often  the  Commis-
sion  has  ignored  privacy  problems  that  are  impacting  consumer  privacy  and  pro-
ducing  a  loss  of  trust  and  confidence  in  the  electronic  marketplace.  In  the  late 
1990s, the FTC promoted self-regulation for the information-broker industry and al-
lowed  a  weak  set  of  principles  promulgated  as  the  Individual  References  Service 
Group to take the place of effective legislation. It may well be that the ChoicePoint 
fiasco could have been avoided if the Commission chose a different path when it con-
sidered the practices of the information-broker industry. 

The FTC has also failed to pursue claims that it could under section 5 of the FTC 
Act, which prohibits unfair practices. Practices are unfair if they cause or are likely 
to  cause  consumers  substantial  injury  that  is  neither  reasonably  avoidable  by  con-
sumer  nor  offset  by  countervailing  benefits  to  consumers  and  competition.29 It  may 
be  that  the  unfairness  doctrine  could  be  applied  in  cases  where  there  is  no  direct 
relationship between the consumer and the company, but to date the FTC has failed 
to do this.30 

Fifth,  we  believe  the  ChoicePoint  episode  makes  clear  the  importance  of  state- 
based  approaches  to  privacy  protection.  Congress  simply  should  not  pass  laws  that 
tie  the  hands  of  State  legislators  and  prevent  the  development  of  innovative  solu-
tions  that  respond  to  emerging  privacy  concerns.  Many  states  are  today  seeking  to 
establish  strong  notification  procedures  to  ensure  that  their  residents  are  entitled 
to at least the same level of protection as was provided by California.31 

In this particular case, the California notification statute helped ensure that con-
sumers would at least be notified that they are at risk of heightened identity theft. 
This  idea  makes  so  much  sense  that  38  attorneys  general  wrote  to  ChoicePoint  to 
say  that  their  residents  should  also  be  notified  if  their  personal  information  was 
wrongly disclosed.32 ChoicePoint could not object. It was an obvious solution. 
Recommendations 

Clearly, there is a need for Congress to act. Although ChoicePoint has taken some 
steps  to  address  public  concerns,  it  continues  to  take  the  position  that  it  is  free  to 
sell  personal  information  on  American  consumers  to  whomever  it  wishes  where 
ChoicePoint,  and  not  the  consumer,  believes  there  is  a  ‘‘consumer-driven  benefit  or 
transaction.’’ 33 Moreover,  the  industry  remains  free  to  change  its  policies  at  some 
point  in  the  future,  and  the  steps  taken  to  date  do  not  address  the  larger  concerns 
across the information-broker industry. 

Modest proposals such as the extension of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act’s Security 
Safeguards Rule are unlikely to prevent future debacles. The Safeguards Rule mere-
ly requires that financial institutions have reasonable policies and procedures to en-
sure the security and confidentiality of customer information. Recall that the disclo-
sure by ChoicePoint did not result from a ‘‘hack’’ or a ‘‘theft’’ but from a routine sale. 
Moreover,  the  Security  Safeguards  Rule  will  do  nothing  to  give  consumers  greater 
control over the transfer of their personal information to third parties or to promote 
record accuracy. 

Extending  notification  statutes  such  as  the  California  bill  would  be  a  sensible 
step, but this is only a partial answer. Notification only addresses the problem once 
the disclosure has occurred. The goal should be to minimize the likelihood of future 
disclosures.  It  is  also  important  to  ensure  that  any  Federal  notification  bill  is  at 
least  as  good  as  the  California  state  bill  and  leaves  the  states  the  freedom  to  de-
velop  stronger  and  more  effective  measures.  What  happens  for  example,  when  at 
some point in the future, we must contend with the extraordinary privacy problems 
that will result from the disclosure of personal information contained in a database 
built on biometric identifiers? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

There are several proposals pending in the Senate to address the growing problem 
of identity theft. In particular, the Notification of Risk to Personal Data Act, S. 751, 
and  the  Comprehensive  Identity  Theft  Prevention  Act,  S.  768,  provide  strong  com-
plimentary  safeguards.  The  Committee  should  act  quickly  to  ensure  their  passage. 
Notification of Risk to Personal Data Act, S. 751 

One of the lessons of the recent disclosures about the information-broker industry 
is that we could not understand the scope of the problem without information about 
actual  security  breaches.  Imagine  trying  to  legislate  airline  safety  or  the  reliability 
of medical products without even basic information about the extent of the problem 
or  the  number  of  people  affected.  That  is  where  the  information  security  problem 
was before the passage of the California notification law. That critical State law en-
sured, for the first time, that those whose personal information had been wrongfully 
disclosed  would  be  notified  of  the  breach  and  given  the  opportunity  to  take  addi-
tional  measures.  Not  surprisingly,  once  the  problem  became  known,  other  states 
urged ChoicePoint to provide notification to their residents. Thirty-eight State attor-
neys general wrote to the head of ChoicePoint. Many State legislatures are now con-
sidering bills that would establish similar notification obligations. 

Given this experience, Senator Feinstein’s bill, the Notification of Risk to Personal 
Data  Act,  is  an  obvious  first  step  in  the  effort  to  help  ensure  that  Americans  can 
protect  themselves  when  security  breaches  occur.  The  bill  would  require  Federal 
agencies  and  private  sector  businesses  that  engage  in  interstate  commerce  to  pro-
vide  notification  when  personal  information  is  acquired  by  unauthorized  persons. 
The  bill  recognizes  that  there  may  be  delayed  notification  where  this  is  necessary 
to  aid  a  law  enforcement  investigation.  The  bill  also  provides  certain  exceptions  for 
national  security  and  law  enforcement,  though  sensibly  does  not  allow  these  excep-
tions  to  be  used  to  hide  violations  of  law  or  to  protect  poor  administration.  There 
are a number of alternatives for notification that recognize that there may be more 
efficient and less costly ways to notify individuals in certain circumstances. 

While this is a good measure, we are concerned that the bill will preempt stronger 
State laws that may be developed to address the problem of notification where risks 
to  personal  data  arise.  We  understand  the  interest  in  a  single  national  standard, 
but  this  is  an  area  where  the  states  should  retain  the  freedom  to  innovate  and  ex-
plore new solutions to this far-reaching problem. We urge the Committee to remove 
Section 5 of the Act, which would preempt State law. 

We  also  caution  against  any  effort  to  limit  the  circumstances  under  which  notifi-
cation  might  occur.  As  a  matter  of  fairness,  it  should  be  the  individual’s  right  to 
know  when  his  or  her  personal  information  has  been  improperly  obtained.  And  it 
should be equally obvious that given the choice businesses will choose not to provide 
notice unless they are required to do so. 
Comprehensive Identity Theft Prevention Act, S. 768 

Improved notification will play an important role in assisting consumers where se-
curity  breaches  occur,  but  clearly  the  long-term  goal  must  be  to  reduce  the  risk  of 
these  disclosures  and  to  minimize  harm  when  these  breaches  occur.  This  is  not  a 
new  problem.  Congress  has  worked  for  more  than  thirty  years  to  provide  privacy 
safeguards  and  to  protect  against  the  risks  associated  with  the  automation  of  per-
sonal information. A good privacy bill works for both consumers and businesses. The 
Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act,  for  example,  was  a  benefit  to  both  consumers  and  the 
credit  reporting  industry  because  it  established  privacy  safeguards  and  helped  en-
sure greater accuracy in the information that was made available to credit grantors. 
The  problem  today  is  that  information  brokers  are  operating  outside  of  any  com-
prehensive  regulatory  scheme.  Moreover,  they  have  no  direct  relationship  with  the 
individuals  whose  personal  information  they  routinely  sell  to  others.  So,  there  are 
inadequate incentives to protect privacy or to ensure accuracy. There is a clear need 
to establish comprehensive protections for the information-broker industry. 

The  Comprehensive  Identity  Theft  Prevention  Act,  S.  768,  provides  an  excellent 
framework  for  privacy  protection  in  the  information-broker  industry.  Building  on 
the  general  approach  of  the  FCRA  and  other  privacy  statutes,  the  bill  aims  to  en-
sure that when personal information is collected, it will be used for appropriate pur-
poses, and that when problems arise there will be meaningful remedies. 

The Act requires the Federal Trade Commission to establish rules for information 
brokers  and  for  the  protection  of  personal  information.  The  rules  cover  data  accu-
racy, confidentiality, user authentication, and detection of unauthorized use. Signifi-
cantly,  the  Act  also  gives  individuals  the  opportunity  to  review  the  information 
about them held by data brokers. This helps ensure accuracy and accountability and 
is similar to provisions currently found in the Fair Credit Reporting Act. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

The  Information  Protection  and  Security  Act  also  provides  meaningful  enforce-
ment by ensuring that the states are able to pursue investigations and prosecution, 
after  appropriate  notice  to  the  FTC  and  the  attorneys  general.  The  Act  also  gives 
individuals, who of course are the ones that suffer the actual harm, to pursue a pri-
vate right-of-action. 
Additional Safeguards 

Furthermore,  to  the  extent  that  information  brokers,  such  as  ChoicePoint,  rou-
tinely sell data to law enforcement and other Federal agencies, they should be sub-
ject  to  the  Federal  Privacy  Act.  A  ‘‘privatized  intelligence  service,’’  as  Washington 
Post reporter Robert O’Harrow has aptly described the company, ChoicePoint should 
not  be  permitted  to  flout  the  legal  rules  that  help  ensure  accuracy,  accountability, 
and  due  process  in  the  use  of  personal  information  by  Federal  agencies.34 It  would 
be  appropriate  to  consider  legislation  that  would  establish  safeguards  for  the  use 
of commercial information by government agencies.35 

Also,  Professor  Daniel  Solove  and  EPIC’s  Chris  Hoofnagle  have  put  a  very  good 
framework forward.36 This approach is similar to other frameworks that attempt to 
articulate  Fair  Information  Practices  in  the  collection  and  use  of  personal  informa-
tion.  But  Solove  and  Hoofnagle  make  a  further  point  that  is  particularly  important 
in the context of this hearing today on ChoicePoint. Increasingly, the personal infor-
mation  made  available  through  public  records  to  enable  oversight  of  government 
records has been transformed into a privatized commodity that does little to further 
government  oversight,  but  does  much  to  undermine  the  freedom  of  Americans. 
While  EPIC  continues  to  favor  strong,  open  government  laws,  it  is  clearly  the  case 
that  open  government  interests  are  not  served  when  the  government  compels  the 
production  of  personal  information,  sells  the  information  to  private  data  vendors, 
who  then  make  detailed  profiles  available  to  strangers.  This  is  a  perversion  of  the 
purpose of public records. 

Looking  ahead,  there  is  a  very  real  risk  that  the  consequences  of  improper  data 
use  and  data  disclosure  are  likely  to  accelerate  in  the  years  ahead.  One  has  only 
to  look  at  the  sharp  increase  in  identity  theft  documented  by  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission,  the  extraordinary  rate  of  data  aggregation  in  new  digital  environ-
ments,  and  the  enormous  efforts  of  the  Federal  Government  to  build  ever  more 
elaborate databases to realize that the risk to personal privacy is increasing rapidly. 
Congress  can  continue  to  deal  with  these  challenges  in  piecemeal  fashion,  but  it 
seems that the time has come to establish a formal government commission charged 
with the development of long-terms solutions to the threats associated with the loss 
of  privacy.  Such  a  commission  should  be  established  with  the  clear  goal  of  making 
specific  proposals.  It  should  include  a  wide  range  of  experts  and  advocates.  And  it 
should  not  merely  be  tasked  with  trying  to  develop  privacy  safeguards  to  counter 
many of the government new surveillance proposals. Instead, it should focus square-
ly on the problem of safeguarding privacy. 

Congress needs to establish a comprehensive framework to ensure the right of pri-
vacy in the twenty-first century. With identity theft already the number one crime, 
and  the  recent  spate  of  disclosures,  any  further  delay  could  come  at  enormous  cost 
to American consumers and the American economy. 
The REAL ID Act 

Finally,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  like  to  say  a  few  words  about  the  REAL  ID  Act, 
a  sweeping  proposal  for  a  new  Federal  identification  system,  that  may  be  taken  up 
tonight as part of the supplemental appropriation for the troops in Iraq. 

As you know, this bill, which was rejected in the last Congress, has gone forward 
in  this  Congress  without  even  a  hearing.  It  would  require  State  agencies  to  collect 
sensitive, personal information on every American citizen who drives a car. It would 
put  the  State  DMVs  in  the  position  of  enforcing  the  country’s  immigration  laws.  It 
would  give  the  Federal  Government  broad  authority  to  regulate  a  traditional  State 
function. Whatever one’s views may be about the merits of the legislation, it should 
concern  all  sides  that  this  proposal  could  pass  in  the  Senate  without  a  hearing  or 
even debate. 

I  make  this  point  today  in  this  hearing  on  identity  theft  because  the  State  DMV 
record  systems  have  actually  become  the  target  of  identity  thieves.  In  recent 
months,  three  State  DMVs  have  been  attacked  by  identity  thieves.  In  March,  bur-
glars  rammed  a  vehicle  through  a  back  wall  at  a  DMV  near  Las  Vegas  and  drove 
off  with  files,  including  Social  Security  numbers,  on  about  9,000  people.  Recently, 
Florida police arrested 52 people, including 3 DMV examiners, in a scheme that sold 
more  than  2,000  fake  driver’s  licenses.  Two  weeks  ago,  Maryland  police  arrested 
three people, including a DMV worker, in a plot to sell about 150 fake licenses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

It is obviously the case that the establishment of new identification requirements 
in the United States, the dramatic expansion of the authority of the Department of 
Homeland  Security,  and  the  requirement  that  we  all  now  deposit  with  State  agen-
cies  the  very  documents  that  establish  our  proof  of  identity  will  have  a  profound 
impact on the issues under consideration today.37 

Under  any  reasonable  policy  process,  there  would  be  an  opportunity  to  examine 
these  issues  in  more  detail  and  to  assess  the  risks  that  will  surely  result  from  the 
implementation  of  this  legislation.  Before  there  is  a  vote  on  this  proposal,  there 
should  be  a  hearing  in  this  Congress  on  this  bill.38 That  power  still  remains  with 
the Senate. I urge you to exercise it. 
Conclusion 

For  many  years,  privacy  laws  came  up  either  because  of  the  efforts  of  a  forward- 
looking Congress or the tragic experience of a few individuals. Now we are entering 
a  new  era.  Privacy  is  no  longer  theoretical.  It  is  no  longer  about  the  video  records 
of  a  Federal  judge  or  the  driver  registry  information  of  a  young  actress.  Today  pri-
vacy  violations  affect  hundreds  of  thousands  of  Americans  all  across  the  country. 
The harm is real and the consequences are devastating. 

Whatever  one’s  view  may  be  of  the  best  general  approach  to  privacy  protection, 
there  is  no  meaningful  way  that  market-based  solutions  can  protect  the  privacy  of 
American  consumers  when  consumers  have  no  direct  dealings  with  the  companies 
that collect and sell their personal information. There is too much secrecy, too little 
accountability, and too much risk of far-reaching economic damage. 

There are two important bills now before the Committee. The Notification of Risk 
to  Personal  Data  Act,  S.  751,  would  provide  meaningful  notice  to  individuals  when 
their  personal  information  is  wrongfully  disclosed.  The  Comprehensive  Identity 
Theft  Prevention  Act,  S.  768,  would  help  reduce  the  likelihood  of  future  breaches. 
I hope the Committee will be able to act quickly on these proposals. 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  here  today.  I  will  be  pleased  to  answer  your 

questions. 
References 

EPIC ChoicePoint Page, available at http://www.epic.org/privacy/choicepoint/. 

ENDNOTES 

1 Associated  Press,  ‘‘ChoicePoint  hacking  attack  may  have  affected  400,000,’’  Feb. 
17,  2005,  available  at  http://www.ledger-enquirer.com/mld/ledgerenquirer/news/ 
local/10920220.htm. 

2 Robert  O’Harrow  Jr.,  ‘‘ID  Theft  Scam  Hits  D.C.  Area  Residents,’’  Washington 

Post, Feb. 21, 2005, at A01. 

3 Bob  Sullivan,  ‘‘Data  theft  affects  145,000  nationwide,’’  MSNBC,  Feb.  18,  2005, 

available at http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/6979897/. 

4 Associated  Press,  ‘‘ChoicePoint  hacking  attack  may  have  affected  400,000,’’  Feb. 
17,  2005,  available  at  http://www.ledger-enquirer.com/mld/ledgerenquirer/news/ 
local/10920220.htm. 

5 David  Colker  and  Joseph  Menn,  ‘‘ChoicePoint  CEO  Had  Denied  Any  Previous 

Breach of Database,’’ Los Angeles Times, March 3, 2005, at A01. 

6 Federal  Trade  Commission,  ‘‘FTC  Releases  Top  10  Consumer  Complaint  Cat-
egories  for  2004,’’  (Feb.  1,  2005),  available  at  http://www.ftc.gov/opa/2005/02/ 
top102005.htm. 

7 Robert  Lemos,  ‘‘Bank  of  America  loses  a  million  customer  records,’’  CNet 
News.com, Feb. 25, 2005, available at http://earthlink.com.com/Bank+of+America+ 
loses+a+million+customer+records/2100-1029l3-5590989.html?tag=st.rc.targlmb. 

8 Jonathan Krim and Robert O’Harrow, Jr., ‘‘LexisNexis Reports Theft of Personal 
Data,’’ Washingtonpost.com, March 9, 2005, available at http://www.washingtonpost 
.com/ac2/wp-dyn/A19982-2005Mar9?language=printer. 

9 LexisNexis  Data  on  310,000  People  Feared  Stolen,  New  York  Times,  Apr.  12, 
2005,  available  at  http://www.nytimes.com/reuters/technology/tech-media-lexis 
nexis.html?. 

10 Associated Press, ‘‘Credit Information Stolen From DSW Stores,’’ March 9, 2005, 
available  at  http://abcnews.go.com/Business/wireStory?id=563932&CMP=OTC- 
RSSFeeds0312. 

11 Evan Perez and Rick Brooks, ‘‘Data Providers Lobby to Block More Oversight,’’ 

Wall Street Journal, March 4, 2005, at B1. 

12 Federal  Trade  Commission,  ‘‘Identity  Theft  Survey  Report’’  (Sept.  2003),  avail-

able at http://www.ftc.gov/os/2003/09/synovatereport.pdf. 

13 ‘‘US To Require Airline Passengers’ Full Names, Birth Dates,’’ Wall Street Jour-
nal,  May  4,  2005,  available  at  http://online.wsj.com/article/0,BTlCOl20050504 
l012176,00.html. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

14 EPIC  pursued  a  complaint  against  JetBlue  and  Axcio  at  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission,  arguing  that  ‘‘JetBlue  Airways  Corporation  and  Acxiom  Corporation 
have  engaged  in  deceptive  trade  practices  affecting  commerce  by  disclosing  con-
sumer personal information to Torch Concepts Inc., an information mining company 
with its principal place of business in Huntsville, Alabama, in violation of 15 U.S.C. 
§ 45(a)(1).’’ Although the FTC chose not to take action in response to the complaint, 
it continues to be our position that when a company represents that it will not dis-
close  the  personal  information  of  its  customers  to  a  third  party  and  subsequently 
does so, it has engaged in an unfair and deceptive trade practice. 

15 Letter  from  Chris  Jay  Hoofnagle,  Associate  Director,  EPIC,  and  Daniel  J. 
Solove,  Associate  Professor,  George  Washington  University  Law  School,  to  Federal 
Trade  Commission,  Dec.  16,  2004,  available  at  http://www.epic.org/privacy/ 
choicepoint/fcraltr12.16.04.html. 

16 EPIC v. Dep’t of Justice et al., No. 1:02cv0063 (D.D.C. 2002). 
17 Available at http://www.epic.org/privacy/choicepoint/default.html. 
18 Id. 
19 Id. 
20 Id. 
21 Id. 
22 Id. 
23 Id. 
24 ChoicePoint,  AutoTrackXP  Report,  http://www.choicepoint.com/samplelrpts/ 

AutoTrackXP.pdf. 

25 ‘‘Schneier  on  Security:  ChoicePoint’’  available  at  http://www.schneier.com/ 

blog/archives/2005/02/choicepoint.html. 

26 Aleksandra  Todorova, 

‘‘ChoicePoint  to  Restrict  Sale  of  Personal  Data,’’ 
Smartmoney.com,  March  4,  2005,  available  at  http://www.smartmoney.com/bn/ 
index.cfm?story=20050304015004. 

27 See  Chris  J.  Hoofnagle,  ‘‘Big  Brother’s  Little  Helpers:  How  ChoicePoint  and 
Other  Commercial  Data  Brokers  Collect,  Process,  and  Package  Your  Data  for  Law 
Enforcement,’’  University  of  North  Carolina  Journal  of  International  Law  &  Com-
mercial  Regulation  (Summer  2004),  available  at  http://ssrn.com/abstract=582302. 
28 See  FTC’s  investigation  into  Microsoft’s  Passport  program.  Documentation 

available at http://www.epic.org/privacy/consumer/microsoft/passport.html. 

29 15  U.S.C.  § 45(n);  Letter  from  Michael  Pertschuk,  FTC  Chairman,  and  Paul 
Rand  Dixon,  FTC  Commissioner,  to  Wendell  H.  Ford,  Chairman,  Senate  Consumer 
Subcommittee,  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  (Dec.  17, 
1980), available at http://www.ftc.gov/bcp/policystmt/ad-unfair.htm. 

30 In FTC v. Rapp, the ‘‘Touch Tone’’ case, the FTC pursued private investigators 
engaged  in  ‘‘pretexting,’’  a  practice  where  an  individual  requests  personal  informa-
tion about others under false pretenses. No. 99–WM–783 (D. Colo. 2000), 2000 U.S. 
Dist.  LEXIS  20627.  In  a  typical  scheme,  the  investigator  will  call  a  bank  with  an-
other’s Social Security Number, claim that he has forgotten his bank balances, and 
requests  that  the  information  be  given  over  the  phone.  The  FTC  alleged  that  this 
practice  of  the  defendants,  was  deceptive  and  unfair.  It  was  deceptive  because  the 
defendants deceived the bank in providing the personal information of another. The 
practice  was  unfair  in  that  it  occurs  without  the  knowledge  or  consent  of  the  indi-
vidual, and it is unreasonably difficult to avoid being victimized by the practice. 

31 ‘‘ChoicePoint  Incident  Prompts  State  Lawmakers  to  Offer  Data  Notification 

Bills,’’ 10 BNA Electronic Commerce & Law Report 217–18 (March 9, 2005). 

32 Associated  Press,  ‘‘38  AGs  send  open  letter  to  ChoicePoint,’’  Feb.  18.  2005, 
available  at  http://www.usatoday.com/tech/news/computersecurity/infotheft/2005- 
02-19-ag-letter-to-choicepointlx.htm. 

33 ‘‘ChoicePoint  Halts  Sale  of  Sensitive  Information,  as  Agencies  Launch  Probes,’’ 

10 BNA Electronic Commerce & Law Report 219 (March 9, 2005). 

34 Robert O’Harrow, No Place to Hide: Behind the Scenes of Our Emerging Surveil-

lance Society (Free Press 2005). 

35 See, e.g., Center for American Progress, ‘‘Protecting Privacy in the Digital Age,’’ 
May  4,  2005,  available  at  http://www.americanprogress.org/site/pp.asp?c=biJRJ8 
OVF&b=651807. 

36 Daniel  Solove  and  Chris  Jay  Hoofnagle,  ‘‘A  Model  Regime  of  Privacy  Protec-
tion,’’  March  8,  2005,  available  at  http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/papers.cfm? 
abstractlid=681902. 

37 See EPIC, ‘‘National ID Cards and REAL ID Act,’’ available at http://epic.org/ 

privacy/idlcards/. 

38 See  letter  from  Senators  Sam  Brownback,  R–Kan.,  Joe  Lieberman,  D–Conn., 
and 10 other Senators to Senate Majority Leader Bill Frist, Apr. 11, 2005 (‘‘Because 
of  its  magnitude,  this  legislation  should  be  referred  to  the  Senate  Judiciary  Com-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

68 

mittee on a schedule that provides adequate time for full and careful consideration. 
Legislating in such a complex area without the benefit of hearings and expert testi-
mony  is  a  dubious  exercise  and  one  that  subverts  the  Senate’s  deliberative  proc-
ess.’’),  available  at  http://www.senate.gov/&7Egovlaffairs/index.cfm?FuseAction 
=PressReleases.Detail&Affiliation=R&PressReleaseglid=953&Month=4&Year=2005. 

Senator  SMITH.  Mr.  Rotenberg,  it  is  a  fact  that—I  think  one  of 
my  colleagues—Senator  Kerry  was  asking—if  you  sign  up  to  buy 
insurance  on  your  property,  you’re  not  signing  up  to  have  your  in-
formation shared, necessarily. Or are there, in most of these trans-
actions, opt-in and opt-out factors or provisions? 

Mr. ROTENBERG. Well, this is a very important point, Senator. In 
most of these transactions, the individual actually has no direct re-
lationship with the information broker. In other words—— 

Senator SMITH. Are they even aware? 
Mr. ROTENBERG. They don’t know who these companies are. They 
don’t  deal  directly  with  them.  If  you  have  a  privacy  problem  with 
a bank, for example, you might decide not to do business with that 
bank,  and  you  would  have  the  opportunity  in  the  marketplace  to 
find  another  bank  to  do  business  with.  But,  you  see,  these  compa-
nies are very similar to the credit-reporting companies, in that they 
provide information that affects the ability of consumers to partici-
pate  in  the  marketplace,  to  get  jobs,  to  rent  apartments,  to  obtain 
insurance,  but  consumers  have  no  direct  relationship  with  them. 
And  that’s  why  we  think  regulation  in  this  area  is  so  important. 
Senator SMITH. But if we had—if this were at all possible, would 
you  recommend,  in  the  legislation,  they  have  a  means  for  opting- 
in to some of this identity—identification—— 

Mr. ROTENBERG. Yes. 
Senator SMITH. Yes. 
Mr.  ROTENBERG.  Yes.  Under  circumstances  where  the  consumer 

believes—— 

Senator SMITH. They want—— 
Mr. ROTENBERG.—there’s a benefit. 
Senator SMITH.—they want it known. 
Mr. ROTENBERG. Absolutely. In fact, that’s one of the approaches, 
we  think,  for  credit  reports,  for  example,  consumers  certainly 
would want to make their credit reports available if they’re seeking 
a  loan.  And  I  don’t  think  any  legislation  should  stop  them  from 
doing  that.  We’re  concerned  about  the  circumstances  where  their 
credit  reports  are  made  available  that  they  haven’t  made  that 
choice. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you. 
Ms. Frank? 

STATEMENT OF MARI J. FRANK, ESQ., ATTORNEY, 

MARI J. FRANK, ESQ. & ASSOCIATES 

Ms.  FRANK.  Hi.  Thank  you,  presiding-Senator  Smith  and  honor-
able  Committee  members,  invited  guests.  And  I  want  to  especially 
thank  Senator  Nelson  for  S.  500,  which  I  wholeheartedly  support. 
And  I  will  be  happy  to  help  you  on  S.  768,  because  I  think  there 
are a lot of great things in that, as well. 

I’m  an  attorney.  My  name  is  Mari,  by  the  way—people  call  me 
everything, but it is Mari—my name is Mari Frank, and I’m an at-
torney and privacy—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

69 

Senator SMITH. We’re called a lot of things, too. 
[Laughter.] 
Ms. FRANK. I know. I know. 
[Laughter.] 
Ms. FRANK. I’m an attorney and privacy consultant from Orange 
County, California. I’ve assisted thousands of identity-theft victims, 
and I also sit as an advisor to the State of California Office of Pri-
vacy Protection. 

In  1996,  my  identity  was  stolen  by  an  imposter  who  paraded  as 
me, robbing not only my personal life, but my professional identity. 
She took over $50,000 in credit, purchased a red convertible, rented 
a car and crashed it, and I was sued by the rental agency. I learned 
that,  while  working  as  a  temporary  secretary  in  an  office  4  hours 
from my home, my evil twin downloaded my consumer report from 
an  information  broker.  Because  there  is  no  law  requiring  a  data 
broker to inform me of the purchase, I couldn’t do anything to pre-
vent this heist. 

Most  victims  are  not  negligent  with  their  personal  information, 
and nothing will protect them from fraud if their information is ac-
quired  from  a  security  breach  or  by  faulty  information  practices  of 
data aggregators. 

Your  personal  information  is  worth  more  than  currency  itself.  A 
fraudster can do anything you can do with your identification, and, 
even  worse,  they  can  do  things  like  you—that  you  would  not  do, 
such  as  commit  crimes,  seek  revenge,  or  even  engage  in  terrorist 
activities. 

Here are some examples of the main types of identity theft: 
The first one is financial gain. These are examples of people who 

have personally contacted me. 

George  had  a  great  job  in  the  financial  industry.  When  he  was 
up  for  promotion,  he  permitted  a  background  check,  which  showed 
that  he  had  several  very  expensive  properties,  luxury  cars,  and 
even  a  boat.  Also,  it  showed  a  problem  with  his  CPA  license.  He 
learned that there were many credit accounts also that did not be-
long  to  him.  He  was  flabbergasted,  since  this  was  not  true,  none 
of  these  things  were  true.  Needless  to  say,  he  lost  the  promotion. 
Second  use,  avoiding  prosecution  or  avoiding  arrest.  Lori—and, 
by  the  way,  Lori  is  here  with  me  today.  I  have  been  helping  her 
since  last  December,  and  Lori  drove  4  hours  to  meet  me  and  come 
to this hearing. She’s with me today. Lori, a disabled vet who—and 
a  single  mom  with  a  set  of  6-year-old  twins,  was  attending  school 
to get her B.A. degree when the police showed up at her door. She 
was arrested and convicted for a crime that was committed by her 
imposter.  Neither  her  fingerprints  nor  her  physical  description 
matched  the  impersonator.  She’s  hoping  that  we’ll  get  a  new  trial 
for  her,  but,  more  worrisome  than  that,  she’s  fearful  that,  even 
when we get this cleaned up—which I’m sure we will—that the in-
correct data will be resold. 

And  here’s  the  reason  why  I’m  thinking  this  will  happen.  Scott 
Lewis  is  another  client  of  mine  who  wanted  to  drive  from  Ohio 
today,  but  I  think  he  sent  the  Senators  a  note.  Scott  was  laid  off 
from  a  high-paying  job.  He  had  great  recommendations  and  felt 
sure that he would be rehired. For 2 years, he was denied employ-
ment.  After  hiring  a  private  investigator,  he  saw  his  file  from  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

data  broker.  Included  in  it  were  two  driving—three  DUIs  and  an 
arrest for murder, none of which belonged to him. 

After  the  databases  were  finally  cleaned  up,  after  a  tremendous 
amount of time and effort, he still couldn’t get a job. So, again, we 
pulled his consumer background check. And, what did we find? The 
data broker was continuing to sell the erroneous information to all 
the prospective employers. Scott spent hundreds of hours living the 
nightmare of identity theft, and we did get him on Dateline and fi-
nally we were able to get him a job. 

Revenge. This is another reason someone does this. A radio talk- 
show host called me. He was shocked to learn that his own identity 
was  stolen  by  a  disgruntled  listener  who  bought  his  dossier  from 
an  online  information  broker.  Aside  from  calling  him  at  home  and 
bullying  him,  he  obtained  access  to  his  e-mail  and  sent  embar-
rassing e-mails to the station, pretending to be the talk-show host. 
And, finally, the last, but scariest, is terrorism and the threat to 
homeland security. The 9/11 terrorists had opened over 14 accounts 
at  a  Florida  bank,  using  the  false  Social  Security  numbers  and 
other  documents.  They  also  received  thousands  of  dollars  worth  of 
credit.  Not  only  did  they  do  this  for  financial  gain,  but  over  half 
of  them  had  names  that  were  known  as  suspected  terrorists.  So 
they committed total identity-theft takeover. And, worse, they used 
these false identities to get revenge against our country. 

Recently, at a meeting that I attended with Senator Feinstein in 
California,  law  enforcement  reported  to  her  that  suspected  terror-
ists  have  been  apprehended  with  many  false  documents  in  Cali-
fornia  so  that  they  could  hide  under  the  radar  screen  and  come 
over across our borders. 

Your  identity  is  especially  vulnerable  with  regard  to  the  mega- 
databases  held  by  information  brokers  who  are  selling  huge 
amounts of your sensitive information in all-inclusive profiles with-
out  any  governmental  oversight.  The  very  essence  of  the  data- 
broker business is selling a broad range of very private and highly 
sensitive  information,  which,  if  acquired  by  a  person  with  a  crimi-
nal  intent,  provides  a  complete  comprehensive  package  ready  for 
identity takeover. 

These  databases  contain  your  personal,  professional,  social,  pos-
sibly  criminal—true  or  not—and  financial  existence.  Tapping  into 
your data profile is a fraudster’s dream come true. 

In  my  written  testimony,  I  attached  Exhibit  I,  which  has  the 
ChoicePoint  AutoTrack,  which  will  show  you  the  kinds  of  informa-
tion—it’s  a  sample—it’s  not  a  real  person,  by  the  way;  it’s  just  a 
sample. It will shock you, as it did me. 

When  I  recently  attended  the  State  Bar  of  California  annual 
meeting,  a  data  broker  in  the  exhibit  hall  pulled  my  background 
after  I  gave  him  just  my  name.  I  was  horrified—not  only  because 
I felt violated by all that it revealed, but, worse, by the tremendous 
number  of  errors.  I  was  told  that  there  was  no  way  to  correct  the 
egregious  mistakes.  I  was  stunned  by  the  prospect  that  aspects  of 
that report may have resulted from my imposter’s actions. 

Also, I was reminded of the Amy Boyer case, where Liam Youens 
used  information  broker  Docusearch  to  obtain  Amy’s  Social  Secu-
rity  number  and  work  address  to  kill  her  and  then  himself.  Police 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

later  found  a  message  on  his  computer  that  said,  ‘‘It’s  actually  ob-
scene what you can find out about people on the Internet.’’ 

Data  brokers  are  invisible  to  most  citizens.  Everyone  in  this 
room  who  has  a  birth  certificate,  a  driver’s  license—or  if  there’s 
any public record about you at all, you are in those secret files. And 
there’s  much  more  about  you  from  the  data  aggregation.  Every 
Senator  and  everyone  watching  this  hearing  is  in  those  profiles. 
Have  you  seen  your  dossier?  Do  you  know  what  fact  or  fiction  is 
being sold about you? 

As  the  law  stands  now,  you  don’t  have  the  right  to  know  what 
is  in  these  files,  nor  do  you  have  the  right  to  correct  the  many  er-
rors,  nor  do  you  have  the  right  to  know  who  has  had  access  to 
these  sensitive  files,  nor  can  you  limit  the  sale.  Actually,  none  of 
us here, except maybe the data brokers, have control over anything 
in  those  files.  These  companies  have  operated  in  the  shadows  and 
have  sold  this  often  erroneous  information  to  myriad  companies, 
the government, and even to fraudsters. 

Most  Americans  don’t  even  know  who  these  companies  are  or 
what  they  do.  This  is  America,  the  home  of  freedom  and  liberty. 
This  is  not  a  communist  country  or  a  Nazi  regime  where  secret 
files are kept on citizens and shared with various entities and gov-
ernmental agencies. 

Don’t  law-abiding  citizens  have  a  right  to  at  least  see  the  dos-

siers and make sure that the information is correct? 

Although  the  credit-reporting  agencies  are  considered  data  bro-
kers, they’re regulated by the FCRA, the Fair Credit Reporting Act. 
And  that  law  gives  us  the  right  to  see  our  data,  review  it,  dispute 
it,  correct  it,  find  out  who  has  had  access  to  it,  and  we  can  even 
limit the sale. 

What is the impact of security breaches of the data brokers that 
are  here  today?  Those  impacted  may  not  yet  be  victims  of  identity 
theft,  yet  they  are  victims  of  a  Federal  crime.  The  Identity  Theft 
and  Assumption  Deterrence  Act  of  1998,  which  I  testified  for  back 
then, 18 U.S.C. 1028, makes it a Federal crime when anyone know-
ingly  transfers  or  uses  without  lawful  authority  a  means  of  identi-
fication of another person with the intent to commit or aid or abet 
any  unlawful  activity  that  constitutes  a  Federal—a  violation  of 
Federal  law  or  that  constitutes  a  felony  under  applicable  State  or 
local law. 

I  have  personally  spoken  with  victims  of  many  of  these  security 
breaches.  The  victims  feel  very  violated,  frightened,  and  helpless. 
It  is  well  known  that  criminals  steal  the  information,  but  may  not 
use  it  for  months,  or  even  years,  afterwards.  Additionally,  the  vic-
tims  have  not  been  notified  of  exactly  what  was  stolen.  They 
haven’t  seen  these  dossiers.  So  they  feel  entirely  defenseless  and 
don’t even know what to protect. 

All  right.  So,  what  needs  to  be  done?  I’m  going  to  go  quickly.  I 
really  appreciate  everything  in  S.  500,  and  I  have  a  lot  more,  25 
pages,  in  my  written  testimony,  but  I’m  going  to  just  do  a  quick 
sweep here. 

Senator SMITH. We’ll include it all in the record. 
Ms. FRANK. Right, OK. So, you can all see it. And I would really 
like  you  to  look  at  my  attachments,  as  well.  I  think  they’re  very 
important. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

72 

Number  one,  what  do  we  need?  We  need  transparency.  That 
means  we  need  to  see  what  they  have  available,  in  front  of  us,  for 
inspection. We need to define the uses of this information. 

Number  two,  we  need  consent  and  notice.  Consumers  should  be 
able to give their consent to disclosure of their information prior to 
disclosure. 

The consumer should be able to know when it’s sold. 
And the consumer should receive a free copy once a year, like we 

do under FCRA. 

The  consumer  should  also  have  access  and  inspection  and  the 
ability  to  correct.  There  should  also  be  quality  controls  and  timely 
correction,  so  that  if  I  contact  an  agency  and  I  see—for  example, 
what  happened  to  me,  I  would  like  to  correct  what’s  in  that  file, 
yet I—at this point, I can’t. And I want to know that I can correct 
it. And if it’s a public record, I need to know where to go to correct 
it. 

There  must  be  strict  security  controls  against  risk  of  loss.  We 

know this from what recently happened. 

We  need  enforcement.  Unfortunately,  what  I  have  seen,  in  the 
past  9  years  since  I  have  been  a  victim,  is  that  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission  is  overwhelmed.  I  also  now  am  also  a  sheriff  reserve 
in  Orange  County,  and  I  know  that—and  California  is  one  of  the 
top  states  for  identity  theft—about  one  in  ten  cases  are  inves-
tigated;  and,  of  those  one  in  ten  cases,  about  one  in  ten  are  pros-
ecuted. So, enforcement is really important. And the Federal Trade 
Commission doesn’t take many cases on this. So—— 

Senator SMITH. What do they find? Do they lead to a few people, 

or to many? 

Ms. FRANK. Depends. It depends on the circumstance. They usu-
ally won’t take the case unless it’s of very high jurisdictional value 
or  if  they  think  it’s  a  fraud  ring,  because  they  just  have  to 
prioritize. They just have limited resources. 

Enforcement  should  be  by  private  right-of-action.  It  should  also 

be by attorneys general and the Federal Trade Commission. 

And  it’s  very  important  that  we  preserve  State  rights.  I’m  from 
a State that has been very proactive. We have the best privacy leg-
islation, we are the only State with an Office of Privacy Protection. 
And  it’s  our  laws—in  fact,  we  were  the  second  State  to  have  an 
identity-theft  statute.  We  have  the  best  identity-theft  statutes,  as 
far as penal codes, in the country. We have the security-breach law. 
We  also  allow  security  freezes  to  lock  up  your  credit  report,  so,  if 
you’re  a  victim  or  even  a  consumer,  you—no  one  can  steal  your 
credit identity. So—— 

Senator SMITH. Are those laws working? 
Ms.  FRANK.  Yes.  And—well,  we  know  that  the  security-breach 
law  is  working,  because  in  July  of  2003,  our  law  became  effective. 
Prior to July 2003, we know that LexisNexis and ChoicePoint both 
had  security  breaches  that  they  admitted  in  a  hearing  before  the 
U.S.  Senate.  And  they  did  not  reveal  it  to  anyone—I  mean,  to  law 
enforcement,  yes—but  they  did  not  reveal  to  potential  victims. 
After  2003,  we  have  seen  a  tremendous  amount  of  disclosure  be-
cause  of  our  security-breach  law.  If  it  had  not  been  for  California, 
you would not even be here today to know about all this. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

So,  that  and  the  security-freeze  laws,  if  we  did  not  lock  up  the 
credit  reports—right  now,  there  are  four  states  that  allow  you  to 
close up your credit report for your credit freeze, and they are Cali-
fornia,  Texas,  Vermont,  and  Louisiana.  And  I  know  there  are  19 
states that have introduced such legislation. 

So,  if  you  tie  the  hands  of  State  legislators,  you’re  going  to  find 
that  there  is  going  to  be  a  huge  amount  of  problems  for  victims 
who  cannot  get  some  regulation  to  help  them.  And  a  lot  of  your 
bills, even the bills that were introduced by Senator Feinstein with 
regard to Social Security are based on California law. 

I  understand  about  Federal  preemption,  that  companies  don’t 
want  to  have  to  speak  to  all  of  the  various  states  and  deal  with 
that—it’s expensive—but I think we need to have a floor, not a ceil-
ing. 

And I’ll be happy to help this committee in any way I can. Thank 

you. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Frank follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARI J. FRANK, ESQ., ATTORNEY, 

MARI J. FRANK, ESQ. & ASSOCIATES 

Good morning, Chairman Stevens, Co-Chairman Inouye, Presiding Senator Smith, 
Honorable  Committee  Members,  and  invited  guests.  Thank  you  very  much  for  the 
opportunity  to  address  you  today  regarding  concerns  about  identity  theft  and  data 
broker  services.  I  am  grateful  that  Congress  is  studying  this  issue  to  craft  strong 
measures  to  prevent  identity  theft  in  our  society.  Your  desire  to  shine  the  light  on 
these problems and make needed changes deserves commendation. I also thank this 
panel of witnesses who will educate us about these issues from all perspectives and 
help to create solutions so that we may better protect our personal and confidential 
information  and  reduce  this  insidious  crime.  Additionally  I  thank  Senator  Bill  Nel-
son  for  introducing  S.  500,  The  Information  Protection  and  Security  Act,  which  I 
support because it addresses the need for responsible and reasonable oversight over 
the  data  broker  services  industry  while  providing  fair  information  principles.  I  will 
be  happy  to  assist  this  Committee  with  other  legislative  proposals  such  as  S.  768 
and others. Since this issue affects each one of us, I encourage a bi-partisan collabo-
rative approach to protect ourselves from identity theft. 

My name is Mari Frank. I am an attorney, privacy consultant, and author of sev-
eral  books  on  identity  theft  from  Laguna  Niguel,  California.  (My  two  newest  books 
are  Safeguard  Your  Identity:  Protect  Yourself  with  a  Personal  Privacy  Audit  (Por-
poise Press, 2005 and From Victim To Victor: A Step By Step Guide For Ending the 
Nightmare  of  Identity  Theft  2nd  Edition  with  CD,  Porpoise  Press,  2005) 
www.identitytheft.org.) I serve as a volunteer Sheriff Reserve for the Orange County, 
California  Sheriff  Department,  and  sit  on  the  Advisory  Board  of  the  State  of  Cali-
fornia  Office  of  Privacy  Protection  which  focuses  on  privacy  and  identity  theft  safe-
guards  for  California  citizens.  Additionally,  I  am  a  member  of  the  State  of  Califor-
nia’s  Department  of  Motor  Vehicle’s  Task  Force  on  Privacy  and  Identity  Theft,  I’ve 
served  on  the  Los  Angeles  District  Attorney’s  Office  Task  Force  on  Identity  Theft, 
and  I  am  an  advisory  board  member  to  the  nonprofit  Identity  Theft  Resource  Cen-
ter.  I  have  personally  assisted  myriad  victims  across  the  country  with  my  personal 
time and educational materials, and have donated hundreds of pro-bono hours to as-
sist  victims.  I  have  had  the  privilege  of  testifying  before  several  legislative  bodies 
and four U.S. Congressional Committees, and have consulted with national corpora-
tions on how to protect their clients, customers, vendors, employees, and their busi-
nesses from the challenges of identity theft and other privacy concerns. I am a cer-
tified trainer for Continuing Legal Education of the State Bar of California, a former 
law professor, and I presently teach Conflict Management at the University of Cali-
fornia, Irvine. 

My  own  identity  was  stolen  (in  1996)  by  an  impostor  who  paraded  as  me—steal-
ing  my  personal  as  well  as  my  professional  lawyer  identity.  While  wrecking  my 
credit, she also destroyed my sense of security and peace of mind. My impersonator 
obtained  over  $50,000  using  my  name,  purchased  a  red  convertible  Mustang,  and 
even  caused  me  to  be  threatened  with  a  lawsuit  by  a  rental  car  company  for  the 
auto that she damaged in an accident. It took me almost a year and over 500 hours 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

74 

to  clear  my  records  and  regain  my  credit  and  my  life.  I  accumulated  five  banker 
boxes  of  correspondence,  and  lived  in  fear  of  how  else  this  invisible  person  might 
harm me and my children. I finally learned that while working as a temporary sec-
retary in a law office four hours from my own office, my evil twin (who I never met) 
was  able  to  access  my  credit  history  (as  well  as  the  profile  of  other  lawyers)  from 
an information broker who had a contract with that office. My impostor did not need 
to  prove  who  she  was  or  establish  that  she  had  a  permissible  purpose  to  download 
the  profile,  so  it  was  instantly  faxed  to  her.  From  that  report,  she  obtained  my  So-
cial  Security  number  and  other  personal  and  financial  facts  to  become  my  identity- 
clone. When that data broker, situated across the country, electronically transferred 
my  consumer  profile  to  a  criminal  in  a  city  4  hours  from  my  home,  it  was  beyond 
my control to do anything to prevent the fraud. 

From  that  arduous  nightmare,  I  gained  great  insight  into  the  tribulations  that 
victims endure—I became an expert by necessity. After speaking with several thou-
sand victims, I have learned that most victims are not negligent with their personal 
information,  and  that  no  amount  of  ‘‘consumer  education’’  or  vigilance  will  protect 
them  from  identity  theft  if  their  information  is  acquired  in  a  security  breach  by  an 
unscrupulous  employee,  or  by  faulty  information  handling  practices  of  entities  that 
maintain their data. Consumer-privacy education is important to minimize your risk 
and keep you informed as to barriers to erect, but it won’t guarantee that your iden-
tity won’t be stolen by a data breach. 

Your  esteemed  Committee  has  invited  me  to  focus  on  the  concerns  and  problems 
experienced by victims of identity theft and security breaches. I will concentrate my 
testimony on answering the following questions: 

I. What Are the Motivating Factors for Stealing Your Sensitive Information? 
II. How Does Identity Theft Occur, and What Are the Unique Issues as to Data 
Brokers? 
III.  What  Are  Real  Life  Examples  of  Identity  Theft  as  They  Relate  to  Informa-
tion Brokers? 
IV.  What  Is  the  Impact  of  Security  Breaches  on  Citizens  Whose  Information  Is 
Stolen? 
V.  What  Needs  to  Be  Done  with  Regard  to  Minimizing  the  Risks  of  Identity 
Theft With Regard to Information Brokers? 
VI. What Else Is Needed To Prevent and Resolve Identity Theft? 

I.  What  Are  the  Motivating  Factors 

Information? 

for  Stealing  Your  Sensitive 

In our data-driven society your personal information is readily transferred across 
the  world  in  a  nano-second  through  networks  and  on  the  Internet  (whether  or  not 
you  are  a  computer  user).  Your  personal  information,  worth  more  than  currency 
itself,  can  be  used  to  apply  for  credit  cards,  credit  lines,  mortgages,  cell  phones,  in-
surance,  utilities,  products  and  services,  etc.,  all  without  your  knowledge.  A 
fraudster  can  do  anything  you  can  do  with  your  identifying  information—and 
worse—even do things you wouldn’t do such as commit crimes, seek revenge, or en-
gage in terrorist activities. 
A. What Is Identity Theft and How Is It Used? 

Identity  theft  occurs  when  your  personal  (or  business)  identifying  information 
such  as  your  name,  Social  Security  number,  address,  birth  date,  unique  passwords, 
business  name  or  logo,  or  even  biometric  information,  is  used  or  transferred  with 
the  intent  to  use  it  for  an  unlawful  purpose.  Below  are  the  main  motivations  of 
fraudsters: 
1. Financial Gain 

This includes credit, loans, new accounts, mortgages, employment, health care, in-
surance,  welfare,  citizenship,  and  other  governmental  and  corporate  benefits—any-
thing  that  has  a  dollar  value.  The  fraud  may  take  place  in  multiple  jurisdictions, 
and  purchases  and  transfers  can  be  made  by  phone,  fax,  online  or  in  person.  Usu-
ally,  the  perpetrator  can  buy  or  ‘‘legally’’  obtain  a  driver’s  license,  create  checks  on 
a  computer  with  the  victim’s  name,  obtain,  buy,  or  create  other  identity  documents 
including medical cards, credit cards, passports, etc. 
2. Avoiding Arrest or Prosecution 

A  criminal  commits  crimes  in  the  real  world  or  virtual  electronic  world,  or  ter-
rorist acts using the name and identifying information of another person. Often the 
perpetrator also commits financial fraud as well to supplement her income. In a re-
cent meeting I attended with Senator Feinstein and law enforcement, detectives and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

75 

district  attorneys  in  California  (and  also  in  Washington)  reported  that  that  80–90 
percent  of  identity  thieves  who  are  caught  also  have  a  pending  or  prior  meth-
amphetamine  charge  against  them  as  well.  In  my  own  case,  my  impersonator  was 
a ‘‘meth’’ addict who stole the identity of several lawyers to obtain credit and funds 
to feed her drug habit. 
3. Revenge 

One  can  remain  ‘‘invisible’’  by  stealing  an  identity  to  hurt  another  person.  This 
type  of  fraud  may  occur  between  ex-spouses,  former  business  partners,  ex-employ-
ees,  disgruntled  staff  or  angry  customers.  We  also  see  this  type  of  fraud  committed 
in businesses where one business owner will want to ruin the reputation of another. 
It can occur offline or online. I’ve been contacted by employees, and business owners 
who learned that their e-mail address was used to discredit them. 
4. Terrorism (Breaching Homeland Security) 

The  September  11,  2001  terrorists  had  opened  14  accounts  at  a  Florida  bank, 
using  false  Social  Security  numbers  and  other  documents.  They  obtained  credit 
cards,  apartment  units,  leased  cars,  and  fraudulently  charged  airline  tickets.  They 
not only did this for financial gain, but also over half of them likely suspected that 
their  true  names  were  in  FBI  files  as  suspected  terrorists,  so  they  committed  total 
identity  take-over  to  avoid  arrest.  And  worse,  they  used  false  identities  to  get  re-
venge  against  our  country.  In  Senator  Feinstein’s  meeting  with  law  enforcement  in 
California  on  March  29,  2005,  law  enforcement  reported  that  suspected  terrorist 
cells  have  been  apprehended  with  false  documents  in  California.  It  is  well  known 
that  foreign  nationals  have  covertly  crossed  our  borders  and  have  easily  obtained 
stolen identity documents to hide under the ‘‘radar screen.’’ 
II.  How  Does  Identity  Theft  Occur,  and  What  Are  the  Unique  Issues  as  to 

Data Brokers? 

A. Ways That Your Personal Information Is Stolen 

The scope and extent of the problem of identity theft is rampant. In 2003 the FTC 
conducted a survey found almost 10 million new victims that year, and 27.3 million 
victims  in  the  previous  five  years,  with  a  cost  to  consumers  of  $5  billion  and  a  loss 
to  financial  institutions  of  $48  billion.  (www.consumer.gov/idtheft)  According  to  the 
Identity  Theft  Resource  Center,  victims  paid  an  average  of  $1,400  in  out-of-pocket 
costs (not including attorney fees) and spent an average of 600 hours to regain their 
credit  and  identity.  (www.idtheftcenter.org)  The  monetary  costs  are  miniscule  com-
pared to the devastation, stress and violation one feels when they are denied a job, 
unable  to  get  an  car  or  apartment,  lose  the  opportunity  for  a  home,  lose  insurance 
health  benefits,  or  find  out  there  is  a  warrant  for  their  arrest—or  worse  yet,  when 
they are convicted of a crime committed by their impostor. Victims have a great bur-
den to ‘‘prove’’ their innocence, beg for an identity theft report, and spend hundreds 
of  hours  calling  and  writing  various  agencies  and  companies  to  get  their  life  back. 
The  epidemic  of  identity  theft  is  growing  because  sensitive,  personal  information 
is  acquired  very  easily,  and  the  issuers  of  credit  are  often  less  than  careful  in 
verifying  and  authenticating  the  true  identity  of  the  applicant.  There  are  many 
ways that fraudsters obtain data about us—it may be appropriated by, stolen mail, 
dumpster-diving, lost or stolen wallets, shoulder surfing, burglary, friends, relatives 
(only  about  9  percent),  unscrupulous  employees,  phone  fraud,  Internet  fraud 
(phishing  and  pharming),  spyware,  hackers,  unprotected  wireless  networks,  uneth-
ical  use  of  public  documents  that  contain  personal  information,  needless  display  of 
the Social Security numbers on government documents (such as; military and Medi-
care  identification  cards);  the  transfer  sale  and  sharing  of  Social  Security  numbers 
and other data among financial institutions, credit reporting agencies and data bro-
kers. 
B.  Data  Brokers  Files  Provide  Massive,  Broad-Based  Information  When  Accessed  by 

Fraudsters 

Although  an  identity  thief  has  a  choice  of  simple  easy  ways  to  steal  your  good 
name,  as  listed  above,  your  identity  is  especially  vulnerable  with  regard  to  the 
mega-databases  held  by  information  brokers  who  are  collecting,  storing,  sharing, 
buying, transferring and selling huge amounts of personal and sensitive information 
in  all  inclusive  profiles  without  any  governmental  oversight.  (For  example,  it  is  re-
ported that ChoicePoint has 19 billion files on citizens.) Although the credit bureaus 
also  hold  vast  financial  and  personal  data—and  if  accessed  also  reek  havoc  for  vic-
tims,  (like  what  happened  to  me)  at  least  these  credit  reporting  agencies  are  regu-
lated  by  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act,  and  there  was  a  way  for  me  to  correct  my 
file. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

76 

The  very  essence  of  the  data  broker  business  is  selling  a  broad  range  of  very  pri-
vate  and  highly  sensitive  information  which  if  acquired  by  a  person  with  criminal 
intent,  provides  a  complete  comprehensive  package  ready  made  for  total  identity- 
takeover. These databases contain your personal, professional, social, (possibly crimi-
nal)  and  financial  existence.  Tapping  into  your  data  profile  is  a  fraudster’s  dream 
come  true.  The  huge,  lengthy  dossiers  provide  far  more  than  just  a  Social  Security 
number  or  the  limited  information  that  could  be  accessed  from  stealing  a  bank  ac-
count,  your  mail,  or  even  your  un-shredded  trash.  Many  of  these  companies  have 
various  products  for  sale  which  will  tell  the  recipient  of  the  report  far  more  about 
you  than  your  family  or  friends  know.  Most  of  us  have  seen  our  credit  reports  and 
know  how  all  embracing  they  are  with  regard  to  our  financial  profile,  but  few  of 
us have seen our complete dossier stored and sold by the data aggregators. To give 
you  an  example  of  one  type  of  product,  I  have  attached  as  Exhibit  I,  a  sample 
AutoTrack  report  sold  by  ChoicePoint  for  you  to  see  how  much  information  may  be 
revealed about you, which also includes the persons in your home, and surrounding 
neighborhood. It should startle you. 
C. Viewing Your Vast Profile 

When I attended the State Bar Annual Meeting last fall, I visited the exhibit hall 
and was summoned by one of the data brokers to view my profile to see if I wished 
to  purchase  this  data  information  service  in  my  law  office.  All  I  provided  was  my 
name,  and  instantly  30  pages  of  private  information  (including  my  Social  Security 
number)  appeared  on  the  computer  screen.  I  was  shocked  and  horrified,  not  only 
because I felt very violated by all it revealed, but worse yet, by the numerous errors! 
I  asked  the  salesperson  how  I  could  correct  the  information  and  was  told  that  I 
could  not  correct  any  information  in  the  file;  that  this  information  was  not  subject 
to  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act.  Please  review  this  attached  sample  profile  and 
consider  how  each  category  heading  is  labeled,  i.e.:  ‘‘Possible  Social  Security  Num-
bers Associated With This Subject; Possible Deeds Transferred; Possible Felony/Pro-
bation/Parole.’’  As  a  recovered  identity  theft  victim,  I  was  stunned  by  the  prospect 
that  some  of  those  items  in  my  report  could  have  been  reported  as  a  result  of  my 
impostor’s  actions,  and  I  was  fearful  of  what  could  happen  to  me  and  my  family  if 
this information were to be acquired by someone who wished to do harm. I was re-
minded of the Amy Boyer case a few years ago in which a young man, Liam Youens 
used  an  on-line  information  broker—Docusearch  to  obtain  Amy’s  Social  Security 
number,  phone  number,  and  work  address  in  order  to  find  her.  He  then  appeared 
at  her  office  and  killed  her  and  then  committed  suicide.  Later  in  his  computer,  po-
lice  found  a  message  he  had  written  about  data  broker  services—‘‘It’s  actually  ob-
scene what you can find out about people on the Internet.’’ 
D.  Data  Brokers  Are  Operating  Under  the  Radar  Screen  and  Are  Invisible  to  Most 

Citizens 

Even with all the publicity about data brokers and recent security breaches, when 
I have spoken to large audiences in the last month about identity theft, most people 
still didn’t know these companies by name or what they do, or how they gather data 
or what’s in their databases. There is no transparency. In fact, most people tell me 
that  if  they  had  received  a  security  breach  letter  from  ChoicePoint  or  LexisNexis, 
they  probably  would  have  thrown  it  out  as  ‘‘junk  mail’’  since  they  hadn’t  heard  of 
the  company  and  do  not  have  a  business  relationship.  Many  potential  victims  who 
received  security  breach  letters  have  not  taken  advantage  of  LexisNexis’  offer  for 
a  year  of  credit  monitoring  (for  example)  because  they  didn’t  even  open  the  enve-
lope,  or  if  they  did,  they  didn’t  know  what  to  worry  about  since  they  didn’t  know 
what  was  revealed  from  their  files  to  cause  alarm.  None  of  the  breach  letters  that 
I  have  seen  contained  a  copy  of  the  profile,  or  a  detailed  list  of  the  data  that  was 
stolen. 
E.  Everyone  in  This  Room  and  Reading  This  Testimony  Has  a  Profile  in  the  Data 

Broker Files 

Do You Know What Information About You Is Being Sold? 

Everyone in this room who has a birth certificate, a driver’s license, if you’ve been 
married,  divorced,  have  auto  or  homeowner’s  insurance,  if  you  have  ever  worked, 
if you have a residence, if you have any government approved license, if you’ve been 
issued  a  speeding  ticket—YOU  ARE  IN  THOSE  SECRET  FILES.  Every  Senator  in 
this  room—and  every  one  watching  this  hearing  has  a  profile  in  those  files.  Have 
you  seen  your  dossier?  Do  you  know  what  fact  or  fiction  is  being  sold  about  you? 
As the law stands now—you don’t have the right to know what is in those files, nor 
do you have the right to correct the many errors, nor do you have the right to know 
who  has  had  access  to  those  sensitive  files,  nor  can  you  limit  their  sale—actually 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

77 

none of us here (except perhaps the data broker persons) have control over anything 
in  those  files.  These  companies  have  operated  in  the  shadows  and  have  sold  this 
often  erroneous  information  to  myriad  companies,  journalists  and  governmental 
agencies.  Yet  most  Americans  don’t  even  know  who  these  companies  are  or  what 
they do. This is America—the home of freedom and liberty, this is not a communist 
country or Nazi regime where secret files are kept on citizens—and shared with var-
ious entities and governmental agencies. The FBI and other law enforcement agen-
cies  are  purchasing  this  information  from  data  brokers,  so  are  employers,  insurers, 
landlords,  attorneys,  private  investigators,  and  others—shouldn’t  law  abiding  citi-
zens  have  a  right  to  at  least  see  the  dossiers  and  make  sure  that  the  information 
is correct? 

Although  the  credit  reporting  agencies  are  also  considered  data  brokers,  they  are 
regulated  by  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  and  that  law  gives  us  the  right  to  see 
our data, review it, dispute it, correct it, find out who has accessed it, limit its sale 
and review, and give us the right to enforce our rights. Unfortunately, the informa-
tion  service  industry  only  acknowledges  that  a  small  portion  of  its  products  apply 
to  the  FCRA  (i.e.,  reports  made  for  insurance,  employment  history,  landlord  tenant 
history,  medical  insurance).  Why  shouldn’t  the  data  brokers  be  subject  to  the  same 
fair information principles? 
III. What Are Some Real Life Examples of Identity Theft as They Relate to 

Information Brokers? 

A. Examples of Financial Identity Theft 

1.  John  is  a  recent  widower.  After  his  wife  died  of  cancer  at  age  35,  (leaving  him 
with  three  young  children),  he  began  receiving  collection  calls  from  credit  card  com-
panies, a computer manufacturer, and a cell phone company for the items and serv-
ices  allegedly  purchased  by  his  deceased  wife  after  her  funeral.  He  suspects  that  the 
imposter got the information from the death certificate which has the Social Security 
number  and  birth  date  on  the  document.  This  could  have  been  obtained  in  the  fu-
neral home, from public records offline or online, through the Social Security Admin-
istration, or from any information broker. 

Many  public  records  including  birth  certificates,  death  certificates,  marriages, 
pilot and captain licenses, etc. contain the Social Security number—which is the key 
to the kingdom of identity theft. The data brokers sell public records to almost any-
one.  John  became  a  victim  prior  to  July  2003  when  the  California  Security  Breach 
disclosure  law  became  effective.  If  he  were  a  victim  of  a  security  breach  after  July 
2003,  he  hopefully  would  have  been  notified,  and  would  have  had  a  chance  to  put 
up barriers to protect his deceased wife’s good name and his finances. 

2.  Sidney,  a  wealthy  retired  executive  learned  that  his  identity  was  stolen  many 
months  after  he  and  his  wife  purchased  a  new  home.  His  loan  application,  with  his 
3-in-1 credit report attached, revealed his credit score, his checking, savings, and in-
vestment accounts, Social Security number, and all necessary information for an im-
postor  to  become  Sidney.  He  believes  his  masquerader  had  gotten  a  copy  of  Sidney’s 
credit report which was on the broker’s laptop. The impostor opened new credit card 
accounts, purchased computers, electronic equipment, furniture, rented an apartment, 
obtained utilities, etc., stealing almost $100,000, and the couple are overwhelmed. 

Allowing employees to download credit reports, and maintain loan applications in 
unencrypted  files  on  laptops,  which  may  be  easily  stolen  outside  a  secured  office, 
makes  customers  very  vulnerable  to  identity  theft.  It  is  imperative  that  all  compa-
nies that collect data and transfer it for use, verify the recipient (that he or she has 
a  lawful,  permissible  purpose),  set  up  contracts  and  enforcement  for  the  security  of 
the  information.  It’s  critical  for  victims  to  get  notice  immediately  of  any  security 
breach,  so  that  they  may  take  steps  to  intervene  and  stop  further  fraud  activities. 
3. Susan, a physician, received a letter from a company that she did business with, 
that her Social Security number and other information about her had been acquired 
by unauthorized persons. She was terrified as to what could happen to her finances, 
and  her  practice.  She  put  fraud  alerts  on  her  credit  profile,  changed  all  her  pass-
words,  even  closed  accounts  and  opened  new  ones.  She  felt  very  violated,  angry, 
frightened  and  upset.  Almost  11⁄2 years  later,  she  started  receiving  calls  from  credi-
tors  from  accounts  she  never  owned—including  cell  phones,  credit  cards,  and  loans. 
She  believed  the  fraud  alert  would  remain  on  her  credit  profile—it  did  not.  Even 
when the fraud alert was on her file, companies seemed to ignore the alert and issue 
credit.  Since  she  lives  in  California,  she  was  able  to  place  a  security  freeze  on  her 
profile  so  no  one  could  see  her  credit  report  to  issue  credit  without  her  providing  a 
password to release her file. Now she has sleepless nights about her impostor parad-
ing  as  a  doctor  and  committing  other  crimes.  She  wants  to  see  a  full  background 
check from the information brokers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

78 

This  case  shows  us  why  it  is  so  important  to  receive  notice  of  a  security  breach. 
Susan  took  proactive  steps  to  prevent  fraud,  and  several  companies  called  her  and 
did  not  issue  credit.  Some  negligent  companies  ignored  the  alert.  Because  she  lives 
in one of the four states (presently California, Texas, Vermont, and Louisiana) that 
allow  victims  to  ‘‘freeze’’  their  reports,  she  was  finally  able  to  stop  the  financial 
fraud.  But  the  fear  of  criminal  identity  theft  is  now  haunting  her.  She  should  be 
able to put a fraud alert on her consumer profile and obtain a complete background 
check at no cost if she is a victim—just as victims can obtain two free credit reports 
in  the  12  months  in  which  they  learned  of  the  fraud.  She  should  also  be  able  to 
limit the sale of her consumer report and be notified with the name, telephone num-
ber  and  address  of  a  business  or  governmental  entity  (other  than  Homeland  Secu-
rity) to see who is accessing her profile. 
B. Examples of Criminal Identity Theft 

1. George, a disabled veteran living in Colorado was suddenly denied his disability 
payments, and hit with a large IRS bill for the income that his impostor had earned 
while working under his name in Tennessee. Upon reporting this fraud to the police, 
we  learned  that  George’s  impostor  had  also  established  a  criminal  record  in  yet  an-
other state and there was a warrant for George’s arrest. 

George’s information about his impostor’s criminal activity and work related fraud 
would  not  show  up  on  a  credit  report  (until  the  IRS  reports  it),  but  it  would  show 
up  on  a  background  check  provided  by  the  data  brokers  who  are  testifying  today. 
George  found  out  the  hard  way,  when  he  lost  benefits  and  was  arrested.  If  he  had 
access  to  his  consumer  file,  he  would  have  found  out  about  the  fraud  and  wouldn’t 
have lost his disability benefits. 

George’s  case  demonstrates  why  we  must  be  able  to  review,  dispute  and  correct 
our  consumer  files.  We  should  be  able  to  get  our  complete  dossiers  at  least  once  a 
year  at  no  cost  as  is  our  right  to  get  a  credit  report  from  each  of  the  three  credit 
reporting agencies under the Fair and Accurate Credit Transactions Act. 

2.  Lori,  a  disabled  vet  from  Virginia,  and  single  mom  with  a  set  of  six-year-old 
twins was attending school to get her Master’s degree in Social Work, when the police 
showed  up  at  her  door.  She  was  arrested  for  a  crime  that  she  didn’t  commit.  The 
woman who committed the fraud used the name Laura along with Lori’s last name. 
Her  fingerprints  did  not  match  the  prints  of  the  perpetrator,  and  the  description  of 
the  fraudster  was  different  from  Lori,  yet  she  was  convicted.  With  my  help  and  the 
help  of  new  counsel,  she  was  sentenced  to  probation—but  the  felony  record  must  be 
corrected with a new trial. Her greatest fear isn’t the new trial—it is the information 
broker  databases  that  may  continue  to  report  her  as  a  felon  even  after  the  criminal 
records are cleared. She has reason to fear as you will read in the next case. 

3.  Scott  was  laid  off  from  a  high-paying  job  in  the  medical  industry  in  Ohio.  He 
had great recommendations and felt sure he would be rehired. For two years he was 
denied employment after several positive interviews and his permission to do a back-
ground  check.  Finally  Scott  hired  a  private  investigator  who  showed  him  his  crimi-
nal profile from a data broker. It included two DUIs and an arrest for murder. None 
of  which  belonged  to  him.  I  spent  many  months  helping  him  to  correct  the  sheriff 
and  FBI  databases.  But  months  after  we  cleared  all  the  law  enforcement  databases, 
he  applied  for  employment  and  was  offered  the  job,  but  after  reviewing  his  back-
ground,  he  was  told  that  they  couldn’t  hire  him.  He  was  in  shock  when  the  private 
investigator pulled his report again and found that a major information broker was 
still  selling  this  false  information  to  prospective  employers  without  updating  their 
files. Finally after a lawsuit was filed by an Ohio attorney, the information was cor-
rected.  But  the  years  of  anguish  and  lack  of  employment  continues  to  damage  his 
career and his personal life. 

Scott had no idea why he had trouble getting a job. Although a potential employer 
is supposed to tell you if you are denied employment due to a consumer report, and 
let  you  know  how  to  review  the  report,  it’s  understandable  that  an  employer  may 
be  reticent  to  tell  a  ‘‘murderer’’  that  he  is  denied  employment  due  to  his  criminal 
history.  Instead  he  was  told  that  there  were  others  who  were  more  suitable  for  the 
position.  If  Scott  had  the  right  to  see  his  file  earlier  and  had  the  right  to  correct 
it,  he  would  have  been  able  to  secure  employment  and  perhaps  not  have  gotten  di-
vorced, lost custody of his son, nor become homeless for those years. 
C. Examples of Identity Theft for Revenge 

1.  Linda  was  married  to  a  prominent  Chicago  lawyer  for  25  years.  When  he  de-
cided  to  divorce  her  to  marry  his  secretary,  he  had  a  friend  download  Linda’s  con-
sumer information and give it to a fraudster who applied for numerous credit cards, 
ordered  furniture,  and  other  luxury  items.  The  fraudster  also  used  Linda’s  name  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

79 

set  up  e-mail  accounts  to  send  the  estranged  husband  threatening  messages.  This 
was done to discredit Linda in court. 

Obviously, there was no lawful purpose for downloading this report from the data 
broker.  There  was  no  verification  of  permissive  use  by  the  data  broker.  It  clearly 
was revenge and self-interest. 

2. The first cyber stalking case prosecuted in Orange County, California turned out 
to  be  identity  theft.  A  computer  expert  was  angry  when  a  woman  he  liked  shunned 
his advances. He proceeded to go online to a chat room and pretend to be her—stat-
ing  that  she  had  fantasies  of  being  raped.  From  a  data  broker,  he  was  able  to  find 
her  home  phone  number  and  address  and  shared  it  in  the  chatroom.  The  woman 
didn’t  even  own  a  computer.  When  several  men  appeared  at  her  door  to  share  her 
fantasies,  she  was  terrified  and  called  the  police.  She  had  an  emotional  breakdown 
and the violation has left scars. 

3.  A  radio  talk  show  host  was  shocked  to  learn  that  his  own  identity  was  stolen 
by a disgruntled listener who bought his dossier from an on-line information broker. 
Aside  from  calling  him  at  home  and  bullying  him,  he  obtained  access  to  his  e-mail 
account and sent embarrassing e-mails to the station, pretending to be the talk show 
host. 

The  above  cases  demonstrate  how  identity  theft  is  facilitated  by  the  data  broker 
industry. Unless a victim gets notice of a security breach or unless law enforcement 
or a private investigator can solve the mystery, most victims don’t have a clue how 
the  criminal  has  gotten  his  sensitive  records.  The  assaults  against  these  victims 
caused  great  anguish,  overwhelmed  them  and  negatively  impacted  every  aspect  of 
their  lives.  The  time  spent  trying  to  regain  their  lives,  the  damage  to  their  reputa-
tion, and the out-of-pocket costs were miniscule compared with the tremendous emo-
tional turmoil these people endured. 
IV. What Is the Impact of Security Breaches on Citizens Whose Information 

Is Stolen? 

Persons  whose  information  has  been  stolen  by  criminals  are  victims  of  a  crime. 
They  may  not  yet  be  victims  of  identity  theft—yet  they  are  victims  of  a  Federal 
crime. Not only has their private, sensitive information gotten into the hands of un-
authorized  persons—but  those  unauthorized  persons  have  done  so  with  the  intent 
to commit an unlawful act. Under 18 U.S.C. 1028, as stated below the persons com-
mitting the act are felons and those who are adversely affected are victims of a Fed-
eral felony: 

The  Identity  Theft  and  Assumption  Deterrence  Act  of  1998  (Identity  Theft  Act) 

18 U.S.C. § 1028) makes it a Federal crime when anyone: 

knowingly  transfers  or  uses,  without  lawful  authority,  a  means  of  identification 
of another person with the intent to commit, or to aid or abet, any unlawful ac-
tivity  that  constitutes  a  violation  of  Federal  law,  or  that  constitutes  a  felony 
under any applicable State or local law. 

I have personally spoken with victims of security breaches who have received no-
tice  letters  from  entities  such  LexisNexis,  ChoicePoint,  Ameritrade,  Bank  of  Amer-
ica,  Wells  Fargo  and  several  universities,  hospitals,  and  even  smaller  businesses. 
The victims of the breach feel very violated, angry, frightened and overwhelmed and 
helpless.  It  is  well  known  that  criminals  steal  the  information  and  may  often  wait 
months  or  years  to  use  it—or  they  sell  it  in  exchange  for  methamphetamine  or 
money. It may be transferred several times and used for financial gain or to commit 
other  crimes.  Because  the  victims  of  the  breach  don’t  know  who  the  criminals  are 
or their intent, they are anxious. Additionally, the victims are not notified as to ex-
actly what information may have been taken, so they feel defenseless and don’t even 
know  what  to  protect.  Although  I  tell  these  victims  actions  to  take  to  put  up  bar-
riers placing fraud alerts, instituting security freezes, changing passwords, changing 
mother’s  maiden  name,  monitoring  credit  reports,  etc.),  victims  still  feel  incapable 
of  insuring  that  their  identity  won’t  be  stolen.  Many  are  fearful  that  their  family 
home  or  office  may  be  intruded  by  the  perpetrators  who  may  have  their  addresses, 
phone numbers, bank account information and perhaps an entire dossier. 

Below are a couple of e-mails I received from victims of a security breach explain-

ing their strong feelings of victimization. 

‘‘My  husband  and  I  are  very  upset  and  it  is  overwhelming.  We  are  very  anxious 
and it takes a tremendous amount of time and effort just to get a security freeze. 
The  credit  agencies  shouldn’t  make  it  so  difficult.  I’m  spending  so  much  time 
monitoring  accounts  and  credit  reports—it’s  exhausting—I  feel  very  vulnerable 
and frightened that some criminal knows all about me and may wait to use our 
stuff any time, now or in the future— what can I do?’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

80 

‘‘I  spend  sleepless  nights  wondering  when  the  phone  may  ring,  or  I  will  open  a 
letter from a bill collector. I’m worrying if someone has obtained new identifica-
tion  under  my  wife’s  or  my  name.  It  is  scary  to  think  that  I  may  be  pulled  over 
by the police for something I didn’t do. What if they drag me or Lord forbid MY 
WIFE,  from  the  vehicle  and  handcuff  us.  My  wife  and  I  are  losing  too  much 
sleep’’ 

The  emotional  impact  on  these  victims  is  intense  and  their  fears  are  real.  Why 
would a criminal steal the information if there was no intent to sell, transfer or use 
it for an unlawful purpose? 
V. What Needs To Be Done With Regard to Minimizing the Risks of Identity 

Theft as to Information Brokers? 

Data  brokers  must  be  regulated  by  imposing  Fair  Information  Practices  as  fol-

1. Transparency—The nature of personal data held by these companies should be 
readily available for inspection by the public. The uses of the information should be 
clearly defined. 

2. Consent and Notice—Consumers should be able to give their consent to the dis-
closure  of  their  information  prior  to  disclosure,  such  as  the  rights  with  regard  to 
disclosure  of  credit  reports.  The  exceptions  would  be  for  defined  categories  of  law 
enforcement and Homeland Security. In other words there should be an established, 
permissible  purpose;  i.e.—employment  background  checks,  insurance,  landlord  ten-
ant,  etc.  When  a  consumer  gives  his  consent  or  it  is  considered  a  ‘‘permissible  pur-
pose,’’  the  consumer  should  be  entitled  to  notice  of  the  sale,  and  the  consumer 
should receive a free copy from the entity that bought the report. 

lows: 

3. Consumer Access and Inspection—Individuals should have the right to one free 
disclosure  per  year  as  they  have  for  credit  reports.  A  central  website  and  toll  free 
numbers should be set up for consumers to get their entire profile—not just a ‘‘Clue 
Report.’’  If  a  person  has  become  a  victim  of  identity  theft,  he  should  be  entitled  to 
at least one other free disclosure per year for 24 months after learning of the stolen 
identity.  The  inspection  report  should  be  the  same  as  would  be  accessed  by  a  com-
pany  for  a  background  check—the  complete  profile.  The  disclosure  should  also  pro-
vide  a  list  of  names,  addresses  and  phone  numbers  of  all  entities  that  received  a 
copy  of  such  report  in  the  last  5  years.  This  would  include  governmental  entities 
except for specific guidelines of Homeland security or other law enforcement restric-
tions.  Employers  or  others  who  order  background  checks  on  a  consumer  should  be 
required  to  provide  a  copy  to  the  consumer  upon  receipt  whether  or  not  the  con-
sumer  report  was  a  factor  in  hiring  or  reviewing  an  employee  or  prospective  em-
ployee. 

4.  Quality  Controls  and  Timely  Correction—The  information  collected  should  be 
accurate,  complete,  updated  and  relevant  to  the  purpose  for  which  it  is  to  be  used. 
The  Data  Broker  industry  should  allow  individuals  to  dispute  and  provide  prompt 
correction of the files within no more than 30 days. The broker should reinvestigate 
without  cost  to  the  consumer  and  make  all  appropriate  changes  if  the  information 
cannot  be  verified.  If  after  the  data  broker  investigates,  it  finds  that  the  investiga-
tion  verified  the  information,  the  company  shall  provide  the  name,  address  and 
phone  number  of  the  verifying  entity  so  that  the  consumer  can  directly  dispute  the 
information. 

5. Strict Security Controls—There should be safeguards against risk of loss, unau-
thorized  access,  alteration,  hacking,  etc.  Audit  trails  and  limited  access  should  be 
standard, as well as encryption of the sensitive data. Customers should be screened 
both initially and with respect to how the end-user is safeguarding the information 
from  unlawful  use.  In  the  event  of  a  security  breach,  the  data  broker  must  notify 
all  individuals  whose  information  was  acquired  either  on  paper  or  electronically 
with  a  letter  providing  the  consumer  the  nature  of  the  breach,  what  information 
was  stolen,  how  to  protect  themselves  with  fraud  alerts,  security  freezes  and  other 
useful  tools.  They  should  also  provide  a  free  copy  of  the  report  that  was  accessed. 
Credit monitoring and a background check monitoring would be needed. (Fraud res-
olution services may be necessary.) 

6. Enforcement—The data broker industry must be held accountable to consumers 
and  victims.  Outside  audits  and  training  should  be  mandatory.  A  private  right-of- 
action is essential to allow enforcement of the provisions of the law. A private right- 
of-action  provides  that  the  cost  of  the  legal  system  policing  against  acts  of  prevent-
able  corporate  negligence  is  paid  by  the  guilty  parties  rather  than  by  increasing 
taxes  or  adding  to  the  size  of  government.  We  have  seen  that  many  provisions  of 
FACTA  and  the  GLB  Act  have  not  been  enforced  because  Federal  agencies  do  not 
have the resources or manpower to take actions against all the violations, and why 
should our taxes be spent to right the wrongs of companies who violate the law. In-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

81 

dividuals  should  be  able  to  seek  redress  for  their  damages  without  having  to  rely 
on  the  government  to  intervene,  however  for  large  cases,  enforcement  should  be 
available in state courts by private parties, attorneys general and the FTC. 

7. Preserving States Rights—Consumer reforms with regard to identity theft have 
derived from proactive States that were responsive to the plight of its citizens. Some 
examples  of  this  are:  the  right  to  a  free  credit  report,  annually,  the  right  to  place 
a  fraud  alert,  the  right  of  victims  to  obtain  information  from  businesses  and  credi-
tors  to  regain  their  identity.  More  recently  we  have  found  out  about  the  security 
breaches of two of the data brokers here today only because of the California Secu-
rity  Breach  law.  Both  ChoicePoint  and  LexisNexis  admitted  in  a  Senate  hearing 
that  they  both  experienced  significant  breaches  prior  to  July  2003,  when  the  Cali-
fornia  law  became  effective,  and  did  not  notify  any  of  the  victims  of  the  breach. 
Since February 2005, over 4 million Americans have been victims of various security 
breaches.  (See  Exhibit  II  from  the  Wall  Street  Journal)—none  of  which  we  would 
have heard about, but for the California law. Arizona and California, were the first 
two  states  to  make  identity  theft  a  crime—leading  all  the  states  and  the  Federal 
Government to establish the consumer as a true victim. Numerous states are insti-
tuting security freezes to lock up a consumer’s credit so fraud cannot continue. Fed-
eral law should serve as a floor, not a ceiling, so that states can, if need be, quickly 
address the crises of their victims. 
VI. What Else Is Needed To Prevent and Resolve Identity Theft? 

1.  Security  Breach  Notification  must  extend  to  all  states—All  governmental  agen-
cies, and private industry, schools, and other entities should be held accountable to 
quickly notify all persons whose sensitive and personal information (paper and elec-
tronic files) were acquired by an unauthorized person. There should be an exception 
for encryption only if it is robust and if the unauthorized acquisition was not capa-
ble  of  being  decrypted  by  an  unscrupulous  employee  or  customer.  The  standard  of 
providing  notice  should  be  triggered  by  the  acquisition  of  the  data  rather  than  the 
use  of  it.  A  bank  or  other  entity  who  experiences  a  breach  should  not  be  allowed 
to determine the possibility of the misuse. The only delay of notice would be for law 
enforcement  upon  its  written  request.  Allowing  the  business  or  entity  to  make  the 
call  as  to  when  there  might  be  a  risk  of  harm  is  like  allowing  the  wolf  to  tend  the 
henhouse.  There  should  be  enforcement  by  the  FTC,  State  attorneys  general  and 
private  individuals.  Any  preemption  should  be  a  floor  and  not  a  ceiling  so  that 
states  can  protect  their  own  citizens  regarding  unique  needs.  As  a  member  of  the 
advisory  board  of  the  California  Office  Of  Privacy  Protection,  we  created  a  list  of 
‘‘Recommended Practices on Notification of Security Breaches Involving Personal In-
formation’’  as  a  guide 
for  dealing  with  security  breaches,  please  visit 
www.privacy.ca.gov to review those standards. 

2.  Governmental  agencies  as  well  as  private  industry  should  limit  the  use  of  the 
Social  Security  number  since  it  is  presently  the  key  to  kingdom  of  financial  fraud— 
Our  advisory  board  to  the  Office  of  Privacy  Protection  in  the  California  Office  of 
Consumer  Affairs  also  had  the  privilege  of  developing  the  ‘‘Recommended  Practices 
for  Protecting  the  Confidentiality  of  Social  Security  Numbers’’  (www.privacy.ca.gov). 
This  document  should  be  considered  by  both  pubic  and  private  sector  entities  as  a 
guide to protect all consumers. 

The  Social  Security  number  is  used  as  the  identifier  for  military  cards  and  ‘‘dog- 
tags,’’  Medicare,  Medicaid,  pilot’s  licenses,  captain’s  licenses,  etc.  No  entity  should 
be  allowed  to  display,  post,  or  sell  the  SSN.  The  SSN  in  public  records  should  be 
redacted before posting. There should be no collection of SSNs by private or govern-
mental agencies except where necessary for a transaction and there is no other rea-
sonable  alternative.  SSNs  collected  for  a  specified  purpose  should  not  be  used  for 
any other purpose. 

3.  Mandatory  Destruction  of  Confidential  Information—Governmental  agencies 
and  private  industry  should  be  required  to  completely  destroy  personal  information 
that  they  are  discarding  by  shredding,  burning  or  whatever  means  is  necessary  to 
protect  the  information  from  dumpster-diving.  This  should  extend  to  any  confiden-
tial and sensitive information—not just information derived from consumer reports. 
4.  Departments  of  Motor  Vehicle  Licensing—Bureaus  should  establish  more  strin-
gent  monitoring  and  matching  of  duplicate  licensing  and  new  licenses.  A  photo  ID 
and  a  fingerprint  could  be  matched.  Rather  than  developing  a  ‘‘national  ID’’  with 
various forms of biometric information, credit cards and other unnecessary informa-
tion which would complicate the process and invade privacy, this license would help 
deter  interstate  identity  theft  without  collecting  too  much  information  nor  allow  it 
to be accessed or sold to private industry. 

5.  Need  for  an  Easier  Process  for  Victims—Problems  with  the  Fair  and  Accurate 

Credit Transactions Act (which was meant to make things easier for victims)— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

82 

a.  An  Identity  Theft  Report  is  needed  in  order  for  victims  to  get  an  extended 
fraud  alert,  block  the  fraud  on  their  profile,  and  gain  access  to  records  of  the 
fraud—FACTA  was  meant  to  streamline  and  help  victims  of  identity  theft. 
However, the new rules recently released by the FTC with regard to the ‘‘Iden-
tity  Theft  Report’’  clearly  show  the  time-consuming  maze  that  a  victim  must 
maneuver. Below is an example of the hassle of exerting your victim rights with 
regard to the FTC rule about the ‘‘Identity Theft Report.’’ 
‘‘An Identity Theft Report may have two parts: 
Part  One  is  a  copy  of  a  report  filed  with  a  local,  State,  or  Federal  law  enforce-
ment agency, like your local police department, your State attorney general, the 
FBI,  the  U.S.  Secret  Service,  the  FTC,  and  the  U.S.  Postal  Inspection  Service. 
There is no Federal law requiring a Federal agency to take a report about iden-
tity theft; however, some State laws require local police departments to take re-
ports.  When  you  file  a  report,  provide  as  much  information  as  you  can  about 
the  crime,  including  anything  you  know  about  the  dates  of  the  identity  theft, 
the fraudulent accounts opened and the alleged identity thief. 
Note:  Knowingly  submitting  false  information  could  subject  you  to  criminal 
prosecution for perjury. 
Part Two of an identity theft report (depends on the policies of the consumer re-
porting company and the information provider) (the business that sent the infor-
mation  to  the  consumer  reporting  company).  That  is,  they  may  ask  you  to  pro-
vide  information  or  documentation  in  addition  to  that  included  in  the  law  en-
forcement  report  which  is  reasonably  intended  to  verify  your  identity  theft. 
They must make their request within 15 days of receiving your law enforcement 
report, or, if you already obtained an extended fraud alert on your credit report, 
the  date  you  submit  your  request  to  the  credit  reporting  company  for  informa-
tion  blocking.  The  consumer  reporting  company  and  information  provider  then 
have  15  more  days  to  work  with  you  to  make  sure  your  identity  theft  report 
contains everything they need. They are entitled to take five days to review any 
information  you  give  them.  For  example,  if  you  give  them  information  11  days 
after  they  request  it,  they  do  not  have  to  make  a  final  decision  until  16  days 
after  they  asked  you  for  that  information.  If  you  give  them  any  information 
after  the  15-day  deadline,  they  can  reject  your  identity  theft  report  as  incom-
plete; you will have to resubmit your identity theft report with the correct infor-
mation:’’ (FTC Rules) 
This rule is not only cumbersome it is confusing and allows the credit reporting 
agencies  to  delay  unnecessarily  and  it  gives  victims  a  run  around.  I  have  al-
ready  heard  from  many  victims  who  are  frustrated,  angry,  and  unable  to  block 
the fraud or even extend the fraud alert. 
b. Law enforcement agencies at the local, State and Federal level should develop 
a  uniform  ‘‘identity  theft  report’’  to  be  compliant  with  FACTA—and  the  FTC 
should determine what satisfies an ‘‘identity theft report’’—New provisions of the 
Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  require  a  detailed  ‘‘identity  theft  report’’  to  send  to 
the  credit  grantors,  and  the  credit  reporting  agencies.  If  a  proper  identity  theft 
report  is  sent  to  the  credit  reporting  agencies  they  are  required  to  do  the  fol-
lowing: place an extended fraud alert for 7 years, block all the fraud on the pro-
file immediately; notify the creditor that the accounts are blocked. Additionally, 
if the victim provides a proper, identity theft report to the creditors, they must 
provide all documentation of the fraud to the victim and to the law enforcement 
agency  within  thirty  days.  Unfortunately,  the  agencies  themselves  are  deciding 
what  is  ‘‘proper’’  and  many  victims  contacted  us  because  they  are  not  able  to 
appease  the  credit  reporting  agencies  nor  the  credit  grantors  with  the  reports. 
So they cannot exert these rights afforded under the law and there is no private 
right-of-action to enforce these rights. 
The  FTC  should  determine  what  will  be  acceptable  as  an  identity  theft  report 
and  facilitate  the  victim’s  report.  It  should  be  adhered  to  by  law  enforcement 
as  well  as  the  financial  industry  without  imposing  an  arduous  task  upon  the 
victim.  Also,  the  victim  should  be  able  to  get  a  police  report  in  the  jurisdiction 
where  she  lives  even  if  the  impostor  is  in  another  state.  And,  the  case  should 
be  able  to  be  prosecuted  in  the  jurisdiction  where  the  victim  lives  or  the  juris-
diction  where  the  crime  takes  place.  All  police  should  be  required  to  provide  a 
proper identity theft report even if they do not have the resources to investigate 
the crime. 
c.  Initial  Fraud  alert  should  be  one  year—FACTA  allows  a  victim  of  a  breach 
or  fraud  to  place  a  fraud  alert  on  credit  profiles  for  at  least  90  days  with  their 
first  phone  call.  To  extend  the  alert  they  must  write  a  letter  and  provide  an 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

83 

‘‘identity theft report. The initial fraud alert should be changed to at least 1 year 
especially because victims of a security breach may not be victimized for a long 
time. 
d. Free credit report for victim should be available by phone when calling in the 
fraud alert—Prior to the passage of FACTA, victims could order their free credit 
report to review their files at the same time they place a fraud alert. Now, the 
credit  reporting  agencies  (except  for  TransUnion  ‘‘temporarily’’)  do  not  give  the 
victim an opportunity to get the free credit reports in the initial phone notifica-
tion  of  the  fraud.  They  are  later  sent  a  letter  notifying  them  of  their  right  to 
a  free  report  upon  request.  This  is  another  delay  which  allows  the  impostor 
more  time  to  do  his  ‘‘dirty  work,’’  and  this  is  an  added  burden  for  the  victim 
and  costlier  for  the  creditor.  The  victim  should  be  allowed  to  order  the  first  of 
his two free reports during the initial fraud alert phone call. 
e.  Victims  should  be  provided  a  complete  report  upon  disputing  the  fraud  and 
the victim should be able to see the report that the creditors see—The CRAs are 
now  sending  corrections  instead  of  complete  corrected  reports  to  victims.  This 
is dangerous since other new fraud may appear on the report. Also—the report 
that  a  creditor  receives  is  more  comprehensive  than  the  report  that  the  victim 
sees, so this is not complete disclosure. 

6. Funding for law enforcement for identity theft cases should be greatly increased 
since  this  is  also  a  Homeland  Security  issue—All  major  metropolitan  areas  should 
be funded to set up identity theft task forces to include the Secret Service, the Post-
al Inspector, the Social Security Inspector, the FBI, INS, State attorney general and 
local  law  enforcement  to  collaborate  in  the  investigation  and  prosecution  of  these 
crimes  since  suspected  terrorists  will  need  to  utilize  stolen  identities  to  attempt 
their missions. 

7. Law enforcement agencies should help victims of criminal identity theft—A Fed-
eral law should set forth steps for law enforcement to take (in conjunction with the 
judicial  system),  to  assist  victims  of  criminal  identity  theft.  So  a  victim  of  criminal 
identity theft in California, whose impostor is in New York, could be declared inno-
cent  in  New  York  as  well  as  California.  This  would  entail  a  national  database  of 
the  criminal  information  and  fingerprints.  It  would  contain  the  order  of  the  true 
person’s  fingerprints  for  comparison  with  the  fingerprints  of  the  impostor-criminal 
in New York. The court would enter a declaration of factual innocence and any war-
rants  for  the  victim  would  be  dismissed.  All  databases  would  be  corrected  so  that 
background  checks  would  not  show  the  victim  as  having  an  arrest  or  criminal 
record.  (See  California  law  and  package  for  victims  to  clear  their  criminal  record 
www.privacy.ca.gov). 

8. Set up State and Federal Offices for Privacy Protection—There should be a Fed-
eral office of privacy protection as well as State offices. The office of privacy protec-
tion  should  institute  an  ombudsmen  office  to  assist  citizens  with  identity  theft  and 
other  serious  privacy  issues.  It  should  also  coordinate  and  review  the  various  gov-
ernmental offices of privacy to ensure oversight. 

9. Credit Reporting Agencies— 

a.  Consumers  should  be  able  to  put  a  complete  freeze  on  their  credit  reports  in 
order to prevent identity theft—This would enable the consumer to prevent their 
credit  report  from  being  accessed  by  a  creditor  without  the  specific  authoriza-
tion of release with a password. California, Texas, Vermont and Louisiana have 
passed  such  laws.  It  would  be  impossible  for  an  impostor  to  apply  for  credit  if 
there  were  a  freeze  on  the  file.  The  consumer  would  have  the  right  to  release 
the  file  when  he  so  desires  by  a  password  or  pin  number.  Every  State  should 
pass  this  legislation  or  if  it  is  Federal  legislation,  then  there  needs  to  be  a  pri-
vate right-of-action and no Federal preemption. 
b.  Credit  reporting  agencies  should  provide  to  victims  a  COMPLETE  REPORT 
when  providing  corrections—All  reports  should  include  the  names,  addresses 
and phone numbers of the companies who accessed the consumer’s credit report, 
including inquiries with the issuance of a consumer report so that potential vic-
tims could verify the permissible purpose. 
c.  Credit  reporting  agencies  should  notify  a  consumer  by  e-mail  when  his/her 
credit report has been accessed—The agency should be allowed to charge a mini-
mal fee for this service—as to actual cost (i.e., $10 per year), 
d.  Credit  reporting  agencies  should  set  up  hotlines  with  live  persons  to  talk  to 
victims of identity theft—A live employee in the fraud department should be as-
signed  to  a  particular  victim—so  the  victim  doesn’t  have  to  re-explain  all  the 
problems in numerous letters. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

84 

10. Banks and other Creditors should be held accountable for protecting consumers 

and others from identity theft— 

a.  Creditors  who  issue  credit  to  an  impostor  after  a  fraud  alert  is  placed  on  a 
credit  profile,  should  be  held  liable  and  the  victim  should  have  a  private  right- 
of-action  to  enforce  his  rights—Presently  if  a  creditor  ignores  the  fraud  alert, 
only  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  or  other  Federal  agencies  may  bring  and 
action  and  they  clearly  cannot  enforce  individual  rights  nor  do  they  have  the 
resources  to  deal  with  most  of  the  violations.  There  should  be  a  fixed  penalty 
of at least $1000 per occurrence or actual damages, which ever is greater. 
b.  Need  for  private  enforcement  of  access  to  business  records—If  a  fraud  victim 
provides notification of fraud and includes an ‘‘identity theft report’’ and an affi-
davit, under the FCRA, a creditor is required, within 30 days, to provide copies 
of  all  billing  statements,  applications  and  other  documents  of  fraud  to  the  vic-
tim  and  the  designated  law  enforcement  agency.  Presently,  victims  are  con-
tacting us that many companies are refusing to provide the information without 
a  subpoena.  Victims  presently  have  no  private  right  to  force  a  company  to  pro-
vide this data. Only the FTC, or other Federal agencies, may bring an action— 
but it cannot help an individual consumer. This must be changed so that there 
will be enforcement of the provision of the Act. 
c.  Creditors  should  not  be  allowed  to  send  ‘‘convenience  checks’’  without  a  prior 
request  by  the  consumer—I  was  told  by  a  postal  inspector  that  35  percent  of 
these checks are used fraudulently 
d.  Credit  grantors  should  not  be  allowed  to  send  pre-approved  offers  of  credit 
without a PRIOR the request of the consumer. 

Identity Theft Conclusions 

Personal, confidential, and financial information is a valued commodity in our so-
ciety.  Data  brokers  have  flourished  abundantly  while  selling  and  transferring  your 
extensive,  aggregated  personal  profiles  which  include  your  income,  credit  worthi-
ness,  buying,  spending,  traveling  habits,  heath  information,  age,  gender,  race,  etc. 
Facts  about  our  personal  and  financial  lives  are  shared  legally,  and  illegally,  with-
out  our  knowledge  or  consent—on-line  and  off-line  everyday.  Privacy  protection  in 
the age of data collection is really more about limiting access and instituting inspec-
tion  and  correction  to  our  records,  rather  than  keeping  the  information  secret.  We 
have  lost  control  over  the  dissemination  of  our  sensitive  data,  and  this  has  led  to 
the  enormous  epidemic  of  identity  theft.  The  huge  data  breaches  in  recent  months 
have  shined  the  light  on  the  immensity  of  the  problem  of  identity  thieves  and  the 
havoc they cause. But it also has enlightened our lawmakers to collaborate to create 
a new framework for reasonable regulation of the data broker industry. 

To avert identity theft, the burden is on the data brokers, and the financial indus-
try  who  are  in  the  unique  position  on  the  front  end,  to  take  precautions,  require 
verification,  and  authentication  of  employees,  vendors,  business  associates  and  cus-
tomers,  and  refuse  to  sidestep  fair  information  principles.  Data  brokers,  the  credit 
reporting  agencies  and  the  financial  industry  is  in  a  powerful  position  to  prevent 
the fraud before the impostor can establish a parallel ‘‘shadow profile.’’ 

I  am  hopeful  that  as  a  result  of  the  gigantic  breaches  of  sensitive  information, 
that  this  Congress  will  create  a  regulatory  framework  for  the  information  brokers 
that  will  protect  our  citizens  and  enable  the  Data  Broker  industry  to  help  society. 
I  encourage  you  to  strongly  consider  the  thoughtful  and  well  reasoned  language  of 
S. 500, which implements the Fair Information Principles, yet acknowledges the im-
portance  the  work  that  the  data  industry  provides,  while  safeguarding  the  identity 
of every American. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  share  these  concerns  and  suggestions  with  this 

Honorable Committee. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Sample Auto Track Data on Fictitious Person From ChoicePoint 

85 

EXHIBIT I 

National Comprehensive Report Plus Associates 
Compiled on 01/05/2002 at 3:39PM 
Reference: 123456 
ZACHARY K THUL DOB: JAN 1955 
SSN 960–45–XXXX issued in New York between 1968 and 1970 
Possible AKA’s for Subject 
THUL, ZACK K SSN: 960–45–XXXX 
Possible Other Social Security Numbers Associated with Subject 
THUL, ZACHARY K SSN: 690–45–XXXX 
THUL, ZACHARY K SSN: 690–45–XXXX 
**ALERT** A Death claim was filed for SSN 690–45–XXXX in FEB 1962. 
Possible Other Records/Names Associated with Social Security Numbers 
KIRBY, LOARDA SSN: 983–16–XXXX 
KIRBY, LORADA SSN: 960–45–XXXX 
Possible Driver Licenses 
THUL, ZACHARY K 
DL: T432117680470 issued in Ohio on 12/19/1996 expires 02/07/2001 
DOB: 01/17/1955 Height: 5′08″ 
7891 W FLAGLER ST MIAMI, OH 38972 
Possible Addresses Associated with Subject 
SEP–1997/DEC–2000—7891 W FLAGLER ST 
MIAMI, OH 38972 
JUN–1995/AUG–1997—15 ROBY AVE (555) 123–4567 
HAMPTON BAYS, NY 11238 
JUN–1996/JUN–1996—1400 35TH ST K 4I 
SPRINGFIELD, FL 34090 
MAY–1995/MAY–1995—4833 STORM ST APT 33 
SPRINGFIELD, OH 34443 
JUL–1994/JUN–1996—4833 STORM ST I33 
SPRINGFIELD, OH 34443 
SEP–1994/JUL–1995—305 WAYBREEZE BLVD 
COLUMBUS, OH 34209 
DEC–1992/APR–1995—70 REARVIEW DR 
RIVERBEND, NY 11903 
438 BULLSIDE TER W 
HACKENSACK, NJ 09348 
The following is a sample National Comprehensive Report SM Plus Associates. 
The  amount  and  type  of  records  identified  in  a  report  will  vary  from  subject  to 
subject.  All  names  and  other  information  are  fictional  and  are  for  illustrative  pur-
poses only. Any resemblance to real persons or public record information is uninten-
tional. Some National Comprehensive Reports SM may locate a partial date of birth. 
Frequently,  subjects  of  a  National  Comprehensive  Report SM will  be  linked  to  other 
names because two public records reference two different names, but only one Social 
Security number. The most common reasons for these occurrences are: 

1. Typographical errors 
2. Jointly filed public records which list both the subject and the second name 
3. Father and son who have the same name 
4.  Fraudulent  use  of  a  Social  Security  number  The  dates  represent  the  approxi-
mate  time  period  when  the  linked  address  appeared  on  a  publicly  available  record 
document  for  the  subject.  The  subject  may  or  may  not  have  resided  at  any  of  the 
addresses. Some public records link the subject to an address without noting a date 
range. Addresses without date ranges will appear at the bottom of the address list. 
Such  an  address  may  be  current  or  historical.  Underlined  Items  provide  a  Link  to 
record details. 

Phone Listings for Subject’s Addresses 
1400 35TH ST W SPRINGFIELD, FL 34090 
Over 100 phone numbers found, only same last name considered. 
4833 STORM ST SPRINGFIELD, OH 34443 
ACME RENTALS (555) 555–1935 
305 WAYBREEZE BLVD COLUMBUS, OH 34209 
THUL ZACHARY (555) 498–5525 
Possible Real Property Ownership 
4833 STORM ST SPRINGFIELD, OH 34443 
Ohio Assessment Record—County of: CLARK 
Owner Name: THUL, ZACHARY 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

86 

Parcel Number: 998–8748–9448 
Short Legal Desc: STORM ST IR PT LOT 7& ADK J S BUCKINGHAM AM EST 
Property Type: SINGLE FAMILY 
Recorded Date: 
Situs Address: 4833 STORM ST I 33 
SPRINGFIELD, OH 34443 
Mailing Address: 7891 W FLAGLER ST 
MIAMI, OH 38972 
Assessment Year: 1995 Tax Year: 1997 
Assessed Land Value: Market Land Value: $366,800 
Assessed Improvements: Market Improvements: $192,000 
Total Assessed Value: Total Market Value: $558,800 
Most Recent Sale: $305,000 Prior Sale Price: 
A  manual  search  of  Real  Property  using  the  name  THUL  ZACHARY  K  is  rec-
ommended. 4 additional property records exist (including historicals) but are not in-
cluded, as they do not match all necessary criteria. 

Possible Deed Transfers 
305 WAYBREEZE BLVD COLUMBUS OH 34209 
Ohio Deed Transfer Records—County of: FRANKLIN 
Parcel Number: T545663 
Legal Desc: LT 56 BLK 87 PB 14/38 
Sale Price: $84,000 Loan Amount: $67,200 
Contract Date: 8/14/1995 
Lender: LIBERTY SAV BK 
Situs Addr: 305 WAYBREEZE BLVD 
COLUMBUS, OH 34209 
Seller(s): THUL, ZACHARY K 
Buyer(s): SMITH, BART O 
Possible Vehicles Registered at Subject’s Addresses 
1400 35th ST K 4I SPRINGFIELD, FL 34090 
Plate: K387KJ State: NY Date Registered: 08/14/1995 Expire Date: 08/29/2000 
Title: 76174678 Title Date: 10/30/1998 
OWNER: ZACHARY K THUL 
Color: WHITE 
This  message  probably  indicates  that  a  multi-unit  building  is  located  at  this  ad-

dress. 

By comparing the list of Possible Addresses Associated with Subject with the listed 
phone numbers in the Phones module, the report finds phone numbers, which have 
been  listed  at  the  given  address.  In  this  report,  one  property  record  was  found  in 
Real Property SM which matched the subject’s name and address and the properties 
situs  address.  This  message  indicates  that  additional  records  in  Real  Property SM 
match  the  subject’s  name,  but  none  of  these  records  had  a  situs  address  that 
matched an address found at the top of the report. These additional properties may 
belong to the subject or may simply belong to someone with the same name. Search 
Real  Property SM by  name  for  a  complete  list  of  possible  properties.  A  list  of  states 
and counties for which AUTOTRACK XP SM has deed transfer records can be located 
by  choosing  the  Help  link  from  the  blue  AUTOTRACK  XP SM navigation  bar  at  the 
top  of  the  screen.  The  property  information  returned  from  this  database  may  differ 
from  the  information  found  in  Real  Property SM.  (See  the  above  note  on  Possible 
Property Ownership.) A list of states for which AUTOTRACK XP SM has vehicle reg-
istration  records  can  be  located  by  choosing  the  Help  link  from  the  blue 
AUTOTRACK  XP SM navigation  bar  at  the  top  of  the  screen.  Underlined  items  pro-
vide a link to record details. 

1999 DODGE GRAND CARAVAN SE 
DODGE GRAND CARAVAN SE—3.3L V6 SOHC FLEXFUE 
VIN: 2B5CD3595EK253648 
MINIVAN 
Plate: ID036H State: FL Date Registered: 04/28/1999 Expire Date: 10/30/2000 
Title: 77465960 Title Date: 09/29/1998 
OWNER: ZACHARY K THUL 
Color: RED 
1997 CHEVROLET S10 PICKUP 
CHEVROLET S10 PICKUP—2.2L L4 EFI OHV 8V 
VIN: 1GCCS144X8144822 
PICKUP 
Possible Watercraft 
Owner: THUL ZACHARY 
Address: 70 REARVIEW DR 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

87 

RIVERBEND, NY 11903 
Year: 1988 Length: 41.9′ MFG: 
Reg Number: K989495 State Registered: NY 
Hull Const.: FIBERGLASS 
Hull Number: 
Use: PLEASURE 
Propulsion: INBOARD 
Fuel: GASOLINE 
Possible FAA Aircraft Registrations 
Owner: THUL ZACHARY K 
Year: 1957 
Make: PIPER 
Model: PA–22 
N-Number: N0225J 
Aircraft: FIXED WING SINGLE ENGINE 
Address: 4833 STORM ST I33 
SPRINGFIELD, OH 34090 
Possible UCC Filings 
Original Date: 02/09/1988 
Action: INITIAL FILING Date: 1988 
File State: OHIO 
Debtor: ZACHARY THUL 
Address: 305 WAYBREEZE BLVD 
COLUMBUS OH 34209 
Secured Party: HOME SAVINGS & LOAN ASSOC 
AKRON OH 
Possible Bankruptcies, Liens and Judgments 
Court Location: EASTERN DISTRICT OF OHIO—FRANKLIN 
Filing Type: CHAPTER 7 DISCHARGE Filing Date: 08/14/1996 
Case Number: 98555555 Release Date:12/18/1996 
Creditor/Plaintiff: MARTIN T MARTINSON Amount: 
Debtor/Defender: THUYL ZACHARY K 
305 WAYBREEZE BLVD SSN: 960–45–XXXX 
A list of states for which AUTOTRACK XP SM has Uniform Commercial Code lien 
records can be located by choosing the Help link from the blue AUTOTRACK XP SM 
navigation bar at the top of the screen. 

COLUMBUS, OH 34209 
Attorney: MARTIN T MARTINSON 
Possible Professional Licenses 
Type: OHIO Professional License 
License Type: LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER 
Lic. Number: 42389 Status: ACTIVE 
Original Date: 01/10/1990 
SSN: DOB: 
Phone: 
Full Name: THUL, ZACHARY K 
Address: 4833 STORM ST I33 
SPRINGFIELD, OH 34090 
County: CLARK 
Possible FAA Pilot Licenses 
Pilot Name: THUL, ZACHARY K 
FAA Class: PRIVATE PILOT 
FAA Rating: SINGLE ENGINE LAND 
Medical Class: THIRD CLASS—VALID FOR 24 MONTHS 
Medical Date: 07/19/98 
FAA Region: NORTHWEST/MOUNTAIN—CO, ID, MT, OR, UT, WA, WY 
Address: 4833 STORM ST I33 
SPRINGFIELD, OH 34090 
Possible DEA Controlled Substance Licenses 
Business: PRACTITIONER 
Name: THUL, ZACHARY K MD Expires: 09/30/1999 
Address: 7891 W FLAGLER ST 
MIAMI OH 38972 
Authorized Drug Schedules: II, II, III, III, IV, V 
Possible Business Affiliations 
15 ROBY AVE HAMPTON BAYS, OH 11238 
STETSON HAULING, INC. OH 2543854 
CHAIRMAN ACTIVE 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

88 

Officer Name Match Only (NOT necessarily affiliated) 
Matching Name : THUL ZACHARY K 
OLSON FAMILY PROPERTIES & INVESTMENTS, INC. MA 789123 
REG AGENT ACTIVE 
TOO HOT TO HANDLE FL H76543 
SECRETARY INACTIVE 
Possible Relatives (* denotes match with one of subject’s addresses) 
(R–1) THUL CLAIRE DOB: DEC 1954 
SSN 999–15–XXXX issued in New York in 1973 
SEP 1994/JUL 1998—*305 WAYBREEZE BLVD 
COLUMBUS, OH 34209 
Certain  individuals  and  businesses  are  required  to  be  registered  under  the  Con-
trolled Substance Act. Physicians, dentists, and veterinarians are among this group. 
For  a  more  complete  explanation  and  definition  of  the  drug  schedules,  choose  the 
Help link from the blue AUTOTRACK XP SM navigation bar at the top of the screen. 
A list of states for which AUTOTRACK XP SM has corporation records can be located 
by  choosing  the  Help  link  from  the  blue  AUTOTRACK  XP SM navigation  bar  at  the 
top  of  the  screen.  A  person  will  qualify  as  a  possible  relative  in  the  National  Com-
prehensive  Report  Plus  Associates  SM  if  he  or  she  has  the  subject’s  last  name  and 
has been linked to one or more of the same addresses which appear under Possible 
Addresses Associated with Subject on page 1. 

The  asterisks  indicate  an  address  match  between  the  possible  relative  and  the 

subject of the report (see Possible Addresses Associated with Subject on page 1). 

JUL 1995/JUL 1995—*15 ROBY AVE (555) 123–4567 
HAMPTON BAYS, NY 11238 
OCT 1994/OCT 1996—355 LAVERNE AVE 
COLUMBUS, OH 34492 
DEC 1992/DEC 1996—*70 LAKEVIEW DR 
RIVERHEAD, NY 11901 
(R–2) THUL TOMMY DOB: 
DEC 1995/DEC 1996—599 MAIN ST 
RIVERBEND, NY 11093 
APR 1995/AUG 1995—355 LAVERNE AVE 
COLUMBUS, OH 34492 
Other People Who Have Used the Same Address of the Subject 
(* denotes match with one of subject’s addresses) 
15 ROBY AVE HAMPTON BAYS, NY 11238 
(O–1) GENNINE LOWELL 
SSN 972–45–XXXX issued in New York between 1966 and 1969 
SEP 1993/SEP 1994—5 NEWTON AVE 
HAMPTON BAYS, NY 12983 
12 M BAY ST 
HAMPTON BAYS, NY 13987 
*15 ROBY AVE 
HAMPTON BAYS, NY 11238 
305 WAYBREEZE BLVD COLUMBUS, OH 34209 
(O–2) MARIE G SMITH 
SSN 991–25–XXXX issued in New Jersey in 1962 
SEP 1993/SEP 1994—*305 WAYBREEZE BLVD 
COLUMBUS, OH 34209 
AUG 1995/AUG 1996—301 BAYSIDE TER 
CHARLOTTE, OH 34258 
SEP 1993/SEP 1994—*438 BULLSIDE TER W 
HACKENSACK, NJ 09348 
Possible Licensed Drivers at Subject’s Addresses 
7891 W FLAGLER ST MIAMI, OH 33144 
THUL, EDWARD H 
DL: T600465 issued in Ohio on 07/27/1994 expires 09/11/2000 
DOB: 04/19/1969 Height: 5′02″ 
1400 35TH ST K 4I SPRINGFIELD, FL 34090 
**No Drivers Found At This Address** 
4833 STORM ST I33 SPRINGFIELD, OH 34443 
**91 Drivers found at this address, only last name considered. ** 
**No Drivers Found At This Address** 
305 WAYBREEZE BLVD COLUMBUS, OH 34209 
THUL, STACEY B 
DL: T600788 issued in Ohio on 07/24/1994 expires 04/27/2001 
DOB: 05/26/1926 Height: 5′04″ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

89 

Driver  License  Information  is  unavailable  for  the  following  states:  NEW  YORK, 

NEW JERSEY 

The report will attempt to locate a brief list of addresses for the possible relative. 
To  possibly  locate  more  current  addresses  for  the  relative,  run  a  report  by  clicking 
on the underlined link. A person will qualify for this category in the National Com-
prehensive Report SM Plus Associates if he or she has a last name different from the 
report subject’s last name and has been linked to one or more of the same address-
es, which appear under Possible Addresses Associated with Subject on page 1. A per-
son  may  be  linked  to  one  of  the  same  addresses  as  the  subject,  even  though  he  or 
she  has  never  known  the  subject.  Two  people  might  be  linked  to  the  same  address 
but  at  different  time  periods.  For  example,  one  person  could  be  a  former  resident 
of  the  address  where  the  subject  now  resides.  Multiple  address  matches  with  the 
subject, denoted by multiple asterisks, will identify people who have a greater likeli-
hood of knowing the subject. 

This  message  probably  indicates  that  a  multi-unit  building  is  located  at  this  ad-

dress. 

Neighbor Phone Listings for Subject’s Addresses (only first six addresses included) 
7891 W FLAGLER ST MIAMI, OH 33144 
STATER OFFICE PRODUCTS 7895 W FLAGLER ST (555) 555–0482 
BIG ED’S MUFFLER SHOP 7897 W FLAGLER ST (555) 555–3358 
BUD’S USED CARS 7900 W FLAGLER ST (555) 555–8288 
15 ROBY AVE HAMPTON BAYS, NY 11238 
FELLINGHAM MIKE 4 ROBY AVE (555) 555–8697 
SCOTT GORDON G 6 ROBY AVE (555) 555–1297 
GHERSI JOHN 8 ROBY AVE (555) 555–6819 
ELIAS SIMON 9 ROBY AVE (555) 555–2659 
SCALCIONE STAN 10 ROBY AVE (555) 555–8425 
CANGIANO F P 12 ROBY AVE (555) 555–5217 
CORCORAN STEVE 26 ROBY AVE (555) 555–9917 
1400 35TH ST K SPRINGFIELD, OH 34443 
AHRENDT DAN 1400 35 ST K (555) 555–1664 
ALPIN JEFF 1400 35 ST K (555) 555–8117 
AMBROSE A 1400 35 ST K (555) 555–7553 
APURTON J 1400 35 ST K (555) 555–0735 
ARNOLD ROBY 1400 35 ST K (555) 555–4071 
BAKER C R 1400 35 ST K (555) 555–8490 
BALCHUNAS TERRY 1400 35 ST K (555) 555–5753 
BAMBERGER RICHARD 1400 35 ST K (555) 555–8203 
The following databases were searched but data for the subject was not found: 
ABI Business Directory, Active U.S. Military Personnel, Broward County Felonies/ 
Misdemeanors,  Broward  County  Traffic  Citations,  Federal  Firearms  and  Explosives 
License, Florida Accidents, Florida Banking and Finance Licenses, Florida Beverage 
License, Florida Boating Citations, Florida Concealed Weapon Permits, Florida Day 
Care  Licenses,  Florida  Department  of  Education,  Florida  Felony/Probation/Parole, 
Florida Fictitious Name, Florida Handicap Parking Permits, Florida Hotels and Res-
taurants,  Florida  Insurance  Agents,  Florida  Marriages,  Florida  Money  Transmitter 
Licenses,  Florida  Salt  Water  Product  Licenses,  Florida  Securities  Dealers,  Florida 
Sexual  Predator,  Florida  Tangible  Property,  Florida  Tobacco  License,  Florida  Un-
claimed  Property,  Florida  Worker’s  Compensation  Claims,  Marine  Radio  Licenses, 
Significant Shareholders, Trademarks/Service Marks, and state-specific databases. 

***End of Report SS—009/01*** 
Control Numbers: 5661614—5661620—1BF47FA5975FBA0 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

90 

EXHIBIT II—THE WALL STREET JOURNAL ONLINE, MAY 2, 2005 

In the last few months, several major companies reported that customer data, in-

cluding credit-card information, was compromised. The list includes: 

Date 

announced to 
general public 

Feb. 15 

Company 

ChoicePoint— 
compiler of con-
sumer data. 

Number of people 

affected 

About 145,000 
consumers had 
data in the sys-
tem. At least 750 
fraud cases are 
known. 

Feb. 25 

March 8 

March 9 

Bank of Amer-
ica—bank and 
credit-card com-
pany. 

DSW Shoe Ware-
house—shoestore 
chain, a unit of 
Retail Ventures 
Inc. 

LexisNexis— 
consolidator of 
legal and busi-
ness information, 
a division of 
Reed Elsevier 
PLC. 

Boston College*  March 17 

Polo Ralph 
Lauren—clothing 
retailer. 

April 14 

Ameritrade—on-
line discount 
stock broker. 

April 19 

Time Warner— 
media conglom-
erate. 

May 2 

Holders of as 
many as 1.2 mil-
lion Federal Gov-
ernment charge 
cards. 
Initially, the 
theft was said to 
be limited to 
about 100,000 
customers; a 
month later, it 
was raised to 1.4 
million. 
Initially, data for 
as many as 
32,000 con-
sumers was at 
risk. A month 
later, raised to 
about 310,000, 
though only 59 
incidents of ille-
gal action are 
known. 
Database in-
cluded records on 
120,000 alumni. 

As many as 
180,000 cus-
tomers who hold 
GM-branded 
MasterCards. 
About 200,000 
current and 
former customers 
from 2000 to 
2003. 
About 600,000 
current and 
former U.S. em-
ployees back to 
1986. 

Affected data 

Security breach 

Response 

Addresses, Social 
Security num-
bers and credit 
reports. 

Thieves posing 
as legitimate 
customers 
bought informa-
tion. 

Social Security 
numbers. 

Computer 
backup tapes 
were lost. 

Informed Federal 
authorities. Will 
no longer sell 
sensitive, per-
sonal data to cli-
ents other than 
governmental 
agencies, accred-
ited corporate 
customers or 
other businesses 
whose use is 
driven by a con-
sumer-initiated 
transaction. 
Contacted Fed-
eral authorities, 
then consumers. 

Credit- and 
debit-card, check-
ing account and 
driver’s license 
numbers, and 
personal-shop-
ping information. 

Hackers stole 
data from a data-
base for 108 of 
the chain’s 175 
stores. 

Reported to Fed-
eral authorities. 
Customers ad-
vised to check 
credit-card state-
ments. 

Social Security 
numbers and 
driver’s license 
numbers. 

Unauthorized 
use of customer 
logins and pass-
words. 

Addresses and 
Social Security 
numbers. 

Intruder hacked 
into a school 
computer oper-
ated by an out-
side fundraiser. 

Credit-card data.  n.a. 

Informed Federal 
authorities and 
consumers, im-
proved security, 
limited customer 
access to per-
sonal data. 

Notified affected 
alumni. 

Card issuer 
HSBC notified 
consumers. 

Varies by cus-
tomer. 

Backup computer 
tape was lost in 
shipping. 

Notified affected 
consumers. 

Social Security 
numbers and de-
tails on bene-
ficiaries and de-
pendents. 

Backup computer 
tape was lost in 
shipping by an 
outside data-stor-
age company. 

Notified those af-
fected. 

*Other  recent  university-level  security  breaches  occurred  at  California  State  University-Chico,  University  of 

California-Berkeley, Tufts University and Northwestern University. 

Sources: WSJ, Associated Press, the companies. 
Note:  Unless  where  noted,  these  are  cases  of  data  being  at  risk,  not  of  data  being  fraudulently  used.  In  all 

cases the stolen data included the names of the affiliated consumers. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you very much. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

91 

This  hearing  has  to  conclude  at  5  o’clock.  And  so,  with  that,  I’ll 

let Senator Nelson—I know he has a number of questions. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  OK.  And,  Mr.  Chairman,  what  I’ll  do  is 

submit most of them in writing for the record. 

But  let  me  just  go  through  a  couple  of  questions  each  for  each 

of the four of you. 

Ms.  Barrett,  there  was  a  report  that,  in  your  company,  you  had 
the  theft  of  information  through  a  person  gaining  illegal  access  to 
sensitive,  personal  information  of  20  million  people.  When  your 
company  was  alerted  about  this  breach,  Acxiom  allegedly  alerted 
its clients, but not the individual consumers that had been affected. 
Is it true—this report that’s in a book that we have read, entitled, 
‘‘No  Place  to  Hide’’—is  it  true  that  someone  gained  access  to  the 
sensitive records of 20 million people? 

Ms.  BARRETT.  No,  it’s  not,  Senator.  The  incident  occurred  in 
2003. It was a server that our clients use to transfer files to us for 
processing,  and  then  we  posted  the  results  of  that  processing  back 
on the file—on the server, to be transferred back to the client. 

The  theft  did  involve  many,  many  records.  And,  while  that  20 
million  number  may  be  ballpark  in  terms  of  how  many  records 
were  involved,  that  did  not  necessarily  represent  individuals.  And 
it certainly in no way represented sensitive information. 

The  standard  for  that  particular  server  was  that  information  of 
a  sensitive  nature—Social  Security  number  and  so  forth—be 
encrypted. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Did law enforcement later search the per-

petrator’s home and find a CD that contained the Acxiom data? 

Ms. BARRETT. Yes. There were actually two perpetrators involved 
in this. And in one incident the perpetrator had copied information 
onto  a  CD  and  had  it  in  his  possession  when  law  enforcement  ap-
prehended him. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  And  did  that  include  the  20  million 

records? 

Ms.  BARRETT.  I  don’t  know  exactly  how  many  records  were  on 
those  CDs.  We  worked  with  law  enforcement  to  identify  the  files 
that were involved. But it would have contained some of that infor-
mation. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Well,  if  it—I  mean,  that’s  what—the  pur-
pose of this hearing. We’re trying to point out what the problem is, 
and  if  there’s  a  CD  in  somebody’s  home  that  they  illegally  stole, 
and it’s got 20 million records, that’s 20 million potential thefts. 

Ms.  BARRETT.  It  did  not  have  20  million  records  containing  sen-

sitive information. 

Senator BILL NELSON. How many did it have? 
Ms. BARRETT. The CD? 
Senator BILL NELSON. Yes. 
Ms. BARRETT. I do not know. I can try to get an estimate of that 

information for you. 

Senator BILL NELSON. And when you say ‘‘not sensitive informa-

tion,’’ is a Social Security number sensitive information? 

Ms. BARRETT. Absolutely. 
Senator BILL NELSON. How about a driver’s license number? 
Ms. BARRETT. Absolutely. 
Senator BILL NELSON. So—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

92 

Ms.  BARRETT.  I  would  define  ‘‘sensitive  information’’  in  the  way 

that California has defined it in their notice-breach law. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  But  you  don’t  know  how  many  numbers 

were taken from the company. 

Ms. BARRETT. How many sensitive-information—— 
Senator BILL NELSON. That’s correct. 
Ms.  BARRETT.  We  do  not  know,  exactly.  Our  clients  sent  us  this 
information. In some cases, it’s encrypted, and—in many cases, the 
sensitive  information  is  encrypted;  in  some  cases,  nonsensitive  in-
formation is encrypted. When we send the files back to the clients, 
what happened after the breach was, we identified which files had 
been  accessed  inappropriately  and  illegally,  and  our  clients  went 
through  an  inventory  of  exactly  what  data  was  included  in  those 
files.  In  many  cases,  we  did  not  have  the  data  in  our  possession. 
Senator  BILL NELSON.  Mr.  Chairman,  the  point  that  I’m  merely 
making  here,  instead  of  quibbling  at  the  numbers,  is  that,  so 
often—obviously,  the  company  doesn’t  want  people  to  know  that 
somebody  has  gained  illegal  access  to  the  information.  And  the  in-
formation  is  often  described  in  a  certain  figure.  And  in  the  case  of 
both  ChoicePoint  and  LexisNexis,  the  first  figure  that  was  given 
out  publicly  was  much,  much  less  than  what  it  ultimately  was.  In 
the  case  of  LexisNexis—and  I’m  a  little  more  sensitive  to  this,  be-
cause  it  was  a  Florida  company  that  they  had  acquired—and  they 
first  said  it  was  30,000,  and  then  they  admitted  that  it  was 
300,000.  So,  we’ve  got—I  think  the  whole  point  here  is,  instead  of 
quibbling with you about 20 million or one million or whatnot, that 
we’ve got a problem. 

All right, let me ask you about—you had made some assertions— 
specifically,  an  e-mail,  Ms.  Barrett,  on  May  21,  2002,  to  John 
Poindexter. And in that e-mail, you allegedly stated—and tell us if 
this is true—quote, ‘‘The U.S. may need huge databases of commer-
cial transactions that cover the world,’’ and that Acxiom could build 
this  mega-scale  database.  Why  would  such  a—why  would  such  a 
database of commercial transactions be necessary? And what steps 
has Acxiom taken to create this database? 

Ms.  BARRETT.  Senator,  I’m  not  familiar,  specifically,  with  the  e- 

mail that you’re referring to. 

Senator BILL NELSON. Did you send—— 
Ms. BARRETT. Back in—— 
Senator BILL NELSON.—an e-mail to John—— 
Ms. BARRETT. I did not—— 
Senator BILL NELSON.—Poindexter? 
Ms. BARRETT.—personally send an e-mail to John Poindexter, no. 

I would—could check and see if someone from our company did. 

We worked with the Department of Defense and some of the staff 
on  John  Poindexter’s—in  John  Poindexter’s  organization  back  in 
2002,  in  an  advisory  capacity  talking  about  some  of  the  projects 
that  he  was  exploring.  And,  specifically,  we  advised  that  Depart-
ment  that  there  were  significant  privacy  concerns  that  needed  to 
be taken into account in the development of any kind of large-scale 
databases. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  That  information,  supposedly—and  we’ll 
check  it  out—was  obtained  under  the  Freedom  of  Information  Act 
by the Electronic Privacy Information Center. And that’s—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

93 

Ms. BARRETT. I’m—— 
Mr. ROTENBERG. Senator, the e-mail is on our website. 
Ms.  BARRETT.  The  e-mail  is  an  e-mail—if  it’s  the  specific  situa-
tion  we’re  talking  about  with  EPIC,  the  e-mail  is  not  from  me;  it 
is from a member of John Poindexter’s staff. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  OK,  thank  you  for  clarifying  that.  Rather 
chilling.  ‘‘The  U.S.  may  need  huge  databases  of  commercial  trans-
actions to cover the world.’’ 

Let me ask you, Mr. Rotenberg, the Privacy Act of 1974, in part, 
prevented the Federal Government from creating central databases 
where  all  personal  information  could  be  stored  for  government  ac-
cess.  It  now  appears  at  least  some  levels  of  government  are  out- 
sourcing this task to information brokers, witness my further—ear-
lier  questioning  about  Seisint  and  the  database  called  Matrix.  In 
your opinion, is the Federal Government complying with the letter 
and the spirit of the law of the Privacy Act of 1974? 

Mr.  ROTENBERG.  No,  it’s  not,  Senator.  In  fact,  one  of  the  things 
that  we  realized  as  we  pursued  a  Freedom  of  Information  Act  re-
quest  involving  ChoicePoint  was  the  extraordinary  amount  of  per-
sonal  information  that  was  being  obtained  by  Federal  agencies  for 
law enforcement purposes. 

Now,  we  don’t  dispute  that  the  information  may  have  value  for 
investigations.  We  understand  that.  The  question  is  whether  there 
is any legal safeguard in place to ensure that the Privacy Act prin-
ciples,  such  as  due  process  and  oversight  and  protection  of  First 
Amendment freedoms, are being respected. 

And our view is that, in the absence of explicit application of the 
Privacy Act to the information brokers, the answer is that there is 
not the protection of the 1974 Act, as there should be. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Just  quick  questions  here,  because  the 
Chairman  needs  to  get  out  of  here.  Do  you  think  the  legislation 
that  Senator  Schumer  and  I  have  filed  would  help  restore  greater 
consumer privacy and reduce identity theft? 

Mr.  ROTENBERG.  Yes,  I  do,  Senator.  And  I  think  it  is  absolutely 
urgent  for  the  Committee  to  act  on  it.  One  of  the  points  that  I 
make in my written statement is that the problem of identity theft 
is rapidly escalating in this country. In fact, today the Senate may 
take up the Real ID Act, a dramatic expansion of identification cre-
dentials in this country, without even any debate. And you may be 
interested  to  know  that  state  DMVs  have  become  the  targets  of 
identity thieves. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Mr.  Kurtz,  what  do  you  think  about  the 

legislation that we filed? 

Mr.  KURTZ.  Well,  first  of  all,  I  want  to  commend  you  and  Sen-
ator—Senator  Nelson  and  Senator  Schumer  for  taking  the  lead  on 
pulling  together  legislation  in  this  space.  I  think  there  are  several 
good points with regard to the legislation. First, notice, mandatory 
notice,  and  the  scope  which  you’ve  applied  with  regard  to  the  no-
tice.  You’ve  noted  that  it’s  broader  than  just  the  data  brokers  that 
we  need  to  think  about.  Two,  you’ve  talked  about  reasonable  secu-
rity  measures  and  the  importance  of  that.  And  I  would  note,  in 
that  space,  under  the  Privacy  Act,  there  are  reasonable  measures 
that  need  to  be  taken  by  the  Federal  Government  in  order  to  se-
cure  Social  Security  numbers  and  dates  of  birth  and  the  like. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

94 

Three, you’ve given victims a place to go. We, at the Cyber Security 
Alliance, get a lot of calls, ‘‘Where do we go? Who are we supposed 
to talk to?’’ You can report it in to the FTC, as it is right now, but, 
frankly, they have limited means in order to deal with it. They can 
keep  it  in  the  Sentinel  database  and  track  things,  but  they  don’t 
actually have an apparatus where you can go to actually do follow- 
up. 

And,  the  final  point  that  I  would  make—and  I’m  probably  leav-
ing  something  out—is  the  importance  of  leadership.  You’ve  identi-
fied  the  need  to  have  the  executive  branch  take  a  greater  leader-
ship  role  in  cybersecurity  overall,  understanding  that  this  is  just 
not one single slice of an issue. All these issues that we’ve dealing 
with—phishing,  spyware,  data-warehouse  security—they’re  all 
interconnected.  Having  an  Assistant  Secretary  at  DHS  to  be  that 
strategic leader would be incredibly helpful. 

Senator  BILL NELSON.  Thank  you  for  that.  I  mean,  and  that  un-
derscores the next part of this legislation, which is protection of the 
homeland, as well as protection of our individuals. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Nelson. 
Senator Pryor, do you have a question? 
Senator PRYOR. Mr. Chairman, if you need to head out, I can—— 
Senator SMITH. Go ahead. 
Senator PRYOR. OK. Because I don’t mind taking over the leader-
ship of this Committee. I don’t think I can do a whole lot of damage 
from here. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator PRYOR. As much as I’d like to. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  PRYOR.  But  I  can—I’ll  be  glad  to.  If  you  need  to  run, 

please just—I’ll try to make my questions brief. 

Mr. ROTENBERG—— 
Senator Bill Nelson. We can do a mark-up if he leaves. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator PRYOR. That’s right. If you’d just leave—— 
[Laughter.] 
Senator PRYOR.—and allow us a little time here by ourselves, we 

would appreciate it. Do you mind? 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  SMITH.  I  trust  you  guys  implicitly,  but  I  think  my  col-

leagues might question my wisdom, I’m sure. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Rotenberg,  let  me  start  with  you,  if  I  may. 
I  want  to  know  what  your  experience  has  been  with  credit-freeze 
laws  in  the  states.  And  I’m  seeing  a  story  here—I  believe  it  comes 
out  of  Texas,  or  maybe  Vermont,  I’m  not  quite  sure—but  can  you 
tell us, first, what credit freeze is, and how it’s worked, if you think 
it’s a good idea? 

Mr. ROTENBERG. Sure. Senator, I think it’s a very good idea. Sim-
ply  stated,  what  a  credit  freeze  does  is  puts  your  credit  report  in 
the  off-setting.  In  other  words,  it  isn’t  disclosed  to  others  unless 
you decide that you want to make your credit report available. Cur-
rently,  credit  reports  are  widely  available.  They’re  used  for  very 
many purposes that most consumers aren’t aware of. And what the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

95 

four states have done that have passed credit-freeze legislation, has 
been  to  basically  say  to  consumers,  ‘‘If  you  need  to  get  a  home 
mortgage, if you need a loan for the car, sure, you’re going to want 
to  make  your  credit  report  available.  But,  otherwise,  that  report 
will  stay  in  the  off-setting,  and  others  won’t  get  access  to  it.’’  And 
we  think  it’s  a  very  sensible  way  to  reduce  the  risk  of  identity 
theft. 

Ms. FRANK. May I add something? 
Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Ms.  FRANK.  Our  State  was  the  first  State  to  ask  for  it,  and  I 
helped  with  that  legislation.  The  reason  we  had  a  need  for  a  secu-
rity  freeze  is  because  the  fraud  alerts  weren’t  working.  In  other 
words,  when  you  became  a  victim  of  identity  theft,  you  could  call 
the  credit-reporting  agencies  and  put  a  fraud  alert  on  your  credit 
profile,  and  it  says,  ‘‘Don’t  issue  credit  without  calling  me  first.’’ 
What we were finding is that myriad victims would have that fraud 
alert  on  their  credit  profile,  yet  there  were  creditors  that  still 
issued  credit.  So,  we  went  to  the  legislature  and  said,  ‘‘We  need 
something  that  is  going  to  be  a  real  key  to  lock  the  door.’’  And  so, 
the credit freeze is such that a victim, or even, in our State, a con-
sumer,  can  write  to  the  credit-reporting  agencies—and  if  you’re  a 
victim,  for  free—you  can  put  this  credit  freeze  on,  which  gives  you 
a password. So, let’s say I have a credit freeze on my credit report 
and I want to go out and buy a car. I can unfreeze, or ‘‘thaw,’’ with 
my password for a specific industry, like all the car dealerships, or 
I  can  do  it  for  everyone.  And  then  I  refreeze  it.  Now,  if  you’re  a 
non-victim, you pay $10 to freeze it or non-freeze it. 

If fraud alerts worked, which now you know, it’s written into the 
FACTA,  which  is  the  Fair  and  Accurate  Credit  Transactions  Act— 
if  they  really  worked  100  percent,  and  people  called  you,  that 
would  be  one  thing.  But  under  FACTA,  if  a  creditor  issues  credit 
when  there’s  a  fraud  alert  on  your  credit  report,  you  have  no  pri-
vate  right-of-action.  You  have  no  recourse.  And  so,  I’m  telling  all 
California  citizens,  and  those  who  are  in  the  states  that  have  this 
freeze,  the  only  way  you  can  guarantee  that  you  can  protect  your-
self  from  financial  identity  theft  is  to  use  the  freeze.  It  won’t  help 
you for criminal identity theft, but it will help you for financial. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Well,  I—thank  you  for  that.  Ms.  Frank,  let 
me ask you, while we’re talking about this—changing gears a little 
bit—but  we  know  that  data  brokers  have  information  like  Social 
Security  numbers,  dates  of  birth,  you  know,  street  addresses, 
records  of  what  we  purchase,  you  know,  things  like  that,  but  can 
you  give  me  some  examples  of  information—if  you  know  any—ex-
amples  of  information  that  are  so  intensely  private  that  the  data 
should never be allowed to be shared? 

Ms.  FRANK.  Well,  if  you  look  at  my  written  testimony,  on  page 

17—— 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Ms.  FRANK.—you  will  find  an  exhibit  of  an  actual  sample  of 
AutoTrack,  which  is  from  ChoicePoint.  It  has  not  only  the  Social 
Security  number,  date  of  birth,  aka’s,  and  then  it  says  ‘‘other  pos-
sible Social Security numbers.’’ 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

96 

Ms.  FRANK.  It  also  has,  if  you  look  down  here,  driver’s  licenses, 
height,  weight—let’s  see—past  addresses.  You  go  down  here,  and 
it  has  other  things,  like,  hmm,  you  name  it,  it’s  in  here,  places 
you’ve lived, cars you’ve bought, boats or anything like that, if you 
have a pilot’s—any kind of license you ever had, any problem with 
the  license,  if  you  were  ever  suspended  for  something,  deeds,  all 
the  deeds  that  you’ve  ever  owned.  Now,  some  of  these  are  public 
records. 

Now, I want to say one thing about public records. Death certifi-
cates, birth certificates, marriage certificates, they have your Social 
Security  number.  In  the  State  of  California,  we  have  passed  laws 
to  redact  those  numbers,  because  your  mother’s  maiden  name,  for 
example, is on your birth certificate, and your parents’ Social Secu-
rity number is on your birth certificate. 

OK. So, if you look at this—I don’t want to take—I’m seeing the 
red  light  coming  on—you  can  look,  yourself,  for—this  thing  goes 
from page 17 all the way to page 23 of all the things—24. 

Senator  PRYOR.  But  are  you  saying  that  some  of  that  is  so  in-

tensely private that it should not be shared? 

Ms. FRANK. Well, if you got this, which I have seen on other peo-
ple—if  you  got  this,  you  would  have  an  entire  package  to  take 
someones  identity—it  even  says  your  family  and  your  neighbors 
and  your  family’s  name—the  members  of  your  family,  who  lives 
there, what licenses they have. And it even gives neighbors around 
the  block.  So,  basically,  if  somebody  wanted  to  steal  your  identity, 
Senator,  they’d  have  everything  that  they  need  to  talk  about  who 
you are, what properties you’ve owned, where you’ve lived. 

So,  what  I’m  saying,  it’s  the  entire  profile  that  is  so  terribly 
frightening,  and  the  Social  Security  number,  at  this  point,  is  the 
key to the kingdom of identity theft. And it’s all in here. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  One  last  question,  if  I  may,  Mr.  Chairman, 
and  this  is  for  Ms.  Barrett,  and  that  is—you  mentioned,  during 
your  testimony  a  few  moments  ago,  that  your  company  encrypts 
data.  If  we  required  all  companies  that  handle,  you  know,  person-
ally identifiable data—if we required them to encrypt it, would that 
help solve this problem? 

Ms.  BARRETT.  Yes,  I  think  it  would.  Encryption  is  a  wonderful 
tool for protecting data, both in the static state, as well as in tran-
sit.  And  as  one  of  the—it  was  mentioned  earlier,  information  in 
transit  is  one  of  the  riskier  areas  where  identity  thieves  have  an 
opportunity to take hold of data. 

Encryption  is  not  as  easy  as  we  would  like  for  it—to  think  it  is. 
It’s  not  a  plug-and-play  kind  of  thing  for  companies  to  do.  But  we 
need all the incentives we can to make it much more of a universal 
standard. 

Ms.  FRANK.  Senator,  one  thing.  If  we  had  encryption,  it  would 
not  have  helped  in  the  ChoicePoint,  when  it’s  a  dirty  insider.  So— 
and, also, if you have somebody in the IT department who can un- 
encrypt—so,  if  you  had  encryption,  that’s  great,  but  you  have  to 
have an exception for security notice if it is a dirty insider. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Chairman,  I’m  sorry,  I  think  Mr.  Kurtz  had 

Mr.  KURTZ.  Yes.  Senator,  Pryor,  I  just  wanted  to  add—I  think 
what California 1386 did, which I thought was rather elegant, was, 

a—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

97 

they  didn’t  mandate  that  encryption  be  used.  They  said  that,  for 
any unencrypted breach of information, that the owner of the infor-
mation needed to be notified. I think the point that I guess I’m try-
ing  to  make  here  is,  we  need  to  think  more  broader—broadly,  and 
not just a technology mandate of one type of technology—or, excuse 
me,  no  mandates  of  specific  type  of  technologies;  let’s  look  at  the 
whole set of tools that are available which are, in fact, technologies, 
policies,  and  expertise  that  need  to  be  brought  together.  And  I’ve 
outlined that in my written testimony for you folks to review. 

Senator SMITH. So, it left it up to the companies and technologies 

Mr. KURTZ. Yes, in fact—— 
Senator  SMITH.—to  meet  the  standard,  rather  than  to  prescribe 

to—— 

a standard. 

for that. 

Mr. KURTZ. Yes. And, in fact, we haven’t talked about standards 
today,  but  there  are  standards  out  there  that  people  can  look  and 
turn  to  in  order  to  get  some  guidance  as  to  what  they  might  need 
to do in order to secure their systems. There are—you know, there 
are  international  standards,  there  are  American  standards  that 
people  could  look  at  that  could  really  be  used  for  folks  to  turn  to. 
Now, sometimes they’re criticized for being too broad, or to general, 
but there are some, you know, if you will, key guideposts there that 
companies  can  look  at,  or  you  could  ask  companies  to  look  at,  in 
order to ensure they’re doing the right thing. 

Senator SMITH. And their motivation is, they’ve got legal liability 

Mr. KURTZ. That’s an issue that the Congress might consider in-
vestigating.  What  type  of  incentives  might  you  build  into  this  in 
order to get folks to go down that road? 

Senator SMITH. Well, what did California do? What was their ele-

gant solution? What was it? 

Mr.  KURTZ.  Their  elegant  solution  was,  they  didn’t  require 

encryption. 

Senator  SMITH.  So,  if  they  didn’t  require  it,  did  they  just  give 

them the assignment and left open the liability? 

Mr. KURTZ. Excuse me. I don’t have the language in front of me, 
but  it  basically  said  for  any  unencrypted  breach  of  information, 
there’s  a  requirement  to  notify.  So,  if  you  unpack  that,  it  means 
that if you encrypt, there is not an obligation to notify. 

Ms. FRANK. And we’re thinking of amending that for—you know, 
we  like  the  idea  of  encryption,  but  we’re  thinking  of  amending  it 
for those who know that there was access without encryption. 

Senator  SMITH.  What’s  the  penalty  if  they  don’t  do  all  of  that? 
Ms. FRANK. Well, they can be sued. 
Senator SMITH. OK. That’s what I’m getting at. 
Mr. KURTZ. Oh. 
Senator  SMITH.  And  do  they  specifically  address  that,  or  do  they 

leave it open, do you recall? 

Ms.  FRANK.  Well,  I’m  trying  to  think  exactly  what  the  language 

says, since—— 

Senator SMITH. That’s OK. 
Ms. FRANK. I can send it to you. I’ll give it you. 
Senator SMITH. Senator, did you have any more questions? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

98 

Senator  PRYOR.  All  I  was  going  to  say  is  really  just  a  comment. 
I  notice  in  this  month’s  Fortune  magazine,  there’s  a  article  called 
‘‘The Great Data Heist,’’ and, in there, they talk about how security 
information  typically  walks  out  the  door  in  one  of  three  ways— 
hackers  grab  it,  employees  steal  it,  or  companies  lose  it.  And  I 
think that’s probably right. I assume you all would agree with that. 
And  so,  what  you’re  saying  is  right.  Encryption,  I  think,  is  an  im-
portant  piece  of  this,  but  it  doesn’t  solve  all  the  problems.  It 
doesn’t—it’s not a cure-all. 

Mr. KURTZ. It’s not a panacea. 
Senator PRYOR. Yes. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Senator Pryor. 
And,  ladies  and  gentlemen,  thank  you  each  for  the  contribution 
you’ve  made  to  this  first  very  important  hearing  on  a  very  vital 
topic to the American people. We will, no doubt, be pursuing legis-
lative proposals. The Chairman, Senator Stevens, has so indicated. 
But I think you have laid a good foundation in this hearing today, 
and we thank you very much for your time and contribution. 

We’re adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 5:15 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GAIL HILLEBRAND, SENIOR ATTORNEY, CONSUMERS UNION 

IDENTITY FOR SALE? PROTECTING CONSUMERS FROM IDENTITY THEFT 

Summary 

Consumers  Union, 1 the  non-profit,  independent  publisher  of  Consumer  Reports, 
believes that the recent announcements by ChoicePoint, Lexis-Nexis, and many oth-
ers about the lack of security of our most personal information underscores the need 
for Congress and the States to act to protect consumers from identity theft. 

Identity  theft  is  a  serious  crime  that  has  become  more  common  in  recent  years 
as  we  have  delved  further  into  the  ‘‘information  age.’’  According  to  the  Federal 
Trade commission, 27.3 million Americans have been victims of identity theft in the 
past  five  years,  costing  businesses  and  financial  institutions  $48  billion  and  con-
sumers  $5  billion.  Victims  pay  an  average  of  $1,400  (not  including  attorney  fees) 
and  spend  an  average  of  600  hours  to  clear  their  credit  reports.  The  personal  costs 
can  also  be  devastating;  identity  theft  can  create  unimaginable  family  stress  when 
victims are turned down for mortgages, student loans, and even jobs. 

And  as  ongoing  scandals  involving  ChoicePoint,  Lexis-Nexis,  and  others  point  to, 
American  consumers  cannot  fully  protect  themselves  against  identity  theft  on  their 
own.  Even  consumers  who  do  ‘‘everything  right,’’  such  as  paying  their  bills  on  time 
and  holding  tight  to  personal  information  such  as  Social  Security  numbers  and 
dates of birth, can become victim through no fault of their own because the compa-
nies who profit from this information have lax security standards. 

Therefore,  Congress  and  the  States  must  enact  new  obligations  grounded  in  Fair 
Information  Practices 2 on  those  who  hold,  use,  sell,  or  profit  from  private  informa-
tion  about  consumers.  In  this  context,  Fair  Information  Practices  would  reduce  the 
collection of unnecessary information, restrict the use of information to the purpose 
for which it was initially provided, require that information be kept secure, require 
rigorous screening of the purposes asserted by persons attempting to gain access to 
that  information,  and  provide  for  full  access  to  and  correction  of  information  held. 
Consumers Union Recommends That Lawmakers Do the Following 

• Require notice of all security breaches: Impose requirements on businesses, non-
profits, and government entities to notify consumers when an unauthorized per-
son  has  gained  access  to  sensitive  information  pertaining  to  them.  Consumers 
Union supports S. 751, by Senator Dianne Feinstein, which would put these re-

1 Consumers Union is a non-profit membership organization chartered in 1936 under the laws 
of  the  State  of  New  York  to  provide  consumers  with  information,  education  and  counsel  about 
goods,  services,  health  and  personal  finance,  and  to  initiate  and  cooperate  with  individual  and 
group efforts to maintain and enhance the quality of life for consumers. Consumers Union’s in-
come  is  solely  derived  from  the  sale  of  Consumer  Reports,  its  other  publications  and  from  non-
commercial  contributions,  grants  and  fees.  In  addition  to  reports  on  Consumers  Union’s  own 
product  testing,  Consumer  Reports  with  more  than  four  million  paid  circulation,  regularly,  car-
ries articles on health, product safety, marketplace economics and legislative, judicial and regu-
latory  actions  which  affect  consumer  welfare.  Consumers  Union’s  publications  carry  no  adver-
tising and receive no commercial support. 

2 The Code of Fair Information Practices was developed by the Health, Education, and Welfare 
Advisory  Committee  on  Automated  Data  Systems,  in  a  report  released  two  decades  ago.  The 
Electronic Privacy Information Center has described the Code as based on these five principles: 
(1)  There  must  be  no  personal  data  recordkeeping  systems  whose  very  existence  is  secret.  (2) 
There must be a way for a person to find out what information about the person is in a record 
and how it is used. (3) There must be a way for a person to prevent information about the per-
son  that  was  obtained  for  one  purpose  from  being  used  or  made  available  for  other  purposes 
without the person’s consent. (4) There must be a way for a person to correct or amend a record 
of  identifiable  information  about  the  person.  (5)  Any  organization  creating,  maintaining,  using, 
or disseminating records of identifiable personal data must assure the reliability of the data for 
their intended use and must take precautions to prevent misuses of the data. Electronic Privacy 
Information Center, http://www.epic.org/privacy/consumer/codelfairlinfo.html. 

(99) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

100 

quirements in place. We also believe that S. 768, introduced by Senator Charles 
Schumer  and  Senator  Bill  Nelson,  will  make  an  excellent  notice  of  breach  law. 
• Require  and  monitor  security:  Impose  strong  requirements  on  information  bro-
kers to protect the information they hold and to screen and monitor the persons 
to  whom  they  make  that  information  available.  S.  768,  as  well  as  S.  500  and 
H.R.  1080,  introduced  by  Senator  Bill  Nelson  and  Representative  Ed  Markey, 
respectively, would direct the Federal Trade Commission to develop such stand-
ards and oversee compliance with them. 

• Give  consumers  access  to  and  a  right  to  correct  information:  Give  individuals 
rights to see, dispute, and correct information held by information brokers. This 
is also addressed in the Schumer/Nelson and Nelson/Markey bills. 

• Protect  SSNs:  Restrict  the  sale,  collection,  use,  sharing,  posting,  display,  and 

secondary use of Social Security numbers. 

• Require  more  care  from  creditors:  Require  creditors  to  take  additional  steps  to 
verify  the  identity  of  an  applicant  when  there  is  an  indicator  of  possible  ID 
theft. 

• Grant  individuals  control  over  their  sensitive  information:  Give  individuals 
rights to control who collects—and who sees—sensitive information about them. 
• Restrict secondary use of sensitive information: Restrict the use of sensitive, per-
sonal  information  for  purposes  other  than  the  purposes  for  which  it  was  col-
lected or other uses to which the consumer affirmatively consents. 

• Fix  FACTA:  A  consumer  should  be  able  to  access  more  of  his  or  her  Fair  and 
Accurate  Credit  Transactions  Act  (FACTA)  rights,  such  as  the  extended  fraud 
alert, before becoming an ID theft victim. Further, one of the key FACTA rights 
is  tied  to  a  police  report,  which  victims  still  report  difficulty  in  getting  and 
using. 

• Create  strong  and  broadly-based  enforcement:  Authorize  Federal,  State,  local, 

and private enforcement of all of these obligations. 

• Recognize  the  role  of  states:  States  have  pioneered  responses  to  new  forms  of 
identity crime and risks to personal privacy. Congress should not inhibit states 
from putting in place additional identity theft and privacy safeguards. 

• Provide  resources  and  tools  for  law  enforcement:  Provide  funding  for  law  en-
forcement  to  pursue  multi-jurisdictional  crimes  promptly  and  effectively.  Law 
enforcement  also  may  need  new  tools  to  promote  prompt  cooperation  from  the 
Social Security Administration and private creditors in connection with identity 
theft investigations. 

After a very brief discussion of the problem of identity theft, each recommendation 

is discussed. 
The Problem of Identity Theft Is Large and Growing 

Current law simply has not protected consumers from identity theft. The numbers 

tell part of the story: 

• According  to  the  Federal  Trade  Commission,  27.3  million  Americans  have  been 
victims  of  identity  theft  in  the  last  five  years,  costing  businesses  and  financial 
institutions $48 billion, plus another $5 billion in costs to consumers. 

• Commentator Bob Sullivan has estimated that information concerning two mil-
lion consumers is involved in the security breaches announced over just the six 
weeks  ending  April  6,  2005.  Is  Your  Personal  Data  Next?:  Rash  of  Data  Heists 
Points to Fundamental ID Theft Problem, http://msnbc.msn.com/id/7358558 

• Based  on  a  report  to  the  FTC  in  2003,  which  concluded  that  there  were  nearly 
10  million  identity  theft  victims  each  year,  Consumers  Union  estimates  that 
every minute 19 more Americans become victims of ID theft. 

These numbers can’t begin to describe the stress, financial uncertainty, lost work- 
time productivity and lost family-time identity theft victims experience. Even finan-
cially  responsible  people  who  routinely  pay  their  bills  on  time  can  find  themselves 
in  a  land  of  debt  collector  calls,  ruined  credit  and  lost  opportunities  for  jobs,  apart-
ments, and prime credit. With more and more scandals coming out every week, the 
time  has  come  for  Congress  to  act  to  protect  the  security  of  our  personal  informa-
tion. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Recommendations 
Notification 

101 

Notice of security breaches of information, whether held in computerized or paper 
form, are the beginning, not the end, of a series of steps needed to begin to resolve 
the fundamental conundrum of the U.S. information U.S. society: collecting informa-
tion generates revenues or efficiencies for the holder of the information but can pose 
a  risk  of  harm  to  the  persons  whose  economic  and  personal  lives  are  described  by 
that information. 

The  first  principle  of  Fair  Information  Practices  is  that  there  be  no  collection  of 
data  about  individuals  whose  very  existence  is  a  secret  from  those  individuals.  A 
corollary  of  this  must  be  that  when  the  security  of  a  collection  of  data  containing 
sensitive  information  about  an  individual  is  breached,  that  breach  cannot  be  kept 
secret from the individual. Recognizing the breadth of the information that business, 
government, and others hold about individuals, Consumers Union recommends a no-
tice  of  breach  requirement  that  is  strong  yet  covers  only  ‘‘sensitive’’  personal  infor-
mation, including account numbers, numbers commonly used as identifiers for credit 
and similar purposes, biometric information, and similar information. This sensitive 
information  could  open  the  door  to  future  identity  theft,  so  it  is  vital  that  people 
know when this information has been breached. 

Consumers Union supports a notice-of-breach law which does the following: 
• Covers paper and computerized data. 
• Covers government and privately-held information. 
• Does not except encrypted data. 
• Does not except regulated entities. 
• Has no loopholes, sometimes called ‘‘safe harbors.’’ 
• Is triggered by the acquisition of information by an unauthorized person. 
• Requires that any law enforcement waiting period must be requested in writing 
• Gives  consumers  who  receive  a  notice  of  breach  access  to  the  Federal  right  to 

and be based on a serious impediment to the investigation. 

place an extended fraud alert. 

Consumers Union supports S. 751, which contains these elements. S. 768 contains 
most, but not all, of these elements and in certain other respects provides additional 
protections. 

Three  of  these  elements  are  of  special  importance:  covering  all  breaches  without 
exceptions or special weaker rules for particular industries, covering data contained 
on  paper  as  well  as  on  computer,  and  covering  data  whether  or  not  it  is  encrypted. 
First, a ‘‘one rule for all breaches’’ is the only way to ensure that the notice is suffi-
ciently  timely  to  be  useful  by  the  consumer  for  prevention  of  harm.  ‘‘One  rule  for 
all’’ is also the only rule that can avoid a factual morass which could make it impos-
sible  to  determine  if  a  breach  notice  should  have  been  given.  By  contrast,  a  weak 
notice  recommendation  such  as  the  one  contained  in  the  guidance  issued  by  the 
bank  regulatory  agencies 3 cannot  create  a  strong  marketplace  incentive  to  invest 
the  time,  money,  and  top-level  executive  attention  to  reduce  or  eliminate,  future 
breaches. 

Second, unauthorized access to paper records, such as hospital charts or employee 
personnel  files,  are  just  as  likely  to  expose  an  individual  to  a  risk  of  identity  theft 
as theft of computer files. Third, encryption doesn’t protect information from insider 
theft,  and  the  forms  of  encryption  vary  widely  in  their  effectiveness.  Further,  even 
the most effective form of encryption can quickly become worthless if it is not adapt-
ed  to  keep  up  with  changes  in  technology  and  with  new  tools  developed  by  crimi-
nals. 

A requirement to give notice of a security breach elevates the issue of information 
security  inside  a  company.  A  requirement  for  swift,  no-exemption  notice  of  security 

3 That  weak  recommendation  allows  a  financial  institution  to  decide  whether  or  not  its  cus-
tomers need to know about a breach, and the explanatory material even states that it can reach 
a  conclusion  that  notice  is  unnecessary  without  making  a  full  investigation.  Interagency  Guid-
ance on Response Programs for Unauthorized Access to Customer Information and Customer No-
tice, 12 CFR Part 30, 12 CFR Parts 208 and 225, 12 CFR Part 364, 12 CFR Parts 568 and 570. 
Other  reasons  why  those  guidelines  are  insufficient  to  substitute  for  a  statutory  requirement 
to give notice include that they do not apply to non-customers about whom the financial institu-
tion  has  sensitive  data,  that  there  is  no  direct  or  express  penalty  for  violation  of  the  guideline, 
and  that  their  case-by-case  approach  will  make  it  extremely  hard  to  determine  in  which  cir-
cumstances  the  guidance  actually  recommends  notice  to  consumers,  complicating  the  process  of 
showing that an obligation was unmet. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

102 

breaches should create reputational and other marketplace incentives for those who 
hold sensitive consumer information to improve their internal security practices. For 
example,  California’s  security  breach  law  has  led  to  improved  data  security  in  at 
least  two  cases.  According  to  news  reports,  after  giving  its  third  notice  of  security 
breach  in  fifteen  months,  Wells  Fargo  Bank  ordered  a  comprehensive  review  of  all 
its  information  handling  practices.  The  column  quoted  a  memo  from  Wells  Fargo’s 
CEO  stating  in  part:  ‘‘The  results  have  been  enlightening  and  demonstrate  a  need 
for  additional  study,  remediation  and  oversight.  . . .  Approximately  70  percent  of 
our  remote  data  has  some  measure  of  security  exposure  as  stored  and  managed 
today.’’ 4 

In  another  example,  UC  Berkeley  Chancellor  Robert  Bigeneau  announced  plans 
to hire an outside auditor to examine data gathering, retention, and security, telling 
employees:  ‘‘I  insist  that  we  safeguard  the  personal  information  we  are  given  as  if 
it were our own.’’ 5 This announcement followed the second announced breach of the 
security  of  data  held  by  the  University  in  six  months,  this  one  involving  100,000 
people.6 

In the Sarbanes-Oxley Act, Congress recognized the importance of the ‘‘tone at the 
top,’’ and for that reason took steps to require the corporate boards and CEOs work 
to improve the quality and accuracy of audited financial statements. A strong, clear 
notice of security breach law, without exceptions, could similarly focus the attention 
of top management on information security—creating an incentive for a ‘‘tone at the 
top’’ to take steps to minimize or eliminate security breaches. 
Security 

Consumers Union supports S. 500 and H.R. 1080, introduced by Senator Bill Nel-
son  and  Representative  Ed  Markey,  respectively.  These  measures  would  direct  the 
Federal  Trade  Commission  (FTC)  to  promulgate  strong  standards  for  information 
security and a strong obligation to screen customers, both initially and with respect 
to how those customers further protect the information from unauthorized use. They 
also  provide  for  ongoing  compliance  monitoring  by  the  FTC.  S.  768,  the  Schumer- 
Nelson bill, contains similar provisions. 

If  Congress  wanted  to  take  even  stronger  steps  with  respect  to  information  bro-
kers, it could require information brokers to undergo annual audits, paid for by the 
broker and performed by an independent auditor retained by the FTC, with specific 
authority  in  the  FTC  to  require  corrective  action  for  security  and  customer  screen-
ing  weaknesses  identified  in  the  audit,  as  well  as  allowing  the  FTC  to  specify  par-
ticular  aspects  of  information  security  that  should  be  included  in  each  such  audit. 
Any Federal information broker law must require strong protections in specific as-
pects of information security, as well as imposing a broad requirement that security 
in fact be effective and be monitored for ongoing effectiveness. Congress must deter-
mine the balance between the public interest in the protection of data and the busi-
ness  interest  in  the  business  of  information  brokering.  Security  breaches  and  the 
effects  on  consumers  of  the  ongoing  maintenance  of  files  on  most  Americans  by  in-
formation brokers are issues too important to be delegated in full to any regulatory 
agency. 
Access and Correction 

Two  of  the  basic  Fair  Information  Practices  are  the  right  to  see  and  the  right  to 
correct  information  held  about  the  consumer.  S.  768,  S.  500,  and  H.R.  1080  all  ad-
dress  these  issues.  While  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  (FCRA)  allows  consumers 
to  see  and  correct  their  credit  reports,  as  defined  by  FCRA,  consumers  currently 
have no legal right to see the whole file held on them by an information broker such 
as  ChoicePoint  and  Lexis-Nexis,  even  though  the  information  in  that  file  may  have 
a  profound  effect  on  the  consumer.  There  is  also  lack  of  clarity  about  what  a  con-
sumer  will  be  able  to  see  even  under  the  FCRA  if  the  information  broker  has  not 
yet made a report to a potential employer or landlord about that consumer.7 

Because  the  uses  of  information  held  by  data  brokers  continue  to  grow  and 
change,  affecting  consumers  in  myriad  ways,  consumers  must  be  given  the  legal 
right  to  see  all  of  the  information  data  brokers  hold  on  them,  and  to  seek  and  win 
prompt correction of that information if it is in error. 

4 D.  Lazarus,  ‘‘Wells  Boss  Frets  Over  Security,’’  S.F.  Chronicle,  Feb.  23,  2005.  http:// 

sfgate.com/cgi-bin/article.cgi?file=/c/a/2005/02/23/BUGBHBFCR11.DTL. 

5 ‘‘Cal  Laptop  Security  Put  Under  Microscope,’’  April  6,  2005,  Inside  Bay  Area,  http:// 

www.insidebayarea.com/searchresults/cil2642564. 

6 Opinion Page, Oakland Tribune, April 5, 2005. 
7 Testimony  of  Evan  Hendricks,  Editor/Publisher,  Privacy  Times  before  the  Senate  Banking 

Committee, March 15, 2005, http://banking.senate.gov/files/hendricks.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Protection for SSNs 

103 

The  Social  Security  number  (SSN)  has  become  a  de  facto  national  identifier  in  a 
number  of  U.S.  industries  dealing  with  consumers.  Some  proposals  for  reform  have 
emphasized consent to the use, sale, sharing or posting of Social Security numbers. 
Consumers  Union  believes  that  a  consent  approach  will  be  less  effective  than  a  set 
of rules designed to reduce the collection and use of sensitive consumer information. 
Take, for example, an analogy from the recycling mantra: ‘‘Reduce, reuse, recycle.’’ 
Just as public policy to promote recycling first starts with ‘‘reducing’’ the use of ma-
terials  that  could  end  up  in  a  landfill,  so  protection  of  sensitive,  personal  informa-
tion  should  begin  with  reduction  in  the  collection  and  use  of  such  information.  Re-
strictions  on  the  use  of  the  Social  Security  number  must  begin  with  restricting  the 
initial collection of this number to only those transactions where the Social Security 
number  is  not  only  necessary,  but  also  essential  to  facilitating  the  transaction  re-
quested  by  the  consumer.  The  same  is  true  for  other  identifying  numbers  or  infor-
mation  that  may  be  called  upon  as  Social  Security  numbers  are  relied  upon  less. 
Consumers  Union  endorses  these  basic  principles  for  an  approach  to  Social  Secu-

rity numbers: 

• Ban  collection  and  use  of  SSNs  by  private  entities  or  by  government  except 
where  necessary  to  a  transaction  and  there  is  no  alternative  identifier  which 
will suffice. 
• Ban  sale,  posting,  or  display  of  SSNs,  including  no  sale  of  credit  header  infor-
mation  containing  SSNs.  There  is  no  legitimate  reason  to  post  or  display  indi-
viduals’ Social Security numbers to the public. 

vate checks, statements, and the like 

• Ban sharing of SSNs, including between affiliates. 
• Ban secondary use of SSNs, including within the company which collected them. 
• Out  of  the  envelope:  ban  printing  or  encoding  of  SSNs  on  government  and  pri-
• Out  of  the  wallet:  ban  use  of  the  SSN  for  government  or  private  identifier,  ex-
cept for Social Security purposes. This includes banning the use of the SSN, or 
a variation or part of it, for government and private programs such as Medicare, 
health  insurance,  driver’s  licenses  or  driver’s  records,  and  military,  student,  or 
employee  identification.  Any  provision  banning  the  printing  of  SSNs  on  identi-
fying cards should also prohibit encoding the same information on the card. 

• Public records containing SSNs must be redacted before posting. 
• There should be no exceptions for regulated entities. 
• There should be no exception for business-to-business use of SSNs. 
Congress should also consider whether to impose the same type of ‘‘responsibility 
requirements’’  on  the  collection,  sale,  use,  sharing,  display  and  posting  of  other  in-
formation  that  could  easily  evolve  into  a  substitute  ‘‘national  identifier,’’  including 
drivers license number, state non-driver information number, biometric information 
and cell phone numbers. 
Creditor Identity Theft Prevention Obligations 

Information is stolen because it is valuable. A key part of that value is the ability 
to use the information to gain credit in someone else’s name. That value exists only 
because credit granting institutions do not check the identity of applicants carefully 
enough to discover identity thieves before credit is granted. 

Financial institutions and other users of consumer credit reports and credit scores 
should be obligated to take affirmative steps to establish contact with the consumer 
before  giving  credit  or  allowing  access  to  an  account  when  there  is  an  indicator  of 
possible  false  application,  account  takeover  or  unauthorized  use.  The  news  reports 
of the credit card issued to Clifford J. Dawg, while humorous, illustrate a real prob-
lem—creditor  eagerness  to  issue  credit  spurs  inadequate  review  of  the  identity  of 
the  applicant.8 When  the  applicant  is  a  dog,  this  might  seem  funny,  but  when  the 
applicant  is  a  thief,  there  are  serious  consequences  for  the  integrity  of  the  credit 
reporting system and for the consumer whose good name is being ruined. 

As new identifiers evolve, criminals will seek to gain access to and use those new 
identifiers.  Thus,  any  approach  to  attacking  identity  theft  must  also  impose  obliga-
tions on those who make that theft possible—those who grant credit, goods, or serv-

8 Both the news stories about Clifford J. Dawg and a thoughtful analysis of the larger problem 
of too lax identification standards applied by creditors is found in C. Hoofnagle, Putting Identity 
Theft  on  Ice:  Freezing  Credit  Reports  to  Prevent  Lending  to  Impostors,  in  Securing  Privacy  in 
the Information Age (forthcoming from Stanford University Press), http://papers.ssrn.com/sol3/ 
papers.cfm?abstractlid=650162. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

104 

ices  to  imposters  without  taking  careful  steps  to  determine  with  whom  they  are 
dealing. 

At  minimum,  creditors  should  be  required  to  actually  contact  the  applicant  to 
verify that he or she is the true source of an application for credit when certain trig-
gering  events  occur.  The  triggering  events  should  include  any  of  the  following  cir-
cumstances: 

• Incomplete match on Social Security number. 
• Address mismatch between application and credit file. 
• Erroneous or missing date of birth in application. 
• Misspellings of name or other material information in application. 
• Other indicators as practices change. 
Under  FACTA,  the  FTC  and  the  Federal  financial  institution  regulators  are 
charged  with  developing  a  set  of  red  flag  ‘‘guidelines’’  to  ‘‘identify  possible  risks’’  to 
customers or to the financial institution. However, FACTA stops with the identifica-
tion  of  risks.  It  does  not  require  that  financial  institutions  do  anything  to  address 
those  risks  once  identified  through  the  not-yet-released  guidelines.  The  presence  of 
a  factor  identified  in  the  guidelines  does  not  trigger  a  statutory  obligation  to  take 
more  care  in  determining  the  true  identity  of  the  applicant  before  granting  credit. 
Congress  should  impose  a  plain,  enforceable  obligation  for  creditors  to  contact  the 
consumer  to  verify  that  he  or  she  has  in  fact  sought  credit  when  certain  indicators 
of potential identity theft are present. 
Control for Consumers Over Affiliate-Sharing, Use of Information, Use of Credit Re-

ports and Credit Scores 

Consumers are caught between the growth in the collection and secondary use of 
information about them on the one hand and the increasing sophistication of crimi-
nals  in  exploiting  weaknesses  in  how  that  information  is  stored,  transported,  sold 
by  brokers,  shared  between  affiliates,  and  used  to  access  credit  files  and  credit 
scores. 

Identity theft has been fueled in part by information-sharing between and within 
companies,  the  existence  of  databases  that  consumers  don’t  know  about  and  can’t 
stop their information from being part of, the secondary use of information, and the 
granting  of  credit  based  on  a  check  of  the  consumer  credit  file  or  credit  score  with-
out efforts to verify the identity of the applicant.9 Consumers Union has consistently 
supported  Federal  and  State  efforts  to  give  consumers  the  legal  right  to  stop  the 
sharing of their sensitive, personal information among affiliates. Finally, it is essen-
tial to stopping the spread of numbers that serve as consumer identifiers that Con-
gress and the States impose strong restrictions on the use of sensitive, personal in-
formation  for  purposes  other  than  the  purpose  for  which  the  consumer  originally 
provided that information. 
Fix FACTA 

FACTA  has  made  some  things  more  difficult  for  identity  theft  victims,  according 
to  information  provided  to  Consumers  Union  by  nonprofits  and  professionals  who 
assist  identity  theft  victims.  Moreover,  FACTA  gives  only  limited  rights  to  those 
who  have  not  yet  become  victims  of  identity  theft,  and  FACTA  fails  to  offer  a  pure 
prevention  tool  for  all  consumers.  A  consumer  who  asserts  in  good  faith  that  he  or 
she  is  about  to  become  a  victim  of  identity  theft  gets  one  right  under  FACTA—the 
right  to  place,  or  renew,  a  90  day  fraud  alert.  However,  this  type  of  alert  places 
lower  obligations  on  the  potential  creditor  than  the  extended  alert,  which  is  re-
stricted only to identity theft victims. 

A  consumer  should  be  able  to  access  more  of  his  or  her  FACTA  rights,  such  as 
the extended fraud alert, before becoming an identity theft victim. One key FACTA 
right  is  tied  to  a  police  report,  which  victims  still  report  difficulty  in  getting  and 
using. 

Here are some key ways to make FACTA work for victims: 
• Initial fraud alert should be one year, not 90 days. 
• Extended  alert  and  other  victims’  rights,  other  than  blocking  of  information, 
should  be  available  to  all  identity  theft  victims  who  fill  out  the  FTC  ID  theft 
affidavit under penalty of perjury. 
• Business records should be available to any consumer who fills out the FTC ID 

theft affidavit under penalty of perjury. 

9 Secondary use is use for a purpose other than the purpose for which the consumer gave the 

information. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

105 

• Consumers  who  receive  a  notice  of  security  breach  should  be  entitled  to  place 
• Consumers who place a fraud alert have the right under FACTA to a free credit 

an extended fraud alert. 

report, but this should be made automatic. 

There is also work to do outside of FACTA, including work to develop a police re-
port that could be given to victims that is sufficiently similar, if not uniform, across 
jurisdictions,  so  that  the  victim  does  not  find  creditors  or  businesses  in  another  ju-
risdiction refusing to accept a police report from the victim’s home jurisdiction. 
Congress  Must  Encourage  the  States  To  Continue  To  Pioneer  Prompt 

Responses to Identity Crime 

Virtually  every  idea  on  the  table  today  in  the  national  debate  about  stemming 
identity  theft  and  protecting  consumer  privacy  comes  from  legislation  already  en-
acted  by  a  state.  Congress  must  not  cut  off  this  source  of  progress  and  innovation. 
Instead, any identity theft and consumer privacy legislation in Congress should ex-
pressly  permit  states  to  continue  to  enact  new  rights,  obligations,  and  remedies  in 
connection with identity theft and consumer privacy to the full extent that the State 
requirements are not inconsistent with the specific requirements of Federal law. 

Criminals  will  always  be  more  fast-acting,  and  fast-adapting,  than  the  Federal 
Government. An important response to this reality is to permit, and indeed encour-
age, State legislatures to continue to act in the areas of identity theft and consumer 
privacy.  Fast-acting  states  can  respond  to  emerging  practices  that  can  harm  con-
sumers  while  those  practices  are  still  regional,  before  they  spread  nationwide.  For 
example,  California  enacted  its  notice  of  security  breach  law  and  other  significant 
identity  theft  protections  because  identity  theft  was  a  significant  problem  in  Cali-
fornia  well  before  it  became,  or  at  least  was  recognized  as,  a  national  crime  wave. 
Identity  theft  illustrates  how  much  quicker  states  act  on  consumer  issues  than 
Congress. According to numbers released by the FTC, there were 9.9 million annual 
U.S. victims of identity theft in the year before Congress adopted the relatively mod-
est  rights  for  identity  theft  victims  found  in  FACTA.  The  identity  theft  provisions 
adopted  by  Congress  in  FACTA  were  modeled  on  laws  already  enacted  in  states 
such as California, Connecticut, Louisiana, Texas, and Virginia.10 
Strong and Broadly-Based Enforcement 

Consumers  need  effective  enforcement  of  those  obligations  and  restrictions  Con-
gress imposes in response to the increasing threats to consumer privacy, and of the 
growth  of  identity  theft.  A  diversity  of  approaches  strengthens  enforcement.  Each 
statutory obligation imposed by Congress should be enforceable by Federal agencies, 
the  Federal  law  enforcement  structure  with  the  Attorney  General  and  U.S.  Attor-
neys,  and  State  attorneys  general.  Where  a  state  is  structured  so  that  part  of  the 
job  of  protecting  the  public  devolves  to  a  local  entity,  such  as  a  district  attorney  or 
city  attorney,  those  local  entities  also  should  be  empowered  to  enforce  anti-identity 
theft and privacy measures in local civil or, where appropriate, criminal courts. 

There  is  also  a  role  for  a  private  right-of-action.  It  is  an  unfortunate  reality  in 
identity  theft  is  that  law  enforcement  resources  are  slim  relative  to  the  size  of  the 
problem.  This  makes  it  particularly  important  that  individuals  be  given  a  private 
right-of-action  to  enforce  the  obligations  owed  to  them  by  others  who  hold  their  in-
formation. A private right-of-action is an important part of any enforcement matrix. 
Money and Tools for Law Enforcement 

Even  if  all  the  recommended  steps  are  taken,  U.S.  consumers  will  still  need  vig-
orous,  well-funded  law  enforcement.  At  a  meeting  convened  by  Senator  Feinstein 
which included some twenty representatives of law enforcement, including police de-

10 See California Civil Code §§ 1785.11.1, 1785.11.2, 1785,16.1; Conn. SB 688 § 9(d), (e), Conn. 
Gen.  Stats.  § 36a–699;  IL  Re.  Stat.  Ch.  505  § 2MM;  LA  Rev.  Stat.  §§ 9:3568B.1,  9:3568C, 
9:3568D,  9:3571.1  (H)–(L);  Tex.  Bus.  &  Comm.  Code  §§ 20.01(7),  20.031,  20.034–039,  20.04;  VA 
Code  §§ 18.2–186.31:E.  The  role  of  the  states  has  also  been  important  in  financial  issues  unre-
lated  to  identity  theft.  Here  are  two  examples.  In  1986,  California  required  that  specific  infor-
mation be included in credit card solicitations with enactment of the then-titled Areias-Robbins 
Credit Card Full Disclosure Act of 1986. That statute required that every credit card solicitation 
to contain a chart showing the interest rate, grace period, and annual fee. 1986 Cal. Stats., Ch. 
1397,  codified  at  California  Civil  Code  § 1748.11.  Two  years  later,  Congress  chose  to  adopt  the 
same  concept  in  the  Federal  Fair  Credit  and  Charge  Card  Disclosure  Act  (FCCCDA),  setting 
standards for credit card solicitations, applications, and renewals. P. L. 100–583, 102 Stat. 2960 
(Nov.  1,  1988),  codified  in  part  at  15  U.S.C.  §§ 1637(c)  and  1610(e).  The  implementing  changes 
to  Federal  Regulation  Z  included  a  model  form  for  the  Federal  disclosure  box  which  is  quite 
similar to the form required under the pioneering California statute. 54 Fed. Reg. 13855, Appen-
dix G. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

106 

partments, sheriffs, and district attorneys, law enforcement uniformly proposed that 
they  be  given  tools  to  more  effectively  investigate  identity  theft.  Law  enforcement 
costs  money,  and  the  law  enforcers  noted  that  the  multi-jurisdictional  nature  of 
identify theft increases the costs and time, it takes to investigate these crimes. 

Law enforcers in California and Oregon have noted a strong link between identity 
theft crime and methamphetamine. The Riverside County Sheriff noted at a March 
29,  2005  event  that  when  drug  officers  close  a  methamphetamine  lab,  they  often 
find  boxes  of  fake  identification  ready  for  use  in  identity  theft.  The  drug  team  has 
closed  the  lab;  without  funding  for  training  and  ongoing  officer  time,  there  may  be 
no investigation of those boxes of identities. 

To prove a charge of attempted identity theft, a prosecutor may need to prove that 
the  real  person  holding  a  particular  driver’s  license  number,  credit  or  debit  card 
number, or Social Security number is different from the holder of the fake ID. Doing 
this  may  require  the  cooperation  of  a  State  Department  of  Motor  Vehicles,  a  finan-
cial  institution,  or  the  Social  Security  Administration.  The  public  meetings  of  the 
California  High  Tech  Crimes  Advisory  Committee  have  including  discussion  of  the 
difficulties and time delays law enforcement investigators encounter in trying to ob-
tain  this  cooperation.  Congress  should  work  with  law  enforcement  and  groups  rep-
resenting interest in civil liberties to craft a solution to verifying victim identity that 
will facilitate investigation of identity theft without infringing on the individual pri-
vacy of identity theft victims and other individuals. 

Law enforcement may have more specific proposals to enhance their effectiveness 

in fighting identity theft. Consumers Union generally supports: 

of concentration of victims, and of identity thieves. 

• Funding for regional identity theft law enforcement task forces in highest areas 
• Funding for investigation and prosecution. 
• An obligation on creditors, financial institutions, and the Social Security Admin-
istration  to  provide  information  about  suspected  theft-related  accounts  or  num-
bers to local, State, and Federal law enforcement after a simple, well designed, 
request process. 

Consumers  Union  believes  that  the  time  has  come  for  both  Congress  and  State 
legislatures  to  act  to  stem  identity  theft  through  strong  and  meaningful  require-
ments to tell consumers of security breaches; strong and detailed security standards 
and oversight for information brokers, reining in the use of Social Security numbers, 
increased  control  for  consumers  over  the  uses  of  their  information,  and  obligations 
on  creditors  to  end  their  role  in  facilitating  identity  theft  through  lack  of  care  in 
credit  granting.  This  should  be  done  without  infringing  on  the  role  of  the  states, 
with attention to the need to fund law enforcement to fight identity theft, and with 
attention  to  the  need  for  private  enforcement  by  consumers.  We  look  forward  to 
working  with  the  Chair  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  and  others  in  Congress, 
to  accomplish  these  changes  for  U.S.  consumers.  These  recommendations  by  Con-
sumers  Union  have  been  informed  by  the  work  of  victim  assistance  groups,  privacy 
advocates, and others. 11 

Consumer Reports, June 2005 

THE FIGHT AGAINST IDENTITY THEFT 

by Jim Guest, President 

‘‘I  was  mugged  once,  years  ago,’’  one  of  our  editorial  researchers  told  me.  ‘‘It  was 
bad, but at least that guy had the guts to look me in the eye.’’ This time, she’d got-

11 Many  law  enforcers,  victim  assistance  workers,  and  consumer  and  privacy  advocates  were 
engaged  in  the  issue  of  identity  theft  prevention  long  before  the  most  recent  ChoicePoint  secu-
rity breach came to light. Consumers Union has worked closely for many years on efforts to fight 
identity theft and protect consumer financial privacy with other national groups, and with con-
sumer  privacy  and  anti-identity  theft  advocates  and  victim  assistance  groups  based  in  Cali-
fornia.  Our  views  and  recommendations  are  strongly  informed  by  the  experiences  of  consumers 
reported  to  us  by  the  nonprofit  Privacy  Rights  Clearinghouse,  the  nonprofit  Identity  Theft  Re-
source  Center,  and  others  who  work  directly  with  identity  theft  victims.  These  groups  have 
worked to develop the State laws that are the basis for many of the proposals now being intro-
duced in Congress. Consumers Union is grateful for the leadership of the Privacy Rights Clear-
inghouse in consumer privacy policy work, the work of the State PIRGs and U.S. PIRG on con-
sumer  identity  theft  rights  which  includes  the  preparation  of  a  model  State  identity  theft  stat-
ute  in  cooperation  with  Consumers  Union,  for  the  work  for  consumers  on  the  accuracy  of  con-
sumer credit reporting issues done over the past decade by the Consumer Federation of America 
and U.S. PIRG, and for the contributions to the policy debate of organizations such as the Elec-
tronic Privacy Information Center, Privacy Times, and others too numerous to mention. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

107 

ten  a  call  from  her  bank  alerting  her  that  someone  in  Oregon  had  just  withdrawn 
$2,000  from  her  account.  Since  she  and  her  husband  were  both  at  home  in  New 
York, that was very bad news. 

Like many of the estimated 10 million people a year whose lives and accounts are 
invaded  by  identity  thieves,  our  staffer  had  been  as  cautious  as  she  could  be  and 
still be part of today’s marketplace. But either her financial records were leaked or 
a hacker typed his or her way through the barriers protecting her account. 

In  either  case,  companies  who  hold  sensitive,  personal  and  financial  information 
about  us,  and  the  lawmakers  who  should  be  overseeing  them,  are  failing  to  build 
stronger  protections  against  the  increasingly  prevalent  crime  of  ID  theft.  Law-
makers  and  regulators  must  work  fast.  Here  are  three  things  that  Consumers 
Union, the publisher of Consumer Reports, is pushing them to do: 

• Oversee  information  brokers,  companies  that  collect  and  sell  people’s  personal 
and  financial  data.  Federal  law  should  require  them  to  safeguard  those  data, 
sell  data  only  to  carefully  screened  clients,  tell  consumers  what’s  in  their  files, 
and  correct  mistakes  promptly,  since  mistakes  can  lose  you  a  job,  a  mortgage, 
or an insurance policy. 
• Pass  strong  Federal  and  State  laws  that  require  companies  to  notify  the  con-
sumers  whose  personal  and  financial  information  they  hold  when  their  privacy 
is compromised. Now, only California residents have that protection. 
• Pass laws in every state allowing consumers to ‘‘freeze’’ their credit-bureau files. 
With  a  security  freeze  in  place,  your  credit  report  and  score  can’t  be  given  to 
potential  new  creditors  unless  you  choose  to  ‘‘unlock’’  the  file  when  you  apply 
for,  say,  a  car  loan.  Most  businesses  won’t  issue  new  credit  or  loans  without 
first  checking  credit  records.  This  way,  thieves  will  hit  a  brick  wall  trying  to 
open an account in your name. 

There’s no single solution to shielding consumers from the fast-changing schemes 
of ID thieves, so Congress should preserve the right of States to continue developing 
ever more sophisticated guards. For more about what CU is doing, and for what you 
can do to protect yourself, go to our websites www.consumersunion.org/privacy and 
www.consumersunion.org/money. 

STATEMENT OF JAMES X.  DEMPSEY,  EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR,  CENTER FOR DEMOCRACY 
&  TECHNOLOGY,1 BEFORE THE SENATE COMMITTEE ON THE JUDICIARY,  APRIL 13, 
2005 

SECURING ELECTRONIC PERSONAL DATA: STRIKING A BALANCE BETWEEN PRIVACY 

AND COMMERCIAL AND GOVERNMENTAL USE 

Chairman Specter, Senator Leahy, and Members of the Committee, thank you for 
the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  Recent  security  breaches  at  a  range  of  companies 
and  institutions  resulting  in  the  loss  of  sensitive,  personal  information  have  high-
lighted the need for a more substantial legal framework at the national level for en-
tities  collecting,  using  and  selling  personal  data.  A  range  of  harms,  including  iden-
tity theft, can flow from the failure to protect electronic personal data and from gov-
ernmental or corporate misuse of data or reliance on inaccurate data. We offer here 
today  an  overview  of  the  policy  landscape  and  suggest  some  approaches  that  Con-
gress should consider to ensure the appropriate level of security and privacy protec-
tion.  We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  and  interested  stakeholders  to  achieve 
balanced solutions. 
The New Marketplace for Personal Data 

In the past decade, the commercial collection and sale of personal information has 
changed dramatically, driven by a combination of factors, facilitated by the Internet, 
and resulting in an ever more rapid flow of sensitive, personal information in ways 
that most consumers barely understand. The implications for commerce, national se-
curity  and  personal  privacy  have  been  detailed  in  recent  books  such  as  Robert 
O’Harrow’s ‘‘No Place to Hide.’’ 

The  private  sector  and  the  Federal  Government  have  many  legitimate  needs  for 
personal  information,  and  the  sharing  of  data  offers  benefits  to  consumers  in  the 

1 The  Center  for  Democracy  &  Technology  (CDT)  is  a  non-profit  public  interest  organization 
dedicated to promoting privacy and other democratic values for the new digital communications 
media. Among other activities, CDT coordinates the Digital Privacy and Security Working Group 
(DPSWG),  a  forum  for  computer,  communications,  and  public  interest  organizations,  companies 
and associations interested in information privacy and security issues. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

108 

form  of  readily  available  credit.  Businesses  and  non-profit  entities,  ranging  from 
landlords to retailers, to lawyers, to universities, obtain and share personal informa-
tion  to  provide  services  and  facilitate  economic  transactions.  Indeed,  an  important 
use of commercial data services is for anti-fraud purposes, including the prevention 
of  identity  theft.  The  Federal  Government  uses  personal  information  to  determine 
eligibility for government benefits, to support law enforcement, and to fight the war 
on terror. 

An  important  category  of  this  information  is  drawn  from  public  records  at  court-
houses  and  other  government  agencies.  Data  brokers  (we  use  the  term  throughout 
our testimony for lack of a better one, without intending to be derogatory and recog-
nizing that it is not well-defined) add considerable value by aggregating and catego-
rizing  this  information  to  provide  a  more  complete  picture  of  the  individuals  to 
whom it pertains. 

While data brokers provide important services to the government and the private 
sector,  they  also  raise  a  host  of  privacy  issues  and  concerns  about  the  security  of 
this  information.  The  recent  security  breaches  at  ChoicePoint  and  LexisNexis  have 
prompted  calls  for  examination  of  this  new  industry.  Already-regulated  entities, 
such  as  Bank  of  America,  have  also  lost  control  of  sensitive,  personal  information. 
So  have  merchants  whose  primary  business  is  not  data  aggregation.  DSW  Shoe 
Warehouse,  a  chain  of  shoe  retailers,  announced  recently  that  someone  had  stolen 
customers’  credit  card  information  from  its  database.  And  the  New  York  Times  re-
ported that already this year nine universities have reported the loss or compromise 
of  sensitive,  personal  information.2 Precisely  because  databases  of  electronic  per-
sonal data have tremendous value, they are attracting identity thieves. 

Even  legitimate  uses  of  personal  data  can  result  in  harm  to  individuals.  For  in-
stance,  individuals  can  suffer  adverse  consequences  when  data  brokers  sell  inac-
curate  or  incomplete  information  that  results  in  the  loss  of  employment  opportuni-
ties. In the context of government use of personal information, adverse consequences 
could include being suspected of criminal or terrorist activity. 

Congress  has  addressed  privacy  and  security  issues  with  respect  to  credit  report-
ing  agencies  in  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  (FCRA),  financial  institutions  in 
Gramm-Leach-Bliley (GLB), and healthcare providers in the Health Insurance Port-
ability  and  Accountability  Act  (HIPAA).  But  Congress’s  sectoral  approach  to  infor-
mation privacy has left gaps in the coverage of the law. 
Overview of Policy Responses 

We see at least five sets of issues facing Congress at this time: 

1.  As  a  first  step  towards  preventing  identity  theft,  entities,  including  govern-
ment entities, holding personal data should be required to notify individuals in 
the event of a security breach. 
2.  Since  notice  only  kicks  in  after  a  breach  has  occurred,  Congress  should  re-
quire  entities  that  electronically  store  personal  information  to  implement  secu-
rity safeguards, similar to those required by California AB 1950 and the regula-
tions under Gramm-Leach-Bliley. 
3. Congress should impose tighter controls on the sale, disclosure and use of So-
cial  Security  numbers  and  should  seek  to  break  the  habit  of  using  the  SSN  as 
an authenticator. 
4.  Congress  should  address  the  Federal  Government’s  growing  use  of  commer-
cial databases, especially in the law enforcement and national security contexts. 
5. Finally, Congress should examinee the ‘‘Fair Information Practices’’ that have 
helped define privacy in the credit and financial sectors and adapt them as ap-
propriate  to  the  data  flows  of  this  new  technological  and  economic  landscape. 

What Is Privacy? 

Information  privacy  is  not  merely  about  keeping  personal  information  confiden-
tial.  Rather,  it  is  well  established  by  United  States  Supreme  Court  cases,  the  Fed-
eral  Privacy  Act,  and  privacy  laws  like  the  FCRA  and  HIPAA  that  the  concept  of 
privacy  extends  to  information  that  an  individual  has  disclosed  to  another  in  the 
course  of  a  commercial  or  governmental  transaction  and  even  to  data  that  is  pub-
licly  available.3 Information  privacy  is  about  control,  fairness,  and  consequences. 

at B1. 

2 Tom Zeller, Jr., Some Colleges Falling Short In Data Security, New York Times, Apr. 4, 2005, 

3 In United States Department of Justice v. Reporters Committee for Freedom of the Press, 489 
U.S.  749,  762–63  (1989),  the  Supreme  Court  rejected  the  ‘‘cramped  notion  of  personal 
privacy’’that ‘‘because events . . . have been previously disclosed to the public, . . . [the] privacy 
interest in avoiding disclosure of a . . . compilation of these events approaches zero.’’ The Court 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

109 

Data  privacy  laws  limit  the  use  of  widely  available,  and  even  public,  information 
because  it  is  recognized  that  individuals  should  retain  some  control  over  the  use  of 
information about themselves and should have redress to the consequences that re-
sult from others’ use of that information. A set of commonly accepted ‘‘Fair Informa-
tion  Practices’’  captures  this  broader  conception  of  privacy  and  is  reflected,  albeit 
in piecemeal fashion, in the various privacy laws and in the practices of commercial 
entities and government agencies. These principles govern not just the initial collec-
tion  of  data,  but  also  the  use  of  information  collected  and  shared  in  the  course  of 
governmental and commercial transactions. 

The  ‘‘Fair  Information  Practices’’  were  first  articulated  in  the  1970s  and  have 
been embodied in varying degrees in the Privacy Act, the FCRA, and the other ‘‘sec-
toral’’ Federal privacy laws that govern commercial uses of information. The concept 
of  Fair  Information  Practices  (FIPs)  has  remained  remarkably  relevant  despite  the 
dramatic changes in information technology that have occurred since they were first 
developed. While mapping these principles to the current data landscape poses chal-
lenges,  and  while  some  of  the  principles  may  be  inapplicable  to  public  record  data, 
they provide a remarkably sound basis for analyzing the issues associated with cre-
ating a policy framework for the privacy of commercial databases. 

The FIPs principles are variously enumerated, but we see eight: (1) notice to indi-
viduals of the collection of personally identifiable information, (2) limits on use and 
disclosure  of  data  for  purposes  other  than  those  for  which  the  data  was  collected 
in  the  first  place,  (3)  limitations  on  the  retention  of  data,  (4)  a  requirement  to  en-
sure the accuracy, completeness and timeliness of information, (5) the right of indi-
viduals to access information about themselves, (6) the opportunity to correct infor-
mation or to challenge decisions made on the basis of incorrect data, (7) appropriate 
security  measures  to  protect  the  information  against  abuse  or  unauthorized  disclo-
sure,  and  (8)  the  establishment  of  redress  mechanisms  for  individuals  wrongly  and 
adversely affected by the use of personally identifiable information.4 

A lot more work would be needed to develop a regulatory framework imposing all 
of these principles on all entities that hold or use personally identifiable data. Nev-
ertheless,  these  principles  do  provide  a  framework  for  analyzing  the  current  situa-
tion. They suggest certain immediate steps that Congress could take. 
Notice of Breach 

As a first step, there should be a national requirement that individuals be notified 
when  their  information  held  by  a  third  party  is  obtained  by  an  unauthorized  user. 
CDT would support appropriate Federal legislation modeled on the California disclo-
sure law that would require holders of sensitive, personal information to notify peo-
ple  whose  information  might  have  been  stolen  or  otherwise  obtained  by  unauthor-
ized persons.5 Some industry leaders have also supported Federal notice legislation, 
as  did  the  Chairman  of  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  at  earlier  Congressional 
hearings. 

The California law worked well after the ChoicePoint security breach. As a result 
of  the  California  law,  ChoicePoint  was  required  to  notify  individuals  so  they  could 
take  protective  action.  And  public  pressure  led  ChoicePoint  to  give  nationwide  no-
tice.  California  is  currently  the  only  state  with  such  a  law  on  the  books,  but  other 
states  are  currently  considering  similar  legislation.  Congress  should  enact  Federal 
legislation that is as protective as the California statute. 

There has been some debate about when entities should be required to give notice 
of a breach. Some have argued that the holder of the information should be allowed 

held  in  that  case  that  the  government  can  withhold  from  public  disclosure  databases  composed 
entirely  of  publicly  available  data  because  there  is  a  ‘‘distinction,  in  terms  of  personal  privacy, 
between  scattered  disclosure  of  the  bits  of  information  . . .  and  revelation  of  the  [information] 
as a whole.’’ The Court based its ruling on the conclusion that, ‘‘Plainly there is a vast difference 
between the public records that might be found after a diligent search of courthouse files, county 
archives, and local police stations throughout the country and a computerized summary located 
in  a  single  clearinghouse  of  information.’’  489  U.S.  at  764.  The  Court  rejected  the  notion  that 
an  individual  has  no  privacy  interest  in  data  that  is  publicly  available  somewhere.  See  id.  at 
770  (‘‘In  sum,  the  fact  that  an  event  is  not  wholly  ‘private’  does  not  mean  that  an  individual 
has no interests in limiting disclosure or dissemination of the information.’’ (quotation omitted)). 
See also Reno v. Condon, 528 U.S. 141, 148 (2000) (upholding Federal statute restricting States’ 
sale  of  driver’s  license  information  to  commercial  entities  even  though  the  information  was 
available to the public for a range of purposes). 

4 http://www.cdt.org/privacy/guide/basic/generic.html. 
5 The  California  law  states  that  any  agency  or  business  ‘‘that  owns  or  licenses  computerized 
data  that  includes  personal  information  shall  disclose  any  breach  of  the  security  of  the  system 
following  discovery  or  notification  of  the  breach  in  the  security  of  the  data  to  any  resident  of 
California whose unencrypted personal information was, or is reasonably believed to have been, 
acquired by an unauthorized person.’’ Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.29(a), § 1798.82(a). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

110 

to exercise discretion in determining whether the breach is one that poses a signifi-
cant risk of harm to individuals. Concern has been expressed that if consumers are 
notified  of  every  security  breach,  they  would  receive  too  many  notices  and  become 
immune  to  them.  While  the  risk  of  over-notification  is  real,  guidance  issued  by  the 
State of California on its disclosure law seems to address concerns about over-notifi-
cation.  An  appropriate  standard  might  be  to  require  entities  that  discover  a  breach 
of  security  of  a  system  containing  unencrypted  personally  identifiable  data  in  elec-
tronic  form  to  notify  any  U.S.  resident  whose  data  was,  or  is  reasonably  believed 
to have been, acquired by an unauthorized person. If the entity is not certain wheth-
er  the  breach  warrants  notification,  it  should  be  able  to  consult  with  the  Federal 
Trade  Commission.  This  would  allow  the  entities  to  avoid  giving  notice  in  the  case 
of  accidental  unauthorized  access  that  does  not  pose  a  risk  of  harm  to  the  public, 
while ensuring that the public is adequately protected in those cases where data has 
been acquired unlawfully. Additionally, it may be desirable to have a two-tiered sys-
tem, with notice to the FTC of all breaches of personal data and notice to consumers 
where  there  is  a  potential  risk  of  identity  theft.  Broader  notice  to  the  FTC  would 
help with oversight and would allow for adjustment in reporting thresholds. 

Notice alone, however, is not enough. Consideration needs to be given to the ques-
tion  of  what  options  a  consumer  has  after  receiving  notice  of  a  breach.  Consumers 
can  require  a  fraud  alert  on  their  credit  reports,  but  under  current  law  that  has 
to  be  renewed  every  90  days  unless  the  individual  is  actually  the  victim  of  identity 
theft,  in  which  case  he  is  entitled  to  a  7  year  notice.  Another  approach  is  to  give 
consumers the ability to ‘‘freeze’’ their credit reports, blocking their release and thus 
preventing the issuance of credit. Texas and California currently allow credit report 
freezes, and Vermont and Louisiana freeze legislation is supposed to take effect this 
summer.  At  least  15  other  states  are  considering  similar  legislation. 6 Another  way 
to  allocate  risk  may  be  to  create  a  ‘‘Do  Not  Issue  Credit  without  Verification  List,’’ 
allowing  consumers  to  post  a  warning  to  creditors  to  obtain  additional  identity 
verification before issuing credit. This would not be a freeze, but would put creditors 
on alert that they need to be careful. 
Security of Personally Identifiable Information 

While notice legislation would be helpful in mitigating the damage from a security 
breach  and  might  prod  companies  to  improve  security  proactively,  Congress  should 
enact legislation requiring commercial entities that hold personal information to im-
plement  information  security  programs.  Already  there  is  a  patchwork  of  require-
ments.  Financial  institutions  are  already  subject  to  information  security  require-
ments  under  Gramm-Leach-Bliley, 7 and  the  Health  Insurance  Portability  and  Ac-
countability  Act  imposes  similar  requirements  on  health  care  providers  and  insur-
ers, 8 the  Sarbanes-Oxley  legislation  also  has  a  provision  that  is  interpreted  as  im-
posing some kind of data security obligation. The Federal Trade Commission has ex-
ercised  its  Section  5  authority  and  obtained  consent  agreements  with  a  number  of 
companies that are looked to as models. And the California law known as AB 1950 
has  imposed  a  general  data  security  obligation  on  companies  doing  business  there. 
It  is  probably  time  to  bring  some  uniformity  to  these  requirements.  The  Federal 
Trade  Commission  regulations  implementing  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  provide  a  good 
framework  and  probably  have  about  the  right  level  of  detail  for  security  programs 
for  data  brokers  and  other  commercial  entities.9 They  require  an  entity  to  develop, 
implement  and  maintain  a  comprehensive  information  security  program  that  con-
tains administrative, technical and physical safeguards that are tailored to the size 
and nature of the entity. Among other elements of a security program, they require 
entities that hold personal information to conduct a risk assessment to identify and 
develop  systems  to  protect  against  anticipated  threats  and  unauthorized  access  to 
information,  to  train  employees,  to  audit  their  systems  to  identify  unauthorized  ac-
cess,  and  to  periodically  reassess  the  program’s  effectiveness.  Otherwise,  the  FTC 
approach  gives  entities  that  collect  and  store  personal  information  the  flexibility  to 
develop security programs that fit their business models. 
Social Security Number Protection 

Personal  privacy  is  not  just  threatened  by  ineffective  or  nonexistent  information 
security  systems,  however.  Another  threat  to  personal  privacy  is  the  proliferation 
and  misuse  of  Social  Security  numbers.  When  the  Federal  Government  first  issued 

6 Andrew  Shain,  ‘‘Nation,  N.C.  address  ID  security  breaches,’’  Charlotte  Observer,  Mar.  24, 

2005, http://www.charlotte.com/mld/charlotte/11215774.htm. 

7 15 U.S.C. § 6801(b). 
8 Pub. L. 104–191, § 264. 
9 See Standards For Safeguarding Customer Information, 16 C.F.R. §§ 314.1–.5 (2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

111 

Social  Security  numbers  in  1936,  it  limited  their  use  to  identifying  accounts  for 
workers  with  earnings  from  jobs  covered  by  the  Social  Security  Act  of  1935.  Social 
Security  numbers  were  not  supposed  to  serve  as  the  universal  identifiers  that  they 
have  become.  In  fact,  they  were  initially  called  Social  Security  Account  Numbers 
and  for  many  years  the  words  ‘‘Not  For  Identification’’appeared  on  Social  Security 
cards.10 Over time, however, Social Security numbers have become de facto national 
identifiers,  serving  as  the  key  that  unlocks  many  databases  containing  medical 
records, university records, employee files and bank records, just to name a few. 

Worse,  the  SSN  is  used  as  an  authenticator.  That  is,  it  is  used  like  a  PIN  num-
ber—even  though  SSNs  are  widely  available,  entities  treat  them  as  if  they  were  a 
secret  and  that  therefore  someone  is  you  if  he  knows  your  SSN.  This  is  very  poor 
security practice. As a result, Social Security numbers are a major factor in identity 
theft. 

CDT  supports  legislation  that  would  tighten  controls  on  the  sale,  purchase  and 
display  of  Social  Security  numbers.  Given  the  ubiquity  of  Social  Security  numbers 
in  the  public  domain,  it  might  not  be  possible  to  prevent  criminals  from  acquiring 
them, but that does not mean we should give up trying to curtail the SSN’s overuse 
and misuse. We believe that this can be done without prohibiting the use of the SSN 
as  an  identifier  or  disambiguator  in  large  databases.  Certainly,  the  SSN  should  be 
phased  out  as  a  student  or  employee  ID  number  reflected  on  ID  cards,  transcripts 
and other records disclosed outside an institution. Congress should also, where fea-
sible, limit the use of Social Security numbers by government entities. In particular, 
states should be prohibited from using Social Security numbers on drivers’ licenses. 
These  changes  will  have  limited  effect,  however,  unless  it  is  also  recognized  that 
it  is  poor  security  practice  to  use  the  SSN  as  an  authenticator—treating  it  like  a 
password or an obscure bit of information likely to be known only to the one person 
to  whom  it  was  issued.  The  habit  of  relying  on  the  SSN  for  verification  of  identity 
needs to be broken.11 
Government Use of Commercial Databases 

An  often  overlooked  but  very  important  issue  is  the  Federal  Government’s  use  of 
commercial  databases.  As  discussed  earlier,  the  government  uses  commercial  data 
for  law  enforcement  and  national  security  purposes.  The  Privacy  Act  of  1974  was 
supposed to subject government agencies that collect personally identifiable informa-
tion  to  the  Fair  Information  Practices,  but  the  Act’s  protections  only  apply  to  Fed-
eral  ‘‘systems  of  records.’’ 12 That  means  that  the  government  can  bypass  the  Pri-
vacy  Act  by  accessing  existing  private  sector  databases,  rather  than  collecting  the 
information  itself.  Thus,  although  the  Privacy  Act  requires  notice  to  and  consent 
from  individuals  when  the  government  collects  and  shares  information  about  them, 
gives citizens the right to see whatever information the government has about them, 
and  holds  government  databases  to  certain  accuracy  standards,  none  of  those  rules 
applies when the government accesses commercial information without pulling that 
data  into  a  government  database.  Currently,  the  government  need  not  ensure  (or 
even evaluate) the accuracy of the data; it need not allow individuals to review and 
correct  the  data;  and  the  government  is  not  limited  in  how  it  interprets  or  charac-
terizes the data. 

Commercial  information  can  and  should  play  a  key  role  in  law  enforcement  and 
national security investigations. But agencies relying on that data should have clear 
guidelines for its use—guidelines that both protect individual rights and ensure the 
information is useful for investigative purposes. 

One  option  would  be  to  make  it  clear  that  the  Privacy  Act  applies  whether  the 
government  is  creating  its  own  database  or  acquiring  access  to  a  database  from  a 
commercial entity. Also, Congress could apply the concept of Privacy Impact Assess-
ments to the acquisition of commercial databases. Section 208 of the E-Government 
Act  of  2002  already  requires  a  PIA  if  the  government  initiates  a  new  ‘‘collection’’ 
of information.13 The same process should apply when the government acquires ac-

10 www.epic.org/privacy/hew1973report/c7.htm 
11 The habit of relying blindly on the SSN as an identifier also needs to be broken. See Lesley 
Mitchell,  ‘‘New  wrinkle  in  ID  theft;  Thieves  pair  your  SS  number  with  their  name,  buy  with 
credit, never get caught; Social Security numbers a new tool for thieves,’’ The Salt Lake Tribune, 
June 6, 2004, at E1. 

12 The term ‘‘system of records’’ is defined as ‘‘a group of any records under the control of any 
agency from which information is retrieved by the name of the individual or by some identifying 
number,  symbol,  or  other  identifying  particular  assigned  to  the  individual.’’  5  U.S.C.  § 552a(a). 
13 E-Government  Act  of  1002,  Pub.  L.  107–347,  § 208(b)(1).  Under  the  E-Government  Act,  an 
agency  is  required  to  perform  a  privacy  impact  assessment  before  it  ‘‘develop[s]  or  procure[s] 
information technology that collects, maintains, or disseminates information that is in an identi-
Continued 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

112 

cess  to  a  commercial  database  containing  the  same  type  of  information  that  would 
be covered if the government itself were collecting it. 

Another approach, based on a bill that Senator Wyden introduced in the last Con-
gress,14 would be to require the government to perform an accounting of private sec-
tor  databases  before  using  them.  Under  the  Wyden  proposal,  a  government  agency 
that acquired access to databases containing personally identifiable information con-
cerning U.S. citizens would be required to publish in the Federal Register a descrip-
tion  of  the  database,  the  name  of  the  entity  from  which  the  agency  obtained  the 
database  and  the  amount  of  the  contract  for  use  of  the  database.  In  addition,  the 
agency would be required to adopt regulations that establish 

the database; 

the minimum necessary to accomplish the government’s goals; 

• the personnel permitted to access, analyze or otherwise use the database; 
• standards  that  govern  the  access  to  and  analysis  and  use  of  such  information; 
• standards  to  ensure  that  personal  information  accessed,  analyzed  and  used  is 
• standards  to  limit  the  retention  and  re-disclosure  of  information  obtained  from 
• procedures to ensure that such data is accurate, relevant, complete and timely; 
• auditing  and  security  measures  to  protect  against  unauthorized  access  to  or 
• applicable  mechanisms  that  individuals  may  use  to  secure  timely  redress  for 
any  adverse  consequences  wrongly  experienced  due  to  the  access,  analysis  or 
use of such database; 
• mechanisms,  if  any,  for  the  enforcement  and  independent  oversight  of  existing 
• an  outline  of  enforcement  mechanisms  for  accountability  to  protect  individuals 
and  the  public  against  unlawful  or  unauthorized  access  to  or  use  of  the  data-
base. 

analysis, use or modification of data in the database; 

or planned procedures, policies or guidelines; and 

Agencies might also incorporate into their contract with commercial entities provi-
sions that provide for penalties when the commercial entity sells information to the 
agency that the commercial entity knows, or should know, is inaccurate or when the 
commercial entity fails to inform the agency of corrections or changes to data in the 
database. 

The  Intelligence  Reform  Act  that  Congress  passed  last  December  established 
guidelines  for  the  government’s  evaluation  of  Secure  Flight  plans  that  suggest  a 
broader  framework  for  use  of  data.15 Congress  could  adopt  similar  guidelines  for 
government agencies to follow before implementing any screening program that uses 
commercially  available  data.  As  an  initial  matter,  all  government  screening  pro-
grams should be Congressionally authorized. This would ensure some degree of pub-
lic  accountability  and  Congressional  oversight.  In  addition,  all  screening  programs 
should be subject to regulations that include, at a minimum, the following elements: 
• procedures  to  enable  individuals,  who  suffer  an  adverse  consequence  because 
the system determined that they might pose a security threat, to appeal the de-
termination and correct any inaccurate data; 
• procedures  to  ensure  that  the  databases  the  government  uses  to  establish  the 
identity of individuals or otherwise make assessments about individuals will not 
produce  a  large  number  of  false  positives  or  unjustified  adverse  consequences; 
• procedures  to  ensure  that  the  search  tools  that  the  department  or  agency  will 
use are accurate and effective and will allow the department or agency to make 
an accurate prediction of who may pose a security threat; 16 
• sufficient  operational  safeguards  to  reduce  the  chance  for  abuse  of  the  system; 
• substantial  security  measures  to  protect  the  system  against  unauthorized  ac-

cess; 

fiable form’’ or ‘‘initiat[es] a new collection of information. . . .’’ § 208(b)(1)(A). A privacy impact 
assessment  is  required  to  address,  ‘‘(I)  what  information  is  collected;  (II)  why  the  information 
is  being  collected;  (III)  the  intended  use  of  the  agency  of  the  information;  (IV)  with  whom  the 
information  will  be  shared;  (V)  what  notice  or  opportunities  for  consent  would  be  provided  to 
individuals  regarding  what  information  is  collected  and  how  that  information  is  shared;  (VI) 
how  the  information  will  be  secured;  and  (VII)  whether  a  system  of  records  is  being  created 
under’’ the Privacy Act. § 208(b)(2)(B). 

14 S. 1484, 108th Cong. (1st Sess. 2003). 
15 Intelligence Reform and Terrorism Prevention Act of 2004, Pub. L. 108–458, § 4012(a). 
16 This  provision  is  drawn  from  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  Appropriations  Act, 

2005, Pub. L. 108–334, § 552. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

113 

and 

• policies that establish effective oversight of the use and operation of the system; 

• procedures  to  ensure  that  the  technological  architecture  of  the  system  does  not 

pose any privacy concerns. 

These  approaches,  all  of  which  Congress  has  previously  approved  in  similar  con-
texts,  strike  a  balance  between  the  government’s  need  for  information  and  the  pri-
vacy  interests  of  individuals.  Adapting  the  Privacy  Act  and  Fair  Information  Prin-
ciples to government uses of commercial databases would go a long way toward clos-
ing the unintended gap in privacy protection that exists under the current law. 
Regulation of Data Brokers 

Finally,  Congress  should  consider  whether  there  are  gaps  in  the  current  sectoral 
laws  that  protect  privacy  and  focus  on  the  harms  that  can  flow  from  use  of  inac-
curate  or  misleading  information.  This  is  not  about  use  of  marketing  data  to  send 
catalogues  or  sales  offers.  Rather,  in  the  context  where  adverse  consequences  can 
result,  Congress  should  apply  to  data  brokers  the  Fair  Information  Practices  that 
are the framework of the Fair Credit Reporting Act and other privacy laws. 

As  the  law  stands  now,  these  Fair  Information  Practices  apply  only  when  data 
brokers  collect  and  use  information  in  a  way  that  is  governed  by  the  Fair  Credit 
Reporting  Act.  For  instance,  if  a  data  broker  sells  personal  information  to  a  third 
party that uses the information to determine eligibility for insurance, the Fair Cred-
it  Reporting  Act  would  apply  and  certain  rights  would  attach  to  the  individual  to 
whom  the  information  pertains.  The  individual  would  be  able  to  obtain  a  copy  of 
the  report,  challenge  the  accuracy  of  the  data  and  correct  any  inaccurate  informa-
tion.  The  ability  to  do  this  is  particularly  important  when  a  person  can  suffer  ad-
verse  consequences—such  as  the  denial  of  insurance—from  the  use  of  the  personal 
information. But if the data broker sold that same information to an insurance com-
pany for use in claims processing—in which case the individual might be denied re-
imbursement  under  her  insurance  policy—the  individual  would  not  have  any  of 
those same rights.17 

We  note  that  Derek  Smith,  the  Chairman  and  CEO  of  ChoicePoint,  last  year 
called for a national dialogue on privacy, to develop a policy framework for his com-
panies  and  others.  Specifically,  Smith  called  for  expanding  the  principles  reflected 
in the FCRA: 

‘‘We  should  agree  that  the  consensual  model  is  best  to  the  maximum  degree 
possible,  understanding  that  law  enforcement  and  national  security  uses  may 
outweigh getting prior consent for certain information. By this I mean that indi-
viduals should give permission (or not) at the time information is gathered and 
should  agree  to  its  use.  Data  should  not  be  used  for  a  different  purpose  unless 
new permission is obtained. However, we must recognize that public record data 
is,  fundamentally,  just  that—public—and  does  not  fit  within  the  consensual 
model  because  of  the  current  local,  State,  and  Federal  freedom  of  information 
acts. 
Everyone  should  have  a  right  of  access  to  data  that  is  used  to  make  decisions 
about  them—subject  to  the  same  caveats  about  law  enforcement  and  national 
security uses. In other words, expand the principles of the Fair Credit Reporting 
Act  to  all  types  of  information:  right  to  access,  right  to  question  the  accuracy 
and  prompt  a  review,  and  right  to  comment  if  a  negative  record  is  found  to  be 
accurate.’’ 18 

Conclusion 

Resolving these issues will require a broad-based and inclusive dialogue. We must 
strike  a  balance,  but  the  current  absence  of  a  comprehensive  legal  framework  for 
the collection, sale and use of sensitive, personal information is yielding harms that 
are made clear every day. The Center for Democracy and Technology looks forward 
to  working  with  the  Committee,  with  all  of  today’s  witnesses,  and  with  all  stake-
holders.  We  are  not  helpless  in  the  face  of  the  ongoing  revolution  in  information 
technology.  Through  the  policy  process,  we  can  decide  whether  there  is  ‘‘No  Place 
to Hide.’’ 

17 Michael  Hiltzik,  Data  Show  Information  Collector  Can’t  Be  Trusted,  Los  Angeles  Times, 

Mar. 3, 2005, at C1. 

18 Derek  V.  Smith,  ‘‘Risk  Revolution:  The  Threats  Facing  America  and  Technology’s  Promise 

for a Safer Tomorrow’’ (Longstreet Press, 2004) 185. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

114 

STATEMENT OF OLIVER I.  IRELAND,  ATTORNEY,  MORRISON &  FOERSTER LLP;  ON 
BEHALF OF VISA U.S.A.  INC.,  BEFORE THE SUBCOMMITTEE ON COMMERCE,  TRADE, 
AND CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND COMMERCE, 
UNITED STATES HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, MAY 11, 2005 

SECURING CONSUMERS’ DATA: OPTIONS FOLLOWING SECURITY BREACHES 

Good morning Chairman Stearns, Ranking Member Schakowsky, and Members of 
the Subcommittee. I am a partner in the law firm of Morrison & Foerster LLP, and 
practice  in  the  firm’s  Washington,  D.C.  office.  I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  the 
Subcommittee  on  behalf  of  the  Visa,  U.S.A.  Inc.,  to  discuss  the  important  issue  of 
consumer information security. 

The Visa Payment System, of which Visa U.S.A. is a part, is the largest consumer 
payment  system,  and  the  leading  consumer  e-commerce  payment  system,  in  the 
world,  with  more  volume  than  all  other  major  payment  cards  combined.  Visa  plays 
a pivotal role in advancing new payment products and technologies, including tech-
nology  initiatives  for  protecting  personal  information  and  preventing  identity  theft 
and other fraud. 

Visa commends the Subcommittee for focusing on the important issue of informa-
tion  security.  As  the  leading  consumer  electronic  commerce  payment  system  in  the 
world,  Visa  considers  it  a  top  priority  to  remain  a  leader  in  developing  and  imple-
menting  technology,  products,  and  services  that  protect  consumers  from  the  effects 
of  information  security  breaches.  As  a  result,  Visa  has  long  recognized  the  impor-
tance  of  strict  internal  procedures  to  protect  Visa’s  members’  cardholder  informa-
tion, thereby to protect the integrity of the Visa system. 

Visa  has  substantial  incentives  to  maintain  strong  security  measures  to  protect 
cardholder  information.  The  Visa  system  provides  for  zero  liability  to  cardholders 
for unauthorized transactions. Cardholders are not responsible for unauthorized use 
of  their  cards.  The  Visa  Zero  Liability  policy  guarantees  maximum  protection  for 
Visa  cardholders  against  fraud  due  to  information  security  breaches.  Because  the 
financial institutions that are Visa members do not impose the losses for fraudulent 
transactions  on  their  cardholder  customers,  these  institutions  incur  costs  from 
fraudulent transactions. These costs are in the form of direct dollar losses from cred-
it  that  will  not  be  repaid,  and  also  can  be  in  the  form  of  indirect  costs  attributable 
to  the  harm  and  inconvenience  that  might  be  felt  by  cardholders  or  merchants.  Ac-
cordingly, Visa aggressively protects the cardholder information of its members. 
Existing Federal Laws and Rules for Information Security 

Existing  Federal  laws  and  regulations  also  obligate  financial  institutions  to  pro-
tect the personal information of their customers. Rules adopted under section 501(b) 
of  the  Gramm-Leach-Bliley  Act  of  1999  by  the  Federal  banking  agencies  and  the 
Federal  Trade  Commission  (FTC)  (GLBA  501(b)  Rules)  establish  information  secu-
rity standards for the financial institutions subject to the jurisdiction of these agen-
cies. Under the GLBA 501(b) Rules, financial institutions must establish and main-
tain  comprehensive  information  security  programs  to  identify  and  assess  the  risks 
to  customer  information  and  then  control  these  potential  risks  by  adopting  appro-
priate security measures. 

Each  financial  institution’s  program  for  information  security  must  be  risk-based. 
Every  institution  must  tailor  its  program  to  the  specific  characteristics  of  its  busi-
ness,  customer  information  and  information  systems,  and  must  continuously  assess 
the  threats  to  its  customer  information  and  systems.  As  those  threats  change,  the 
institution must appropriately adjust and upgrade its security measures to respond 
to those threats. 

However,  the  scope  of  the  GLBA  501(b)  Rules  is  limited.  Many  holders  of  sen-
sitive,  personal  information  are  not  financial  institutions  covered  by  the  GLBA 
501(b) Rules. For example, employers and most retail merchants are not covered by 
the  GLBA  501(b)  Rules,  even  though  they  may  possess  sensitive  information  about 
consumers. 
Visa’s Cardholder Information Security Plan 

Because  of  its  concerns  about  the  adequacy  of  the  security  of  information  about 
Visa cardholders, Visa has developed and is implementing a comprehensive and ag-
gressive  customer  information  security  program  known  as  the  Cardholder  Informa-
tion  Security  Plan  (CISP).  CISP  applies  to  all  entities,  including  merchants,  that 
store,  process,  transmit,  or  hold  Visa  cardholder  data,  and  covers  enterprises  oper-
ating  through  brick-and-mortar  stores,  mail  and  telephone  order  centers,  or  the 
Internet.  CISP  was  developed  to  ensure  that  the  cardholder  information  of  Visa’s 
members  is  kept  protected  and  confidential.  CISP  includes  not  only  data  security 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

115 

standards  but  also  provisions  for  monitoring  compliance  with  CISP  and  sanctions 
for failure to comply. 

As a part of CISP, Visa requires all participating entities to comply with the ‘‘Visa 
Digital Dozen’’—twelve basic requirements for safeguarding accounts. These include: 
(1)  install  and  maintain  a  working  network  firewall  to  protect  data;  (2)  do  not  use 
vendor-supplied  defaults  for  system  passwords  and  security  parameters;  (3)  protect 
stored  data;  (4)  encrypt  data  sent  across  public  networks;  (5)  use  and  regularly  up-
date anti-virus software; (6) develop and maintain secure systems and applications; 
(7) restrict access to data on a ‘‘need-to-know’’ basis; (8) assign a unique ID to each 
person  with  computer  access;  (9)  restrict  physical  access  to  data;  (10)  track  all  ac-
cess  to  network  resources  and  data;  (11)  regularly  test  security  systems  and  proc-
esses; and (12) implement and maintain an overall information security policy. 
Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard 

Visa  is  not  the  only  credit  card  organization  that  has  developed  security  stand-
ards.  In  order  to  avoid  the  potential  for  imposing  conflicting  requirements  on  mer-
chants and others, in December of 2004, Visa, MasterCard, American Express, Dis-
cover,  and  Diners  Club  collaborated  to  align  their  respective  data  security  require-
ments  for  merchants  and  third  parties.  Visa  found  that  the  differences  between 
these security programs were more procedural than substantive. Therefore, Visa has 
been  able  to  integrate  CISP  into  a  common  set  of  data  security  requirements  with-
out diluting the substantive measures for information security already developed in 
CISP.  Visa  supports  this  new,  common  set  of  data  security  requirements,  which  is 
known as the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI Standard). 
Neural  Networks  To  Detect  Fraud  and  Block  Potentially  Unauthorized 

Transactions 

In  addition  to  the  CISP  program,  which  helps  to  prevent  the  use  of  cardholder 
information  for  fraudulent  purposes,  Visa  uses  sophisticated  neural  networks  that 
flag unusual spending patterns for fraud and block the authorization of transactions 
where  fraud  is  suspected.  When  cardholder  information  is  compromised,  Visa  noti-
fies the issuing financial institution and puts the affected card numbers on a special 
monitoring  status.  If  Visa  detects  any  unusual  activity  in  that  group  of  cards,  Visa 
again  notifies  the  issuing  institutions,  which  begin  a  process  of  investigation  and 
card re-issuance. These networks, coupled with CISP and Visa’s Zero Liability, pro-
vide  a  high  degree  of  protection  from  fraudulent  credit  card  transactions  to  card-
holders. 
Expansion of Existing Requirements 

Current  protections  notwithstanding,  Visa  believes  that  an  obligation  to  protect 
sensitive,  personal  information,  similar  to  the  GLBA  501(b)  Rules,  should  apply 
broadly so that all businesses that maintain sensitive, personal information will es-
tablish  information  security  programs.  Because  consumer  information  knows  no 
boundaries, it is critical that this obligation be uniform across all institutions in all 
jurisdictions. 
Security Breach Notification 

Closely  related  to  the  issue  of  information  security  is  the  question  of  what  to  do 
if  a  breach  of  that  security  occurs.  Visa  believes  that  where  the  breach  creates  a 
substantial  risk  of  harm  to  consumers  that  the  consumers  can  take  action  to  pre-
vent,  the  consumers  should  be  notified  about  the  breach  so  that  they  can  take  ap-
propriate action to protect themselves. Both Federal and California law already ad-
dress  this  issue.  California  law  currently  requires  notice  to  individuals  of  a  breach 
of security involving their computerized personal information. The California law fo-
cuses  on  discrete  types  of  information  that  are  deemed  to  be  sensitive,  personal  in-
formation.  The  statute  defines  sensitive,  personal  information  as  an  individual’s 
name  plus  any  of  the  following:  Social  Security  Number,  driver’s  license  number, 
California identification card number, or a financial account number, credit or debit 
card account number, in combination with any code that would permit access to the 
account.  The  California  law  includes  an  exception  to  the  notification  requirement 
when  this  personal  information  has  been  encrypted.  The  California  law  only  re-
quires notice to be provided when personal information is ‘‘acquired by an unauthor-
ized  person.’’  Other  states  recently  have  enacted  or  are  considering  security  breach 
notification laws; however, the details of some of the laws differ. 

In  March,  the  Federal  banking  agencies  issued  final  interagency  guidance  on  re-
sponse programs for unauthorized access to customer information and customer no-
tice  (Guidance).  The  Guidance  applies  to  all  financial  institutions  that  are  subject 
to  banking  agency  GLBA  501(b)  Rules  and  requires  every  covered  institution  that 
experiences a breach of security involving sensitive customer information to: (1) no-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

116 

tify  the  institution’s  primary  Federal  regulator;  (2)  notify  appropriate  law  enforce-
ment authorities consistent with existing suspicious activity report rules; and (3) no-
tify  its  affected  customers  where  misuse  of  the  information  has  occurred  or  is  rea-
sonably possible. 

The  keen  interest  that  states  have  shown  to  legislate  on  the  issue  of  security 
breach  notification  emphasizes  the  need  for  a  single  national  standard  for  security 
breach  notification  in  order  to  avoid  confusion  among  consumers  as  to  the  signifi-
cance  of  notices  that  they  receive  and  among  holders  of  information  about  con-
sumers  as  to  their  notification  responsibilities.  In  addition,  any  legislation  on  secu-
rity  breach  notification  should  recognize  compliance  with  the  Guidance  as  compli-
ance with any notification requirements. 

Visa  believes  that  a  workable  notification  law  that  would  require  entities  that 
maintain  computerized,  sensitive  personal  information  to  notify  individuals  upon 
discovering  a  significant  breach  of  security  of  that  data  should  be  risk-based  to 
avoid inundating consumers with notices where no action by consumers is required. 
As  FTC  Chairwoman  Majoras  recently  testified  to  Congress,  notices  should  be  sent 
only  if  there  is  a  ‘‘significant  risk  of  harm,’’  because  notices  sent  when  there  is  not 
a  significant  risk  of  harm  actually  can  cause  individuals  to  overlook  those  notices 
that really are important. 

Thank you, again, for the opportunity to present this testimony today. I would be 

happy to answer any questions. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

PAUL B. KURTZ 

Question.  Companies  often  protest  against  regulation  by  maintaining  that  the 
market will address the problem and correct it. However, in the case of ChoicePoint 
and  other  information  brokers,  those  with  the  buying  power  are  not  adversely  af-
fected  by  poor  security  and  thus  do  not  demand  it  from  the  information  suppliers. 
Can either of you comment on the economics of security and how they apply, or not 
apply as the case may be, to the information-broker industry? When should govern-
ment intervene? 

Answer. In determining the Government’s role with regard to cyber security regu-
lation,  the  President’s  National  Strategy  to  Secure  Cyber  Space  is  an  appropriate 
place  to  start.  The  National  Strategy  provides  clear  policy  guidance  for  the  Federal 
Government’s  role:  ‘‘In  general,  the  private  sector  is  best  equipped  and  structured 
to respond to an evolving cyber threat. There are specific instances, however, where 
Federal Government response is most appropriate and justified.’’ The Strategy goes 
on  to  describe  the  Government’s  role  in  the  private  sector:  ‘‘Externally,  a  govern-
ment  role  in  cybersecurity  is  warranted  in  cases  where  high  transaction  costs  or 
legal barriers lead to significant coordination problems; cases in which governments 
operate in the absence of private sector forces; resolution of incentive problems that 
lead to under-provisioning of critical shared resources; and raising awareness.’’ 

According  to  this  description,  it  seems  that  information  brokers  may  fall  into  the 
narrow category where there is an absence of private sector forces prompting cyber 
security.  As  such,  it  appears  appropriate  for  the  Federal  Government  to  intervene. 
What makes regulation of this issue complex is the threat to unsecured, sensitive 
personal  information  does  not  stop  with  information  brokers.  Recent  security 
breaches have occurred in a variety of organizations in regulated and non-regulated 
industries,  ranging  from  banks  and  hospitals,  to  educational  institutions  and  large 
employers. 

We  believe  there  are  five  key  principles  that  should  be  included  in  legislation  to 

address this issue. 

1.  Federal  Pre-emption.  Any  new  law  should  establish  a  national  data  breach 
notification ‘‘floor’’ for unauthorized access to unencrypted personal information 
while  enabling  State  attorneys  general  to  prosecute  the  Federal  law  so  long  as 
the U.S. Attorney General is notified. 
Nine  states  have  already  passed  legislation  requiring  notification  of  unauthor-
ized  access  to  unencrypted  personal  information.  Without  Federal  pre-emption, 
we will face a web of potentially conflicting breach notification requirements. 
2.  Scope.  The  scope  of  the  breach  notification  bill  should  apply  to  any  agency 
or person, as defined in title 5 of the U.S. Code, who owns or licenses computer-
ized  data  containing  sensitive,  personal  information  and  should  not  be  limited 
to  data  brokers.  In  developing  this  legislation,  it  is  important  not  to  duplicate 
requirements  set  forth  under  existing  Federal  law  such  as  the  Gramm-Leach- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

117 

Bliley Act (GLBA), the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA), or other relevant Fed-
eral legislation. 
Legislation  should  address  ‘‘gaps’’  in  existing  legislation  related  to  the  security 
of  personal  information.  Recent  security  breaches  have  occurred  in  a  variety  of 
organizations,  ranging  from  data  brokers,  banks  and  hospitals,  to  educational 
institutions and large employers. 
3.  Reasonable  Security  Practices.  Reasonable  security  practices  encompass  a 
combination  of  technology,  policy,  and  expertise.  Consistent  with  existing  State 
law,  organizations  that  own  or  license  computerized  data  containing  personal 
information  should  implement  and  maintain  reasonable  security  measures 
based on widely accepted voluntary industry standards or existing Federal law. 
Security Practices. The term ‘‘security practices’’ shall mean reasonable security 
and notification procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the infor-
mation  to  protect  sensitive,  personal  information  from  unauthorized  access,  de-
struction, use, modification or disclosure. 
Certification.  Congress  should  consider  self-certification  to  help  safeguard  sen-
sitive,  personal  information.  In  the  case  of  self-certification,  covered  entities 
would  be  required  to  self-certify  that  they  have  met  a  widely  adopted  standard 
in  order  to  safeguard  sensitive,  personal  information.  If  a  breach  occurs  and  it 
is  clear  that  reasonable  measures  were  not  taken  to  safeguard  sensitive,  per-
sonal information, then the covered entity involved would be subject to criminal 
prosecution by the Department of Justice. Congress should also consider an op-
tion  for  certification  by  a  third-party,  coupled  with  liability  protection  to  foster 
protection. 
Encryption. Congress should encourage the use of encryption technologies with-
out  requiring  it,  similar  to  California’s  SB  1386.  Encryption  is  defined  as  ‘‘the 
protection of data in storage or in transit using a NIST approved encryption al-
gorithm  implemented  within  a  FIPS  140  validated  cryptographic  module  com-
bined with the appropriate key management mechanism to protect the confiden-
tiality  and  integrity  of  associated  cryptographic  keys  in  storage  or  in  transit.’’ 
Existing voluntary standards include: 

International Standards Organization (ISO) 17799 
Control Objectives for Information and Related Technology (COBiT) 
British Standard (BS) 7799 
Information security governance framework issued by the National Cyber Se-
curity Summit Task Force in April 2004 

Existing regulatory standards include: 

Fair Credit Reporting Act (http://www.ftc.gov/os/statutes/fcra.htm#607) 
Gramm Leach Bliley, Safeguards Rule 
FDA, Title 21, Subchapter A, Protection of Privacy 
Basel II, Revised International Capital Framework 
Health Insurance Portability and Accounting Act (HIPAA) Security Rule 

4.  Definition  of  ‘‘breach.’’  A  breach  of  unencrypted  personal  information  should 
be  defined  so  that  it  encourages  the  implementation  of  reasonable  security 
measures and minimizes false positives. 
5. Regulatory Authority. The Federal Trade Commission is the most appropriate 
authority to oversee breach notification on a civil level and refer criminal cases 
to  the  Department  of  Justice.  Wherever  possible,  the  FTC  should  be  directed 
to adopt existing standards, rather than to create new standards. 

Regarding the economics of security, a recent CRS report states that investments 
in  cyber  security  cannot  be  easily  analyzed  in  terms  of  return  on  investment,  since 
they do not contribute to income in a measurable way. While such investments may 
not contribute directly to income, their impact on the way an organization does busi-
ness is immeasurable. Information is the lifeblood of today’s economy and protecting 
that information—maintaining its confidentiality while assuring its accessibility and 
reliability—are  of  the  utmost  importance.  Cyber  security  is  more  than  just  pro-
tecting  names  and  Social  Security  numbers  held  by  data  brokers.  The  economy  de-
pends on the free flow of information and we need to be able to trust that informa-
tion  to  be  what  it  purports  to  be.  The  issues  we  hear,  seemingly  on  a  day  to  day 
basis—spyware,  identity  theft,  phishing,  breach  notification—are  all  symptoms  in 
the  larger  problem  of  unsecured  information  systems.  We  encourage  the  Congress 
to take a more holistic approach to the issue of cyber security, rather than reacting 
to  each  problem.  In  this  context,  CSIA  believes  that  there  are  a  number  of  incen-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

118 

tives that have not yet been investigated such as legislative safe harbors, tax incen-
tives, the use of cyber insurance, or other motivating factors that would promote the 
use and development of stronger security measures by information brokers. 

Finally, there is very little economic data available to determine the costs of cyber 
security attacks and vulnerabilities. Developing cost estimates requires reporting of 
incidents as well as a common methodology of breaking down lost productivity, sys-
tem  down  time,  identifying  vulnerabilities,  testing  patches,  and  personnel  hours. 
Federally funded research in this area would be of great value. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

JENNIFER T. BARRETT 

Question 1. Does Acxiom merely compile, store, and sell sensitive consumer infor-
mation?  Or  does  your  company  perform  analysis  of  such  information.  Can  you  de-
scribe what this analysis involves? And what sorts of analysis is your company per-
forming generally for law enforcement, such as the FBI? 

Answer. Acxiom does compile consumer information, including SSNs and Driver’s 
License  Numbers  (DL#s),  in  order  to  develop  our  fraud  management  products.  The 
‘‘analysis’’ performed in building such products is limited to determining how to ac-
curately integrate or combine the multiple sources of information. 

Our  verification  services  only  validate  that  the  information  our  client  has  ob-
tained  from  the  consumer  is  correct.  There  is  no  ‘‘analysis’’  performed  in  providing 
those  services.  Rather,  the  record  being  verified  is  compared  to  the  information 
Acxiom already possesses and a ‘‘match’’ or ‘‘no-match’’ indicator is returned. 

Only law enforcement and the internal fraud departments of large financial insti-
tutions and insurance companies have access to additional information in connection 
with  these  verification  services.  The  additional  information  made  available  to  this 
select  group  of  users  includes  such  information  as  previous  addresses,  additional 
SSNs or DL#s associated with the particular consumer. Again, no ‘‘analysis’’ is per-
formed by Acxiom. 

Acxiom’s  background  screening  products  utilize  field  researchers  who  do  in-per-
son,  real-time  research  against  public  records  and  make  calls  to  past  employers  to 
verify the information provided by the consumer. Acxiom does not pre-aggregate in-
formation  for  these  products.  As  a  result,  the  compilation  of  this  product  is  only 
done  in  preparation  of  the  actual  report  and  the  file  is  stored  only  for  purposes  of 
compliance with the FCRA. 

Question 2. What is the procedure for becoming an Acxiom client? When someone 
becomes a client, does that client have access to all of your company’s databases for 
any  purpose?  For  example,  if  an  attorney  becomes  an  Acxiom  client  to  help  locate 
a  witness,  can  that  attorney  also  use  Acxiom’s  databases  for  personal  or  other  rea-
sons? How does your company monitor this? 

Answer.  Acxiom  sells  its  fraud  management  products  exclusively  to  very  large  fi-
nancial services and insurance clients and law enforcement agencies. These products 
are not sold to individuals, such as attorneys. 

The  sales  cycle  for  these  types  of  clients  is  typically  several  months  long  and  in-
volves  many  in-person  visits  and  customized  interfaces  between  systems.  The  prob-
lem  the  client  is  trying  to  address  with  the  data,  and  the  data  to  be  provided  by 
Acxiom, are fully vetted by Acxiom’s product, legal and compliance teams. Once the 
appropriate Acxiom products for a particular solution are determined, the client en-
ters  into  a  signed  written  agreement  with  terms  and  conditions  of  use  of  the  data. 
Once a formal relationship is established, a client is permitted to utilize only the 

data products for which it has been approved and granted a license. 

A log is kept of every transaction made by Acxiom’s clients to our fraud manage-
ment products which provide access to sensitive information. These are used for bill-
ing purposes and periodically audited/reviewed by the product team. 

Our  background  screening  products,  which  are  regulated  by  the  Fair  Credit  Re-
porting  Act,  are  available  only  to  employers  and  landlords.  All  clients  using  these 
products  are  credentialed  with  such  agencies  as  the  Better  Business  Bureau  and, 
for  those  who  receive  any  sensitive  information,  onsite  inspections  of  potential  cli-
ents also are conducted by Acxiom. Only pre-employment credit reports provide sen-
sitive information that employers or landlords do not already possess. 

Question  3.  Can  you  explain  how  Acxiom  organizes  and  maintains  its  sensitive 
consumer  information?  Is  all  information—regulated  or  unregulated—contained  in 
one  database?  If  information  is  maintained  separately,  can  information  from  one 
database  make  its  way  into  another  database?  If  not,  how  does  Acxiom  prevent  in-
formation from migrating from one database into others? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

119 

Answer.  Acxiom  builds  distinct  databases  to  support  each  of  its  different  data 
product  lines.  The  only  products  Acxiom  offers  that  contain  sensitive  consumer  in-
formation are its fraud management products and background screening services. 

Although  the  fraud  management  products  are  built  from  both  regulated  and  un-
regulated data, the entire database is maintained and utilized as if it was all regu-
lated. 

Different  Acxiom  teams  are  responsible  for  the  creation  and  maintenance  of  each 
distinct  product  line  and  the  databases  from  which  they  are  built.  Only  the  appro-
priate team has access to the data within each database. This strategy prevents the 
unintentional migration of information from one database to another. 

Acxiom  voluntarily  submits  itself  to  external  annual  audits  of  its  information 
practices  for  the  purpose  of  reviewing  the  data  and  data  sources  utilized  in  each 
product  line  and  to  assure  compliance  with  our  own  principles,  source  contacts  and 
applicable laws and regulations. 

The  background  screening  reports  are  provided  by  a  separately  run  subsidiary  of 
Acxiom  and  are  fully  regulated  under  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act.  The  reports 
are  compiled  on  an  ‘‘as  needed’’  basis  by  associates  and  field  agents  who  are  em-
ployed  by  that  subsidiary  and  who  are  focused  only  on  that  business.  The  informa-
tion  in  those  reports  is  not  stored  in  a  database  and  is  not  utilized  in  any  other 
area of the company. 

Question  4.  Some  information  brokers  have  cited  the  difficulty  in  correcting  con-
sumer  files,  claiming  that  the  inaccurate  information  is  generated  from  public 
records.  But  this  addresses  only  part  of  the  issue.  One  problem  is  that  information 
brokers may place information regarding one person into another person’s file. This 
is  particularly  common  with  persons  who  have  the  same  name.  What  steps  does 
Acxiom take to try to avoid this problem? 

Answer.  Acxiom  utilizes  all  available  identifying  information  in  consolidating  the 
information  from  various  sources  to  build  the  company’s  data  products.  In  the  case 
of  individuals  with  the  same  or  similar  names,  the  use  of  address,  telephone,  date 
of  birth  and  SSN,  if  available,  will  assist  in  accurately  differentiating  between  the 
two  persons.  No  one  element  is  used  to  consolidate  information.  Rather  a  combina-
tion  of  elements  are  utilized,  reducing  the  chance  that  an  error  or  a  similarity  in 
one  element  will  result  in  an  error.  We  also  conduct  quality  audits  of  consolidation 
procedures to help identify problems and to refine our consolidation algorithms. 

Access  to  increased  information  reduces  chances  for  errors.  Should  some  of  these 
elements  of  differentiating  data  become  unavailable  to  the  information  services  in-
dustry, the accuracy of the consolidation may suffer. 

Question  5.  To  what  extent  does  Acxiom  sell  sensitive  consumer  information  to 
Federal,  State,  and  local  law  enforcement  agencies.  Does  Acxiom  have  any  limita-
tions on the sale of information to law enforcement entities? 

Answer.  Acxiom  has  only  one  contract  with  the  Federal  Government  which  in-
volves  the  sale  of  sensitive  information.  We  impose  similar  restrictions  on  the  sale 
of sensitive information to government agencies as we do for the fraud departments 
of  large  financial  institutions  and  insurance  companies.  Examples  of  such  restric-
tions include: 

• Sensitive data provided to the government may only be used to verify the accu-
racy  of  personal  information  for  the  purposes  of  preventing  fraud  or  to  locate 
individuals. 
• Driver’s  License  data  must  be  used  by  the  government  in  compliance  with  the 
Drivers Privacy Protection Act for the verification of accuracy of personal infor-
mation.  If  the  personal  information  is  incorrect,  the  driver’s  license  data  may 
be used to obtain the correct information, but only for the purpose of preventing 
fraud. 
• The data provided cannot be stored in any other form or used for any other pur-

pose unless express written permission is received from Acxiom. 

Question  6.  Please  describe  the  procedures  governing  who  can  purchase  sensitive 
consumer  information  from  Acxiom.  Please  tell  us  about  the  types  of  holes  Acxiom 
had in its old process and how the company is now plugging those holes. 

Answer.  Acxiom  sells  our  fraud  management  product  exclusively  to  large  compa-
nies and has only several dozen clients for these products. As described earlier, only 
the  fraud  departments  of  large  financial  institutions  and  insurance  companies  and 
government  agencies  have  access  to  this  investigative  tool  which  provides  sensitive 
information. 

We do not believe we have any holes in our current process for screening clients, 
as that process has never been compromised. However, after the incidents involving 
ChoicePoint  and  Lexis-Nexis,  Acxiom  undertook  a  review  of  all  our  client 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

120 

credentialing  procedures,  including  those  procedures  that  apply  to  clients  with  ac-
cess to only non-sensitive data. As a result of that review, which will conclude next 
month,  Acxiom  may  implement  additional  credentialing  procedures  if  such  proce-
dures are determined to be appropriate. 

While the security breach Acxiom suffered in 2003 did not involve any of Acxiom’s 
information products and did not result in access to any of Acxiom’s sensitive data, 
we did make substantial technical changes in how files are transferred to and from 
Acxiom by our clients, to prevent such an incident from reoccurring. 

Question 7. Does Acxiom favor giving consumers wider access to information that 
the company stores about them? This is a central principle of the legislation I have 
introduced. What information should companies like Acxiom make available to con-
sumers? 

Answer.  Acxiom’s  fraud  products  and  the  background  screening  products  are  the 
only  products  which  contain  sensitive  information.  Since  1997,  Acxiom  has  volun-
tarily  provided  consumers  access  to  the  information  Acxiom  has  about  them  in  the 
company’s fraud management and directory products. We also provide consumer ac-
cess  to  the  company’s  background  screening  product,  pursuant  to  the  requirements 
of the Fair Credit Reporting Act. 

Question  8.  Does  Acxiom  perform  any  audits  of  its  systems  to  ensure  accuracy  of 

the sensitive consumer information that it compiles? 

Answer.  Acxiom  is  constantly  auditing  its  data  compilation  processes,  and  the 
quality of the files it obtains, in order to assure maximum possible accuracy. These 
audits  include  manual  reviews  of  the  data,  comparisons  to  other  sources,  and 
verification of the company’s consolidation procedures. Acxiom obtains sensitive data 
from only a few select sources with which Acxiom has worked for years. 

Question  9.  What  auditing  does  Acxiom  perform  on  its  business  and  government 
clients? Are clients required to type in a specific justification for each search of per-
sonal  information,  or  do  they  just  see  a  ‘‘click  through’’  agreement?  How  long  are 
audit  logs  maintained?  Has  auditing  ever  revealed  wrongdoing  that  led  to  a  client 
being prosecuted for misusing personal information? 

Answer. Acxiom does not allow access to data products containing sensitive infor-
mation  via  a  ‘‘click  through’’  agreement.  As  described  above,  the  problem  the  client 
is trying to address with the data, and the data to be provided by Acxiom, are fully 
vetted  by  Acxiom’s  product,  legal  and  compliance  teams.  Once  the  appropriate 
Acxiom  products  for  a  particular  solution  are  determined,  the  client  enters  into  a 
signed written agreement with terms and conditions of use of the data. 

Acxiom’s practice is to maintain audit logs as described above for our fraud man-

agement products for at least 7 years. 

We  have  never  had  an  audit  reveal  wrongdoing  that  led  to  a  client  being  pros-

ecuted for misusing personal information. 

Question  10.  To  which  Federal  Government  agencies  does  Acxiom  sell  sensitive 

consumer information? 

Answer. Acxiom currently provides sensitive data to only one Federal law enforce-

ment agency engaged in homeland security efforts. 

Question  11.  Does  your  company  compile  information  garnered  from  warranty 
cards filled out by consumers? If so, what companies generally supply you with this 
information and how is this information stored and used? 

Answer.  Acxiom  does  not  compile  information  garnered  from  warranty  cards,  but 
we  do  license  general  lifestyle  data  from  sources  that  do.  That  information  is  only 
used for marketing purposes. 

Question  12.  Please  give  a  complete  listing  of  the  types  of  personal  information 
that your company maintains in all of its product lines, including information based 
on DNA and biometrics. 

Answer. Acxiom possesses absolutely no information based on, derived from, or in 

any way related to DNA or biometrics. 

Marketing  Products—Acxiom  develops  and  maintains  databases  containing  infor-
mation  on  households  in  the  U.S.  for  companies  to  use  in  their  marketing  and  cus-
tomer  service  programs.  These  databases  are  developed  from  many  different 
sources, including: 

Public  Record  and  Publicly  Available  Information—Telephone  directories, 
website directories and listings, real property recorder and assessor information, 
historical  drivers  license  information  and  historical  motor  vehicle  information. 
Data  from  Other  Information  Providers—Demographic  information,  survey  in-
formation and summary buyer information. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

121 

These databases do not include credit information, medical information, Social Se-
curity  Number  (or  other  related  information)  or  personally  identifiable  information 
about children. 

Reference  Products—Acxiom  develops  and  maintains  databases  containing  infor-
mation  about  many  individuals  and  households  in  the  U.S.  for  directory  reference 
and fraud management purposes and provides online links to other information pro-
vider  services  for  use  by  qualified  businesses  and  government  agencies  for  lawful 
and  ethical  purposes.  These  databases  are  developed  from  many  different  sources, 
including: 

Public  Record  and  Publicly  Available  Information—Telephone  directories;  real 
property  recorder  and  assessor  information;  historical  drivers  license  informa-
tion; current drivers license information, where allowed by law; historical motor 
vehicle  information;  current  motor  vehicle  information,  where  allowed  by  law; 
deceased information; and other suppression information. 
Data  from  Other  Information  Providers—Identifying  information  only  (header 
data) from consumer reporting agencies, where allowed by law, and information 
about household characteristics collected and permissioned by the consumer. 

These  databases  and  access  to  other  information  provider  services  include  finan-
cial  information,  Social  Security  Number  and  other  related  information  where  per-
mitted  by  law.  This  information  is  provided  only  to  qualified  businesses  primarily 
in the finance, insurance, mortgage, real estate and retail industries for the purpose 
of  risk  management  including  verifying  information  about  customers,  issuing  mort-
gages,  speeding  transactions,  employment  screening  and  reducing  the  chance  of 
fraud. This information is also provided to government agencies for the purposes of 
risk  management  including  verifying  information,  employment  screening,  national 
security and assisting law enforcement. 

In order to protect the use of this information, Acxiom does not provide any infor-
mation, whether public or non-public, to individuals. Acxiom also does not allow our 
clients  to  make  any  non-public  information  available  to  an  individual.  Acxiom  does 
allow  our  clients  to  make  only  public  record  and  publicly  available  information 
available  to  individuals  in  the  form  of  commonly  used  and  accepted  real  estate  re-
search tools and public listing searches via the Internet. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. BILL NELSON TO 

KURT P. SANFORD 

Question 1. Can you explain how LexisNexis organizes and maintains its sensitive 

consumer information? 

Answer. LexisNexis stores all data in electronic files. Individual records comprise 
databases  which  are  distinguished  by  source.  The  LexisNexis  system  has  the  capa-
bility  to  search  individual  sources  or  search  multiple  data  sources  simultaneously 
in group files, which is a grouping of discrete data files from multiple sources. 

At  Seisint,  data  from  multiple  sources  is  generally  combined  into  a  group  file. 
Even though data is combined into a group file, Seisint retains the ability to distin-
guish the source from which each record in the group file originated. 

Question 1a. Is all information—regulated or unregulated—contained in one data-

base? 

Answer. No. In a few limited instances LexisNexis has successfully combined data 
from multiple sources into a group file or report, allowing a single search to be run 
on  the  resulting  group  file  or  report.  However,  regulated  data  either  separately  or 
combined with non-regulated data still requires a declaration of permissible use be-
fore access is permitted. 

Similarly, at Seisint, regulated data either separately or combined with non-regu-
lated  data  still  requires  a  declaration  of  permissible  use  before  access  is  permitted. 
Question  1b.  If  information  is  maintained  separately,  can  information  from  one 

database make its way into another database? 

Answer.  Information  from  one  database  (source  file)  cannot  migrate  into  another 
database  due  to  system  constraints,  permissions,  data  file  and  record  structure. 
However, in a few limited instances we have purposefully combined data into group 
files and reports for ease of use by our customers, as described above. 

Question 1c. If not, how does LexisNexis prevent information from migrating from 

one database into others? 

Answer. N/A. 
Question  2.  Some  information  brokers  have  cited  the  difficulty  in  correcting  con-
sumer  files,  claiming  that  the  inaccurate  information  is  generated  from  public 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

122 

records.  But  this  addresses  only  part  of  the  issue.  One  problem  is  that  information 
brokers may place information regarding one person into another person’s file. This 
is  particularly  common  with  persons  who  have  the  same  name.  What  steps  does 
LexisNexis take to try to avoid this problem? 

Answer.  To  be  linked,  data  must  match  on  multiple  data  elements  such  as  name 
and Social Security number, or name, address and telephone number, or some simi-
lar  combination  of  multiple  data  elements.  We  investigate  reported  mismatches.  If 
we confirm an error, we take steps to correct the error. If it is our error we correct 
it, otherwise we direct the consumer to the originating source so that consumer can 
pursue correction directly with the source. 

Question  3.  To  what  extent  does  LexisNexis  sell  sensitive  consumer  information 

to Federal, State, and local law enforcement agencies? 

Answer.  The  vast  majority  of  information  available  through  LexisNexis  comes 
from  public  records,  court  decisions,  statutes,  and  other  open  source  publications 
like  newspapers,  periodicals,  and  directories.  ‘‘Sensitive  information’’  on  LexisNexis 
is  limited  to  full  Social  Security  numbers  obtained  from  nonpublic  sources  such  as 
credit  headers,  in  accordance  with  both  the  Fair  Credit  Reporting  Act  (FCRA)  and 
the privacy provisions of the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Financial Services Modernization 
Act (GLBA), and drivers license numbers obtained from State departments of motor 
vehicles  in  compliance  with  Federal  and  state  implementations  of  the  Drivers  Pri-
vacy Protection Act (DPPA). 

Sensitive  information,  as  defined  above,  is  made  available  to  Federal,  State,  and 
local  law  enforcement  agencies  where  such  agencies  certify  that  their  access  is  in 
compliance  with  and  expressly  permitted  under  the  provisions  of  the  applicable 
laws. 

Question  3a.  Does  LexisNexis  have  any  limitations  on  the  sale  of  information  to 

law enforcement entities? 

Yes.  Law  enforcement  use  of  regulated  data  is  limited  to  only  those  uses  specifi-

cally permitted under the GLBA and DPPA. 

Question  4.  Please  describe  the  procedures  governing  who  can  purchase  sensitive 

consumer information from LexisNexis. 

Answer.  Access  to  sensitive  information  is  limited  to  those  customers  with  a  per-
missible  purpose  under  DPPA  or  GLBA.  Prior  to  entering  into  a  contract  with 
LexisNexis, a customer must disclose its intended purpose for the data, which must 
correspond  to  one  or  more  of  the  permissible  purposes  under  the  GLBA  and/or  the 
DPPA.  In  addition,  the  customer  must  qualify  as  an  authorized  user  and  must  cer-
tify that it has one of a limited number of authorized uses. LexisNexis has the right 
to  review  and  audit  the  customer’s  use  to  ensure  compliance  with  terms  of  the 
agreement. 

Question 4a. Please tell us about the types of holes LexisNexis had in its old proc-

ess and how the company is now plugging those holes. 

Answer.  The  security  incidents  we  uncovered  primarily  involved  unauthorized 
persons  misusing  IDs  and  passwords  of  legitimate  Seisint  customers.  As  a  result, 
we have enhanced our business practices and policies involving the issuance and ad-
ministration of customer IDs and passwords. These include: 

been inactive for 90 days; 

both system administrators and users be changed at least every 90 days; 

• Changing  customer  password  security  processes  to  require  that  passwords  for 
• Suspending  customer  passwords  of  system  administrators  and  users  that  have 
• Suspending  customer  passwords  after  five  unsuccessful  log  in  attempts  and  re-
quiring  them  to  contact  Customer  Support  to  ensure  security  and  appropriate 
reactivation; and 
• Requiring  that  system  administrators  review  the  list  of  employees  issued  IDs 
and passwords to ensure that access is terminated when an employee leaves the 
company. 

Question 5. Does LexisNexis perform any audits of its systems to ensure accuracy 

of the sensitive consumer information that it compiles? 

Answer.  LexisNexis  employs  a  number  of  procedures  to  test  the  accuracy  of  sen-
sitive information received and to test the accuracy of this data prior to making the 
data available to customers. Accuracy is measured by determining whether the data 
received matches the data in the source document or record. 

LexisNexis  only  obtains  data  from  known,  reputable  sources.  Credit  header  data 
is obtained directly from the originating credit bureau, not through brokers or other 
third parties. 

• We receive the most current data that the supplier can provide; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00126 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

123 

• Any  questions  arising  regarding  the  accuracy  of  the  content  delivered  to 

LexisNexis are resolved quickly and effectively; 

• Data is delivered in the same, mutually agreed upon format, thereby maintain-
ing the integrity of the data conversion process and minimizing the risk of con-
version errors; 

• We  respond  to  any  questions  regarding  data  accuracy  brought  to  our  attention 

by consumers or others; and 

• Any updates, additions, or changes will be received from the supplier. 
The data conversion process is itself subject to a series of system checks. The data 
is  run  through  the  conversion  process  where  computer  systems  and  software  check 
for  conformance  with  formatting  specifications.  Deviations,  anomalous  data,  and 
data omissions are noted and brought to the attention of the appropriate LexisNexis 
personnel for verification, review, or remediation with the data supplier. 

Question  6.  What  auditing  does  LexisNexis  perform  on  its  business  and  govern-

ment clients? 

Answer.  LexisNexis  has  established  systems  that  allow  us  to  monitor  usage  and 
identify  abnormal  usage  patterns.  When  abnormal  usage  is  discovered,  access  is 
shut off and the use investigated. 

Question 6a. Are clients required to type in a specific justification for each search 

of personal information, or do they just see a ‘‘click through’’ agreement? 

Answer.  LexisNexis  does  provide  electronic  access  to  applicable  terms  and  condi-
tions  on  use  for  all  users.  These  terms  and  conditions  keep  users  informed  of  their 
obligations under the written agreement. 

In addition, LexisNexis employs a series of electronic notices and responses to de-
termine  whether  users  have  a  legally  permissible  purpose  for  accessing  legally  re-
stricted,  personal  information  such  as  credit  headers  subject  to  restrictions  on  use 
under the privacy provisions of the GLBA or driver’s license records restricted under 
the  DPPA.  These  notices  provide  users  with  the  permissible  purposes  authorized 
under the applicable statutes. Unless the user indicates a specific, enumerated per-
missible purpose, access is denied. 

Users  are  given  notice  that  records  of  their  use  of  these  materials  is  subject  to 
recordkeeping  requirements  of  applicable  Federal  and  State  laws  and  of  data  sup-
pliers.  Records  are  maintained  of  the  user  ID,  permissible  purpose,  date,  and  time 
of the search. 

Question 6b. How long are audit logs maintained? 
Answer. In accordance with the requirements of the DPPA records of the identity 
of  the  user  and  of  the  applicable  permitted  use  must  be  maintained  for  at  least  5 
years for searches involving information covered by that statute. 

Question  6c.  Has  auditing  ever  revealed  wrongdoing  that  led  to  a  client  being 

prosecuted for misusing personal information? 

Answer.  We  have  identified  instances  where  it  appeared  from  searching  patterns 
that  customers  could  have  been  misusing  personal  information.  In  those  instances 
system access was either suspended or modified to avoid the possibility of improper 
use. 

Question  7.  To  which  Federal  Government  agencies  does  your  company  sell  sen-

sitive consumer information? 

ment. Some of our customers include: 

Answer.  LexisNexis  works  with  virtually  every  agency  in  the  Federal  Govern-

• Homeland Security agencies 
• Law enforcement agencies 
• Intelligence agencies 
• Entitlements agencies 
• Regulatory agencies 
• Revenue agencies 
Question  8.  Does  your  company  compile  information  garnered  from  warranty 

cards filled out by consumers? 

Answer. No. 
Question 8a. If so, what companies generally supply you with this information and 

how is this information stored and used? 

Answer. N/A. 
Question 9. Please give a complete listing of the types of personal information that 
your  company  maintains  in  all  of  its  product  lines,  including  information  based  on 
DNA and biometrics. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00127 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

124 

Answer.  The  information  maintained  by  LexisNexis  falls  into  the  following  three 
general classifications: public record information, publicly available information, and 
non-public information. 

Public  record  information.  Public  record  information  is  information  originally  ob-
tained from government records that are available to the public. Real estate records, 
court records, and professional licensing records are examples of public record infor-
mation  collected  and  maintained  by  the  government  for  public  purposes,  including 
dissemination to the public. 

Publicly  available  information.  Publicly  available  information  is  information  that 
is  available  to  the  general  public  from  non-governmental  sources.  Telephone  direc-
tories are an example of publicly available information. 

Non-public  information.  Non-public  information  is  information  about  an  indi-
vidual that is not obtained directly from public record information or publicly avail-
able  information.  This  information  comes  from  proprietary  or  non-public  sources. 
Non-public  data  maintained  by  LexisNexis  consists  primarily  of  information  ob-
tained  from  driver’s  license  records,  motor  vehicle  records  or  credit  header  data. 
Credit header data is the non-financial identifying information located at the top of 
a  credit  report,  such  as  name,  current  and  prior  address,  listed  telephone  number, 
Social Security number, and month and year of birth. 

LexisNexis  does  not  collect  or  distribute  personal  financial  information  such  as 
credit card account information or personal medical records. LexisNexis does not col-
lect or maintain either DNA or biometric data. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:48 Oct 28, 2010 Jkt 061787 PO 00000 Frm 00128 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61787.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

